
Introduction

psychobabble solutions. Heaven’s Gate, however, is an unsettling
testimony to the possibility of such a shared destiny: people of different ages, sexes, and economic backgrounds swallowed applesauce
and barbiturates in a final act of solidarity.
Freud saw Eros (the god of love) as a social binding-agent,
feeding the appetite for construction. But he also sensed the
destructive potential of its symbolic exchange with Thanatos (the
god of death) in a yin-and-yang process. McKenna fudges the ambiguity of Eros, seeing it as the catalyst for an apocalypse that banishes Thanatos in favor of the benign Alien, who shepherds us in
the manner of a Jew who roamed the earth two thousand years ago.
It is thus important to identify libidinal millenarianism as the
result of a constant interplay between the ur-myths of Armageddon
and their rewriting in the present.
One word that perfectly encapsulates this “atavistic versus
futuristic” dynamic is panic. “When the shaman’s song fails,”
McKenna notes,
his world erupts into a situation of weakened psychic constitution
that contains an element of “panic” in the mythological sense that
evokes Pan bursting through from the underworld. The equivalent
panic in our society is the emergence of the UFO as an autonomous
psychic entity that has slipped from the control of the ego and
approaches laden with the “Otherness” of the unconscious. (60)

This leads to what McKenna calls succinctly “the revelation of the
UFO” (61).
When Charles Manson heard about Heaven’s Gate, he remarked,
“These monks that just took their heads in San Diego; they’re way
behind the times” (Gleick 26). Any attempt to decipher this convicted killer’s edicts is automatic conjecture. However, his statement could be read as an acknowledgment of his own allegorical
role in the millenarian climate of the 1960s. Like McKenna,
Manson finds the emphasis on redemption now outdated. Or perhaps, as I suggest in the next section, it has merely altered its form.
The genealogy I trace—from Sade through Friedrich
Nietzsche to Bataille and J. G. Ballard (to name only a few)—represents the “dark side” of libidinal millenarianism, the one that
acknowledges and embraces the Thanatic aspect of Eros.
According to their “dionysian” perspective, Thanatos is never far
behind.3 This point is illustrated by the Select Followers of
Oklahoma, who were prevented by police from sacrificing a virgin
to Haley’s Comet in 1910 (Lacayo 34). Heaven’s Gate occupies an
ambivalent space in the dionysian scheme of things. Rejecting its
essential panic, they executed themselves with methodical disci-

After the Orgy

7

pline, rather than with the traditional gesture of sacrificial excess.
The police officers who discovered the bodies of Applewhite and
his followers were immediately overcome by the stench of the
corpses inside the giant mansion. Despite the anal-retentive ways
of cult members, the organic basis of their existence (which weighed
on their spirits so heavily) leaked out in the absence of Apollonian
muscle control. The seventy-four members of the Order of the Solar
Temple who have killed themselves since 1994 in Canada,
Switzerland, and France are also sacrificial offerings to Bataille’s
“solar anus” of excremental nihilism. So long as humanity is an
embodied entity, Dionysus will have the last laugh.
Heaven’s Gate is thus the ideal cult for an age that Jean
Baudrillard has described as coming “after the orgy”—the orgy
being the specific moment when “modernity exploded upon us”
(1993: 3). Unlike Shoko Asahara’s lascivious evenings in the Aum
Shinrikyo compound, or David Koresh’s alleged satyric ceremonies
in “ranch apocalypse,” Applewhite’s sublimation represents a rejection of the nihilistic-orgiastic dynamic of heretical history. As
Damian Thompson notes in his pop-study, The End of Time, “[t]here
is a pronounced tendency . . . for millenarian groups to veer
toward extreme attitudes to sexual behaviour, in which sex is either
forbidden or to be enjoyed indiscriminately” (1996; introduction—
n.). Both options, however, partake of libidinal millenarianism, representing two sides to the same coin.
Neal Stephenson’s post-cyberpunk novel, The Diamond Age, contains an extended section that plays on the literary motif of the
pagan orgy. In this scene, the protaganist Hacksworth watches the
mysterious behavior of the underworld.
In a cavernous dark space lit by many small fires, a young woman,
probably not much more than a girl, stands on a pedestal naked
except for an elaborate paint job, or maybe it is a total-body mediatronic tattoo. A crown of leafy branches is twined around her head,
and she has thick voluminous hair spreading to her knees. She is
clutching a bouquet of roses to her breast, the thorns indenting her
flesh. Many people, perhaps thousands, surround her, drumming
madly, sometimes chanting and singing. Into the space between
the girl and the watchers, a couple of dozen men are introduced.
Some come running out of their own accord, some look as if they’ve
been pushed, some wander in as if they’ve been walking down the
street (stark naked) and gone in the wrong door. Some are Asian,
some European, some African. Some have to be prodded by frenzied
celebrants who charge out of the crowd and shove them here and
there . . . . Hackworth notes that all of them have erections,
sheathed in brightly colored mediatronic condoms—rubbers that
actually make their own light so that the bobbing boners look like

8

Introduction
so many cyalume wands dancing through the air.
The drumbeats and the dancing speed up very slowly. The erections tell Hackworth why this is taking so long: He’s watching
foreplay here. After half an hour or so, the excitement, phallic and
otherwise, is unbearable. The beat is now a notch faster than your
basic pulse rate, lots of other beats and counterrhythms woven
through it, and the chanting of the individual singer has become a
wild semi-organized choral phenomenon. At some point, after
seemingly nothing has happened for half an hour, everything happens at once: The drumming and chanting explode to a new impossible level of intensity. The dancers reach down, grip the flaccid
reservoir tips of their radioactive condoms, stretch them out.
Someone runs out with a knife and cuts off the tips of the condoms
in a freakish parody of circumcisions exposing the glans of each
man’s penis. (1995: 231-232)

The fact that such a familiar trope as the pagan orgy can fit so
comfortably into the postindustrial, postmodern, and late-capitalistic narrative of a science fiction novel says much about historical
cycles and the resilience of archetypal myths. In this voyeuristic
scene the dionysian clearly continues to play an important role in
the literary landscape. Far from dissolving into the haze of nineteenth-century recycled romanticism, the phallic god of lust has
once again demonstrated his irrepressible nature by informing
much of today’s cultural zeitgeist.
This time, however, Dionysus must negotiate new foes and new
forces that seek to restrict the irrationality and violence of his
instincts. The Pan-like creature must adapt to the silicon valleys of
the information revolution. Consequently Dionysus’ traditionally
pastoral context has been displaced by the cybernetic, resulting in
what has been called—somewhat oxymoronically—the “cyberdionysian” (Dery, 33).
The fifth issue of Mondo 2000 (n.d.) has a photo-spread of
naked women covered only by electronic circuitry and computerized
gadgets. They are described as maenads (priestesses of Bacchus)
and cavort alongside a text whose rhythms are ritualistic:

Groaning, moaning, on your knees
panther, Niger, come to me
blood and milk together feed the pleasure
carmine, throbbing, senses reel
fleshy mystery, pagan meal
Dionysus screams as we give pleasure
(Springer 52)

After the Orgy

9

Much of 1990’s para-literature (articles, ads, reviews, comics,
and rock lyrics) defines itself against or toward an assumed
dionysian orientation. Moreover, this “attitude” is a crucial compass
for identity-based politics both within and against the monolithic
and abstract categories of modern existence: society, economy,
nation, class, race, gender, life, and death.
The dionysian impulse is further aggravated by the dynamic,
reciprocal, and symbiotic connections of millenarianism. I argue
that the dionysian is paradoxically the desire to reinvoke the
sacred while simultaneously embracing the nihilistic license of
the Free Spirit in the face of imminent extinction. In Raoul
Vaneigem’s terms, such a strategy valorizes life over, above, and
against, survival.
In describing the pervading aura of the fin de millénium as
life “after the orgy,” Baudrillard spotlights a general sense of
entropy, depletion, and decadence, all factors contributing to a
possible slow-motion apocalypse. Indeed, harnessing such a postcoital ambience is, I shall argue, the task of an emerging politics
of exhaustion, a “radical passivity” that threatens the prevalent
ethos of relentless productivity.
And yet despite Baudrillard’s aphorism, an echo of the orgy
survived in the erotic imagination of the 1990s. On January 22,
1995, an Asian-American porn starlet, Annabel Chong, (real
name, Grace Quek) decided to perform “The World’s Biggest
Gang Bang” by having sex with 251 men in one day. This event
took place
in a Hollywood soundstage. Doric, Ionic and Corinthian columns
decorated the set, along with various statues, urns, vases and
fountains in an attempt to recreate an ancient Roman orgy. There
was even a bust of what looked like Caligula . . . . The pretense
of a Roman orgy seemed awkward at the very least. (Hallock 82)

When interviewed as to her motives, Chong replied that “she simply had to do it ‘because it was such a daring idea.’ She imagined
it would embody the decadence with which she could end the century” (ibid.).
To couch such a stunt in these terms merely strengthens the
dionysian genealogy—no matter how tacky the Roman replicas—of
the happening in which she is such an enthusiastic (though problematic) participant.4 Just as Chong’s world record of 251 men was
surpassed a few months later by Californian stripper Jasmin St.
Claire, so too Baudrillard’s orgy is supplanted by another, in a simulated mise-en-abyme effect extending into the future.

Introduction

10
The Dating Game

Another Millennium. Another Bestseller.
Blurb for Arthur C. Clarke’s novel 3001
Only the brain of a child or of a savage could form the clumsy idea that the century is a kind of living being, born like a
beast or a man, passing through all the stages of existence,
gradually ageing and declining after blooming childhood, joyous youth, and vigorous maturity, to die with the expiration
of the hundredth year, after being afflicted in its last decade
with all the infirmities of mournful senility.
Max Nordau, Degeneration (1993 [1892]: 1)
The future’s uncertain and the end is always near.
The Doors, “Roadhouse Blues”

At this point it may be useful to ask what exactly this “Millennium”
is that I’m talking about. The answer may be that it isn’t anything,
exactly, but rather a “free-floating framework” (as Philip Lamy calls
it), or a giant sliding signifier that hovers ahead of us like a carrot
in front of a donkey; no matter what the “actual” date. Norman
Cohn, the traditional authority on these matters, notes how the
word millenarianism has “in fact become simply a convenient label
for a particular type of salvationism” (1993: 13), which is indeed
how I employ the term.
Thus in trying to pinpoint some kind of working definition, we
must concede that the millennium is a symbolic concept tied to a
symbolic measurement of time, which potentially is as contingent
as the human population itself. It is a blank screen on which we
project our own fantasies for the future, present anxieties, and
regrets about the past. Yet the images that flicker across its surface
have a thematic consistency and coherence that belie the randomness of calendrical fetishism. In simpler terms, how it is represented as occurring, and with what effects, are far more significant than
when it happens.
Throughout history, prophets have predicted the very day of
the dawning millennium, each date both a reflection of current
events and a Magic-Marker cross on Henri Focillon’s “perpetual calendar of human anxiety” (Kermode, 1975: 11). Although the debate
continues as to whether or not the year 1000 A. D. bore witness to
feverish millennial activity, the common feeling is that it passed

After the Orgy

11

almost unnoticed. The fact that significant millennial eruptions
occurred in the seemingly irrelevant years of 1260, 1420, and 1666,
indicates the dominance of sociological over astronomical patterns.
The frequency of prophetic failure, however, seems only to
inflame the desire for new estimates of the impending existential
terminus, thus confirming Wallace Stevens’s observation that “the
imagination is always at the end of an era” (ibid.: 31). As Kermode
notes, “Apocalypse can be disconfirmed without being discredited.
This is part of its extraordinary resilience” (ibid.: 8). And indeed the
regenerative resources of the Japanese Aum Shinrikyo sect—after
the disgrace of subway gas attacks, failed prophecies and legal
prosecution—is but one recent case of this phenomena.
In a passage that forms the epigraph to this section, the nineteenth-century anti-Decadent Nordau affirms the random nature of
temporality, and chastises those who impose a metaphysical system
onto its mathematical branches. He goes on to make the important
point that
[T]he arbitrary division of time, rolling ever continuously along, is
not identical amongst all civilized beings, and that while this nineteenth century of Christendom is held to be a creature reeling to
its death presumptively in dire exhaustion, the fourteenth century of the Mahommedan world is tripping along in the baby-shoes
of its first decade, and the fifteenth century of the Jews strides
gallantly by in the full maturity of its fifty-second year. (2)

Throughout the Christian era, a timeless and cyclic infrastructure has lurked beneath the progressive, linear superstructure.
Cohn attributes the initial emergence of a linear chronological
mode to a figure whose name would come to represent the mortal
pinnacle of historical evolution: the Iranian prophet Zarathustra,
who is more commonly known by his Greek name, “Zoroaster”,
which means “he who has active camels.”
Zoroaster’s is the first recorded instance of a narrative that
tells of a “coming consummation,” in which an unhappy situation
will be replaced by a utopian one. This positive apocalyptic scenario, known as “the making wonderful,” was certainly something
to look forward to in times of strife. Cohn thus identifies Zoroaster
as “the earliest known example of a particular kind of prophet—the
kind commonly called ‘millenarian’” (1995: 27). These prophets
then represent a promised paradise, their name becoming a signature of guarantee. (e.g., “Jesus Christ”).
Nietzsche reintroduced the transcendent legacy of
Zarathustra, just as his modern spin on the myth of Dionysus redefined its philosophical usage while maintaining its linguistic roots.
Zarathustra is indeed a curious choice to represent the circular

12

Introduction

logic of the “eternal return,” considering his traditional role as the
inventor of linearity. It is equally ironic that the twelfth-century
monk responsible for much of the Roman calendar (and its attendant chronological confusions) was called “Dionysius Exiguus”. But
such provocative coincidences fall outside the scope of this book.
The important point is that this tension between linearity and
circularity, which is often taken to be a fundamental historical
dialectic, continues to inform current millennial behavior.
According to Camille Paglia, the linear model of history—being a
metaphysical projection of the phallus—is patriarchal, whereas
cyclic history reflects a more “female” perspective. Millenarian
moments are thus characterized as the teleological thrustings of
Pan (experienced as “panic”) rather than the wandering “wombmadness” known as “hysteria”. Because Paglia models temporal
consciousness on the body, genital destiny informs historical destiny, and the apocalypse itself is interpreted as a masculinist genre:
Man is sexually compartmentalized. Genitally, he is condemned to
a perpetual pattern of linearity, focus, aim, directedness. He must
learn to aim. Without aim, urination and ejaculation end in infantile soiling of self or surroundings. Woman’s eroticism is diffused
throughout her body. (19)
The western idea of history as a propulsive movement into the
future, a progressive or Providential design climaxing in the revelation of a Second Coming, is a male formulation. No woman, I
submit, could have coined such an idea, since it is a strategy of
evasion of woman’s own cyclic nature, in which man dreads being
caught. Evolutionary or apocalyptic history is a male wish list
with a happy ending, a phallic peak. (10)

If we look past the essentialist trappings of Paglia’s formulation, we see an antiphallic critique of Western metaphysical models
shared by poststructuralist feminists such as Lee Quinby (1994).
According to such a critique, the majestic parabola of human
History—from cadence to decadence—follows the bell curve of male
urination. This golden arc which, on its downward trajectory, has
the apocalyptic connotations of annihilation, is traced by Thomas
Pynchon in Gravity’s Rainbow (1975), as well as by Bob Dylan in
his Cuban Missile Crisis song, “A Hard Rain’s a Gonna Fall” (1963).
Baudrillard agrees that history is witness to the final moments
of this curve toward a terminus:
All we have left of the millenarian dateline is the countdown to it.
For this century—which can do nothing more than count the seconds separating it from its end without either being able, or really
wanting, to measure up to that end—the digital Genitron clock on

After the Orgy

13

the Beaubourg Centre [aka, the Pompidou Center in Paris] showing the countdown in millions of seconds is the perfect symbol. It
illustrates the reversal of the whole of our modernity’s relation to
time. Time is no longer counted progressively, by addition, starting
from an origin, but by subtraction, starting from the end. This is
what happens with rocket launches or time bombs. (1997)

As Paglia has implied, the orgasmic model of history enjoys a profound hold over the Western imagination. The eternal jouissance of
polymorphous “female” sexuality is contrasted with that genitally
focused male “quickie” that lasts merely a millennium. However,
things are never as black and white as Paglia’s crude distinctions
imply. Ernest Lee Tuveson tells us that, in response to the prophet
Joachim, St. Thomas “concludes in effect that the Church is static,
as is history. No purposive change, no climax in a historical plot is
to be expected” (20). This edict would have suited the Adamites, an
heretical Christian sect that “sought to recapture in this life the
innocent eroticism of Adam before the Fall, [and] practiced coitus
reservatus, intercourse without orgasm, that is to say, pure forepleasure” (Brown, 1970: 30).
At this point I submit another extended extract, to be read
alongside Stephenson’s, as evidence for the prevalence of libidinal
millenarianism in Kermode’s “modern demythologized apocalypse”
(1975: 133). In this Internet newsgroup posting by a raver known
only as “Kitten”, we can see a miniaturized version of history’s
erotic deferral:
When i was at Organic recently, there was one point when the
music was just pumping i kept waiting for the “vibe” to hit,
because i wanted the place to explode with the ENERGY that
keeps everybody coming back for more. OH MAN, just thinking
about that energy gives me chills. But what happened was that
the dj . . . kept tweaking with the audience and bringing the climax *ALMOST* there and then bringing everyone back down. I
was absofuckinglutely out of my mind, i was near tears, all i wanted was the climax, i didn’t care what the fuck else happened. All
of a sudden i realized that it was similar to when you’re having sex
and for whatever reason, you can’t come and all you are doing is
FUCKING YOUR BRAINS OUT, exerting every ounce of brain
energy trying to make yourself come so that you have your orgasm
and go to sleep. That was how i felt on the middle of the dance
floor. And I realized that the dj had POWER over me. I was basically prostituting for the dj: i was a slave to what he had (the
promise of the climax) and he was flexing his power and tweaking
with me to see how much i could stretch myself out for it. It really scared me. I mean, it worked out okay, i’m not emotionally damaged or anything, i didn’t fall into pieces, actually right after it

Introduction

14

happened, i went and had a cigarette with my brother and pretty
much forgot about it), but every now and again, i think of that feeling, that split second where I would do anything for the dj to give
me that climax.
So, when I hear people talking about rave as religion, I just
want to put $.02 in and say that some religions are more cult than
religion, and i think some dj’s definitely hold the power of a cult in
their turntables and in their speakers, and it’s really not something that i want to get down on my knees for. Just a thought, I’m
not bagging here. I still think that rave is one of the best things
the 20th century has to offer, but i think that if left unchecked, it
could turn on us. (alt.music.techno April 19, 1996)

But as this techno-maenad testifies, what “could turn on us” is
what turns us on.

The Coming of the Lord

Q: What’s white and hangs off telephone wires?
A: The Second Coming.
Old School Joke
If therefore thou shalt not watch,
I will come on thee as a thief,
and thou shalt not know what hour I will come upon thee.
St. John’s Book of Revelation (3: 3)
So it is a matter of the secret and the pudenda.
Jacques Derrida (1984: 4)

Apocalyptic rhetoric, from the book of Daniel through John’s
Revelation to present-day adaptations, is saturated with sexuality.
Beginning with the allegorical Whore of Babylon and her violent
destruction, Eros and Thanatos have persistently stalked narratives of the End:
I saw a woman sitting on a scarlet beast, full of blasphemous
names, having seven heads and ten horns. And the woman was
clothed in purple and scarlet, and adorned with gold and precious

After the Orgy

15

stones and pearls, having in her hand a gold cup full of abominations and of the unclean things of her immorality, and upon her
forehead a name was written, a mystery, “BABYLON THE
GREAT, THE MOTHER OF HARLOTS AND OF THE ABOMINATIONS OF THE EARTH.” (Rev. 17: 15-16)
And he said to me, “The waters which you saw where the harlot
sits, are peoples and multitudes and nations and tongues. And the
ten horns which you saw, and the beast, these will hate the harlot
and will make her desolate and naked, and will eat her flesh and
will burn her up with fire.” (ibid.: 19: 2)

The sexual subject matter here makes explicit the usually obscured
erotic subtext of eschatological fables.
The word apocalypse derives from the Greek apokalupsis and
apo-calyptein, meaning to “uncover,” “unveil,” or “reveal”: hence
Revelation. In this sense the breaking of the Seven Seals anticipates a hymeneutic dance of the Seven Veils, choreographed around
the deferred promise of disclosure. In his essay on “An Apocalyptic
Tone Recently Adopted in Philosophy,” Derrida teases out the libidinous logic of Armageddon: “Apokalupto, I disclose, I uncover, I
unveil, I reveal the thing that can be a part of the body, the head or
the eyes, a secret part, the sex or whatever might be hidden . . .
man’s or woman’s sex” (4). He goes on to argue that “the gesture of
denuding or of affording sight . . . [is] sometimes more guilty and
more dangerous than what follows and what it can give rise to, for
example copulation” (5).
Leaving aside for the moment the voyeuristic aspect of libidinal millenarianism (which I return to in chapters 3 and 6), here I
wish merely to draw attention to the assumption that copulation is
a logical, or at least possible, consequence of striptease and/or
Revelation. Both follow the same highly ritualistic pattern. In this
context, even the smutty schoolboy joke that introduces this section
plays on those early millenarian myths that conflate—or rather recognize—the libidinal logic of apocalyptic prophecy.5
By exposing the sexualized subtexts and historical agendas
that lie curled within the apocalyptic tone, Derrida returns to the
metaphoric motif of ejaculation:
What effect do these noble, gentile prophets of eloquent visionaries want to produce? . . . . To seduce or subjugate whom, intimidate or make whom come? These effects and these benefits can be
related to an individual or collective, conscious or unconscious
speculation. They can be analyzed in terms of libidinal or political
mastery, with all the differential relays and thus all the economic
paradoxes that overdetermine the idea of power or mastery and
sometimes drag them into the abyss. (23)

16

Introduction

In revealing the innuendo concealed in one of prophecy’s keywords—come—Derrida inspires my own attempt to conduct a libidinal analysis of the political amplifications of apocalyptic thought
(or, alternatively, a political analysis of the libidinal amplifications
of apocalyptic thought).
In this respect Derrida further scatters the seeds of panic and
their consequent sociohistoric repercussions. He refers the reader
to the biblical scene in which the Christ-Lamb opens each of the
Seven Seals, one of the “four living” responding with the pronouncement, “Come.” In true deconstructionist fashion, Derrida
notes that “‘Come’ does not announce this or that apocalypse:
already it resounds with a certain tone; it is in itself the apocalypse
of apocalypse; Come is apocalyptic” (35).
The prophetic tone is thus analogous to the arrogant confidence of sexual mastery: “The end is soon, it is imminent, signifies
the tone. I see it, I know it, I tell you, now you know, come” (24). The
very vocal vibrations of certainty (“I am unveiling the truth”) solicit desires bound up inextricably with transcendence, rapture, and
orgasmic extinction. The petite mort of the individual is inflated to
include the entire human race teetering on the edge of oblivion. As
Derrida observes, “I am coming means: . . . We’re all going to die,
we’re going to disappear” (24-25).
There are, of course, exceptions to this somewhat pornographic interpretation, however these only serve to illustrate moral reactions against the already perceived libidinal tenor of Judgment
Day. Take this biblical passage, for instance:
Love not the world, neither the things [that are] in the world.
If any man love the world, the love of the Father is not in him.
For all that [is] in the world, the lust of the flesh, and the lust of the
eyes, and the pride of life, is not of the Father, but is of the world.
And the world passeth away, and the lust thereof: but he that doeth
the will of God abideth for ever. (1 John 2:15-17)

Echoing these sentiments in the sixth century, Gregory the
Great wrote; “Let us despise with all our being this present—or
rather extinct—world. At least let worldly desires end with the end
of the world; let us imitate what deeds of good men we can” (ibid. :
69-70). This is indeed an optimistic wish, considering the fact that
the liminal structure of premillennial time serves to privilege
nihilistic sexual license over the puritanical ideals of purity and
chastity. Neville Shute’s On the Beach (1956) is only one of countless representations of erotic excess in the Last Days; another being
St. Augustine’s observation that “as the end of the world approaches . . . infidelity increases” (Kumar 204).

After the Orgy

17

In the pages that follow I trace—in an almost dot-to-dot fashion—that dionysian genealogy that links Revelation and the
Romano-Greek myths of Pan, through the apocalyptic fantasies of
Sade and Nietzsche, to the Bataillean millennium unconsciously
mimicked by both mass and alternative medias of the 1990s.
However, any study that seeks to emphasize historical and philosophical continuities must also take into account the different conditions and assumptions that inform each context. For this reason
it is important to acknowledge the radical impact of technological
development on subjective experience and expression. By following
Martin Heidegger we can discern the telos of technology as yet
another form of apocalyptic unveiling.

Technological Revelation

The question concerning technology is the question concerning the constellation in which revealing and concealing, in
which the coming to presence of truth, comes to pass.
Martin Heidegger (33)
Technology is no longer an aid in the perfection of being, but
rather being is now an aid to the perfection of technology.
Theodore John Rivers (10)

Heidegger’s enormously influential essay, “The Question
Concerning Technology,” discusses the metaphysical status of technology as both the subject of history and the raison d’être of History
itself. He sees technology less as a sophisticated tool, than as the
name we give our propulsion towards a kind of quasi-mystical revelation of the Truth.
Heidegger goes on to unpack the ancient Greek notion of techné, that mode of “bringing-forth” into the world that transcends the
contemporary banality of “manufacture.” Techné is steeped in classical perspectives on the genesis of craftsmanship, which did not
polarize “craft” and “nature” to the extent that we do today. For this
reason, Monty Python’s “machines that go ping” are merely the latest in a long line of human artifacts shaped through the highly
nuanced constellation of skill, knowledge, and environment.
Technology is consequently rooted in Hellenic notions of materialization through revelation.

18

Introduction

“What has the essence of technology to do with revealing?”
asks Heidegger. “The answer: everything”:
Instrumentality is considered to be the fundamental characteristic of technology. If we inquire, step by step, into what technology,
represented as means, actually is, then we shall arrive at revealing. The possibility of all productive manufacturing lies in revealing. Technology is therefore no mere means. Technology is a way
of revealing. If we give heed to this, then another whole realm for
the essence of technology will open itself up to us. It is the realm
of revealing, i.e., of truth. (12)

As we have seen, the Heideggerean definition of technology is
not restricted to electrical hardware, but embraces any human
activity that incorporates a mode of revealing in relation to truth.
All of which begs the question, What kind of truth does technology
point us toward?
According to Heidegger, this truth rests on the destiny of the
human race, viewed in the Nietzschean neoclassical term destining.
Technology is thus an ontological compass, inscribed within the secular, nihilistic view of history: “[D]estining is never a fate that compels. For man becomes truly free only insofar as he belongs to the
realm of destining and so becomes one who listens and hears, and
not one who is simply constrained to obey . . . . The destining of
revealing is in itself not just any danger, but danger as such” (25-26).
The political subtext of Heidegger’s analysis has been commented upon exhaustively elsewhere, but here I would merely
observe that destining can be a code word for an existentially risky
route to transcendence, intimately linked with the messianic
attraction of Revelation. It is consequently problematic for those
who detect an inherent conservatism—even fascism—within narratives that “foreshadow” the future.
Thus, both Heidegger and—by retroactive association—
Nietzsche, stand accused of negating the potential freedoms of a
godless universe. In contrast to the existentialist school of thought,
Heidegger reinvents eschatology by practically deifying technology
(along with its hidden agenda). In a direct polemic against
Heidegger’s essay, Rivers explores the time-bound nature of technology, believing it has succumbed “to the Christianization of time”.
[T]hat is, it has adopted Christianity’s linear perception . . . .
Since [technology] is built on the premise that there will be
progress, it follows that we absolutely must be inclined toward its
successful conclusion. It tells us that there is no salvation unless
we side with technology because beyond its protection is damnation. Whereas Christianity’s idea of linearity moves on to a final

After the Orgy

19

and decisive end from which there is no appeal, conceptualized in
the Second Coming and the Last Judgment, technology’s concept
never reaches its end, since it is composed solely of means. (116)

Technology has “acquired Christianity’s notion of inevitability”
(115), an onto-theological ruse to rob humanists of their freedom to
alter and control the future. Thus according to Rivers, the danger
of destining is not (as Heidegger would have it) an incarnation of a
tragic “bringing forth” of “primal truth,” but rather the means by
which mortality is deprived of any meaning:
We experience time because we are aware of mortality. As for
death, it is also influenced by technology’s rationality, but negatively, because technology deprives death of meaning and robs it of
any significance as an eschatological condition. Technology distorts death so as to give it a new qualification. Although it cannot
disregard death as the termination of life, technology removes the
death of the individual from one’s own prerogative. The modern
age dares to sustain life, when on the verge of death, by machines;
it has the power to induce us to inhabit a body which is only technically alive. Life is prolonged not because we love it, but because
we love technology more, and perceive it as a life-giving force. Not
only have we cheated death of its meaning, but we have also
degraded life by refusing to let it go. (64)

All apocalyptic philosophies must acknowledge and respond to this
technological paradox—a secular eschatology merely unveils a void.
Eros and Thanatos must therefore permit a third term: Techné.
This addition turns the former dialectic into something of a love-triangle. According to the French sociologist, Michel Maffesoli, admitting a third term also represents the beginning of society, and
therefore, of all sociology—“infinity begins with the third person”
(1996: 105). It is my contention that, in the spirit of Roland Barthes’
Lover’s Discourse (1978) and D. H. Lawrence’s Women in Love
(1920), this third term is also the libidinal catalyst for a constellation formerly devoid of metaphysical momentum. In other words,
sex and death become recharged through technology. As the decadent writer Gabriele D’Annunzio maintains, “Love, like all divine
powers, is not truly exalted except in a trinity” (Praz 293). The construction of history as a ménage-à-trois, brings me full circle back
to Baudrillard’s post festum philosophy of the orgy.
In short, this book endeavours to do two things, which—like its subject matter (transgression and transcendence)—run parallel, touching at several points, and ultimately dissolving into each other. One
of its main aims is to trace the dionysian ambience of contemporary

20

Introduction

culture, while another is to weave different historical strands into
a pattern defined by libidinal millenarianism. It is the nature of
weaving not to reveal the full pattern immediately, but gradually,
although my own Revelation may not be as earth-shattering as its
subject and model: apokalupsis.
Geoff Waite maintains that “since temporal causal relationships” are often “less important than logical causal relationships, it
is necessary to cut away from all simple teleologies . . .” (95) In
order to establish a genealogy, then, I navigate between particularly distinct periods: Sade’s 1790s, J. K. Huysmans’s 1890s, the baby
boomers’ 1960s, and the period linking the held breath of the 1990s
to the tentative exhalation of the new millennium. When investigating a subject as complex as libidinal millenarianism, it is not
merely a matter of following a red thread sequentially through
time, but realizing that the footsteps of the genealogist become
caught up in this red thread as soon as the notion of causality is
introduced. “[T]o be concerned with the questions of postmodernity
is to be concerned with questions of temporality and sequence,”
writes Diane Elam. Since “cause and effect do not [necessarily]
keep their temporal sequence; the original is not located as the
‘source’ that precedes the derivation” (9). And yet it can be useful to
superimpose the diachronic onto the synchronic, if only to delineate
the ways in which we recount certain histories that make up our
imperfect understanding of the present. Accordingly, my research
consistently plugs into what Mark Kingwell has called “the intricate feedback loops of popular culture” (343); these findings are
then employed to reflect on his observation that “we appear to have
no way of coping with uncertainty about the future that transcends
the dichotomy between hope and dread” (166).
Chapter 1 focuses on the crucial notion of panic as an ubiquitous
libidinal-millenarian phenomenon, and explores the relationship
between sexuality, technology and image-addiction in movies such
as Cherry 2000 and Strange Days. Chapter 2 details the seminal
Dionysian writers Sade, Bataille, and Nietzsche, introducing and
defining their terms and key concepts within the context of my
argument. It also incorporates a section on their contemporary
adaption by more receptive and extreme elements of the academy.
Chapter 3 investigates the explicit association of Eros, Thanatos,
and technology in J. G. Ballard’s autoerotic equation: sex plus technology equals the future. Ballard’s novel Crash (1975) is then read
against its own revision in Stephenson’s cyberpunk thriller Snow
Crash (1993). Chapter 4 reads nineteenth-century notions of artifice as a precursor to such twentieth-century discussions of technology, and does so through the decadent classic A Rebours (1884)

After the Orgy

21

by J-K. Huysmans. Chapter 5 identifies the contraceptive pill and
the atomic bomb as two technological catalysts of the political, aesthetic, and literal orgy in the 1960s, and argues that this era was
far more “thanatical” than current nostalgia would have us believe.
Chapter 6 revolves around a reappraisal of Baudrillard’s works as
symptomatic examples of postorgy (and premillennial) tension.
This reading then informs my analysis of certain popular cultural
examples of the dionysian, including “rave culture,” “death fashion,” and other apocalyptic expressions of youth culture.
Pan, I conclude, is the goat in the machine, cavorting—like us
—in the miraculous clearing between the (always almost) apocalypse and the (always after) orgy. Libidinal millenarianism thus
blossoms in that psychically and politically charged space between
anticipation and anti-climax.

A Note on Methodology
From the outset I would like to apologize for coining such an
unwieldy phrase as libidinal millenarianism. Having spent the last
five years trying to eloquently introduce this concept to friends and
colleagues, I am only too aware of its capacity to glaze previously
receptive minds. Unfortunately, I have found no alternative that
does the concept justice, despite many public requests for a less
academic phrase. Erotic apocalypse, doesn’t quite capture the theoretical and historical overtones that I address, and aphrodisiacal
chiliasm is no better than the term I started with.
I should also note that, considering the enormity of a topic
like millenarianism, this book will inevitably be riddled with
holes. Many important individuals and schools of thought will go
unacknowledged simply because the field extends off into the
horizon. AIDS and the Shoah are two apocalyptic phenomena,
which have become such important components in discussions of
millenarianism that they now constitute separate disciplines.
While my study constantly engages with those forces that surround and produce these defining moments of the twentieth century, I have chosen to situate them “off stage,” as it were, in my
own story. The Holocaust and the HIV epidemic should be considered “structuring absences” which, at a later date, I hope to relate
more rigorously to my dionysian genealogy. (See James Berger’s
After the End [1999] for a sustained reading of the Shoah as
postapocalyptic trauma, and Richard Dellamora’s work on the
apocalyptic amplifications of AIDS.)

22

Introduction

Medieval heretical sects, such as the Cathars and the
Movement of the Free Spirit, would also belong in an exhaustive
exploration of libidinal millenarianism, as would the Dadaists,
Surrealists, and Situationists, to name only the most commonly
invoked avant-garde movements. Nor would a closer study of
Charles Manson and his particular modern brand of Saturnalia be
out of place in such a study. All these “cults,” however, have been
written about extensively elsewhere. (See especially Greil Marcus’s
Lipstick Traces [1993], Norman Cohn’s Pursuit of the Millennium
[1993], and Bernstein’s Bitter Carnival [1992].) They should not be
considered, however, the only possible “paths not taken,” as these
are potentially infinite.
The End of the World is a vast topic, and I do not pretend to
answer every question I raise concerning its traces and effects.
Indeed I would consider my work justified if it were to provoke different questions in the reader concerning symbolic models of completion or exhaustion as they relate to time, finitude, redemption,
and other related phenomena. Ready answers to such questions are
more characteristic of prophets than of analysts.
All academic labor is intrinsically hypertextual, in that it
results in a dialogue between writer and readers, who identify aporias, excesses, wrong-turns, and underdevelopments. The confluence of two such charged concepts as “the libidinal” and “millenarianism” provide coordinates for countless idiosyncratic interpretations. Each word brings with it the baggage of tradition, which we
would do well to remember when tackling—or even merely identifying—the issues involved. These traditions, however, divide and
multiply at a rapid rate the moment we attempt to locate the point
of intersection between “the libidinal” and “millenarianism.” The
same is true also of “Eros” and “Thanatos,” “transcendence” and
“transgression,” and “Apollo” and “Dionysus.” In other words, to
map libidinal millenarianism is a more fraught and subtle enterprise than merely juxtaposing Freud with Cohn, or Marx with
Kermode. As with the orgy itself, it is not always clear who is connected to whom.
Heidegger, Nietzsche, and Bataille provide indispensable
apertures into discussions about technology and transcendence.
That is why they define the contours of my argument. Had I decided to take a different tangent, the names could easily have been
Freud, McLuhan and Cioran; or Marx, Artaud, and Deleuze.
Nontraditional primary sources point the readers in new directions. In this respect, the testimony of a technomusic fan or cult
member can sometimes be as relevant and illuminating as a quotation from Marx or Freud. I am not conducting a philosophical
history of ideas, but sifting through a cultural palimpsest in which

After the Orgy

23

every perspective has as much weight as the next. I thus draw
from a heterogeneous array of sources in order to simultaneously
provide, and deconstruct, examples of political exhaustion. I have
endeavored to balance this synthetic approach with my own coherent commentary. The kind of criticism I am attempting, then, is
closer to cultural studies than to philosophy or history.
This orientation leaves me open to criticisms regarding a perceived neglect of “real” political, social, and economic issues. It
makes little sense, however, to adopt the valuable approach of Eric
Hobsbawm or David Harvey in a study that focuses on the symbolic (general) economy as opposed to the political (restricted) economy. Such an approach would not only fall outside the scope and concerns of this project, but blind me to the libidinal economies which,
to a significant extent, drive the political ones (although this can
lead to chicken-and-egg questions). After the Orgy zooms in on a
particular discursive response to globalization—the orgy itself, in
Baudrillard’s terms—which eschews rhetorical calls to acknowledging “reality.”
Similarly, this study deals with a particular kind of language;
one employed by, and addressed to, a certain kind of subjectivity and
demographic. Given the authors who constitute my particular
genealogy, it should be clear that this demographic is predominantly
white, male, American, or European; socially estranged; and economically privileged. As witnessed with the Heaven’s Gate cult, however, strict demographic delineations become blurred when dealing
with the shifting matrices of sexuality, technology, capital, and
desire.
One of the most seductive elements of dionysian discourse is
the way in which it critiques the assumptions on which powerful
“mainstream” institutions, such as the patriarchal family, are
based. As Peter Stallybrass and Allon White have shown, the carnivalesque has traditionally (and somewhat ironically) been championed by the bourgeoisie, who romanticize the “power of the people” as a kind of vicarious transgressive outlet. Libidinal millenarianism is both a specific strain of the carnivalesque and a revulsion
against it; as in the case of Huysmans or Heaven’s Gate. It is also
a form of decadent philosophy that appeals to a particularly jaded
(and admittedly ethnocentric) aesthetic sensibility. While I believe
that elements of this sensibility cut across gender, race, class, and
sexual orientation, it would take another five years to demonstrate
such a claim. We must, therefore, be mindful of the fact that whenever I say “we,” I am indulging in a linguistic shortcut that both
elides and conflates countless particularities, possibilities, and
actualities.
As such, this book represents a sustained attempt to under-

24

Introduction

stand the recurring motifs of eroticized extinction and irresponsible
heresy. Its concern is not to determine whether we are living literally or figuratively “after the orgy,” but rather to show why that
phrase resonates so powerfully in today’s public sphere. The very
notion of “libidinal millenarianism” is an attempt—almost literally,
virtually—to “flesh out” themes and concerns of the technological
sublime as it relates to the dionysian dynamic. If it were to truly
mirror its subject matter, this book would be a chaotic and cyborgian intervention; a frenzied, sensual, incoherent, irrational, and
rhetorical rubble. The constraints on form, however, testify to the
stubborn and pervasive reign of Apollo, whom dionysians ignore at
their peril.

1

Panic Merchants:
Prophecy and the Satyr

[T]here are strange Ferments in the Blood, which in many
Bodys occasion an extraordinary Discharge; so in Reason too,
there are heterogeneous Particles which must be thrown off
by Fermentation.
Anthony, Earl of Shaftesbury (14)
For where panic is, there too is Pan.
James Hillman (33)

The Greek god Pan is one of western culture’s most enduring and
ubiquitous trickster figures. Half-man, half-goat, Pan dwells in
forests and glades trying to seduce nymphs, despite his grotesque
demeanor. Born in Arcadia, he has thus become an icon for those
who lament the Fall into civilization.
Pan’s relationship to both Dionysus and Bacchus has become
so confused that it is now difficult to distinguish one from the other.
This is hardly surprising, considering their shared characteristics,
and their inherently fusional-orgiastic function within classical
philosophical and literary fables. As signifiers, “Dionysus” and
“Pan” are free-floating archetypes, confused through various interpretations—Friedrich Nietzsche’s being arguably the most influential. This is not necessarily a matter of historical blurring, but
rather a sign of the almost Rorschachian ambiguity of his metaphysical presence (or absence) in modern times. As a trickster figure, Pan continues to elude us, and to enthrall the imagination for
this very reason.
In her literary history of Pan the Goat God (published, significantly enough, in 1969), Patricia Merivale traces the evolution of

25

26

After the Orgy

this myth into the twentieth century. She concludes that his symbolic status as a sexual figure is “only a recent literary characteristic” (226), initiated by Robert Browning’s vision of Pan as lurking
within us, rather than roaming the landscape. This radical reassessment of Pan’s “essential” character forever altered our perception of
his mythical status. Consequently, the goat-god—rather like millenarianism itself—is “not exclusively sexual, but largely so” (90).
Beginning with Nietzsche’s question—“what does the union of
god and goat . . . really mean?” (226)—Merivale explores the general rekindling of interest in Pan during the previous fin de siècle,
categorizing different species of literary Pans, and identifying
genealogical overlaps between Pan and Dionysus. She reveals that
Nietzsche’s famous dialectic between Apollo and Dionysus had
many precedents, many of which placed Pan in the antagonistic
position. William Hazlitt, for instance, in his Lectures on the Age of
Elizabeth (1820), saw the contest between Pan and Apollo as a critical metaphor, given the “repeated claim that Apollo is envious of
his sweet pipings” (ibid.: 60). Lyly’s Midas (1592) states that “Pan
is a God, Apollo is no more!” (ibid.: 48), while Buchanan’s 1885
poem, “The Earthquake” proclaims,

Woe to the land wherein the Satyr reigns,
And Pan usurps Apollo’s throne!
(ibid.: 110)

There was an enormous resurgence of interest in Pan as an ideological icon at the beginning of the twentieth century. According to
E. M. Forster, the Pan-effect had not only continued but accelerated into the modern world, which is why in Howards End (1910)
“panic and emptiness” accompany the life of “telegrams and anger”
(ibid.: 190). Technology is thus identified as a compatible environment for the previously agrarian Pan.
Pan’s sardonic laugh was heard across the battlefields of
Europe by writers documenting that conflagration of
Enlightenment ideals by horrific technologies, the First World War.
Osbert Sitwell described the carnage allegorically: “‘Pan and Mars
had broken loose together and had set out to conquer the man who
wound and set the clocks that regulated civilized living” (ibid.: 221).
Here Pan is presented as an inherited blood-lust in an age of
mechanical production.
Indeed this guilt by association is directly connected to the literary motif of panic as a destructively sublime communion with the
Infinite. The undefined “mystical fright” of sensitive nineteenthcentury souls such as Fyodor Dostoevsky, prompted the emergence

Panic Merchants

27

of the medical condition of “Panophobia,” for which the popular
term would soon become panic attack (Nordau 226). Moreover, one
character in Arthur Machen’s “Man Who Went Too Far” (1912)
declares that “Pan means ‘everything,’ and to see everything would
be clearly more than one could stand. And so to see Pan means
death” (Merivale 168).
To feel the presence of Pan, therefore, means death and/or fulfillment. In fact this “and/or” provides the crucial pivot on which
libidinal millenarianism rests, ever-suspended between orgasm
and extinction. For if Gilles Deleuze and Felix Guattari are correct
in claiming that “it is by headlong flight that things progress and
signs proliferate,” then we can also concede that “Panic is creation”
(73). Moreover, such theoretical mobilizations serve to add an extra
dimension to Pan’s subtextual role in biblical accounts of the Last
Judgment, and specifically Matthew’s description of the division of
sheep from goats (Matt. 25.31-46).
Pan’s figural flexibility, therefore, is evidence of his catalytic
force. For it is he, according to such narratives, who is responsible
for the fire in the loins: the same loins that Norman O. Brown has
identified as the site of the Last Judgment. Those who succumb to
this libidinal fever are thus cast into the pit by the Christian God
whose chief adversary is variously named Satan, Pan, or Dionysus.
Ever since Plutarch recorded the story of the death of Pan (Moralia,
V 419), this deity has been invisible or “transparent,” in Jean
Baudrillard’s terms. Yet like various charismatic figures—God,
Nietzsche, and a steady stream of suicidal rock stars—Pan created
a power-effect that increased after his death: “Pan is dead: long live
Pan.” Consistently, Pan has been situated outside of and against
the Christian metaphysical tradition, yet parallel to it. If Nietzsche
had ever thought that Pan/Dionysus was dead, he would certainly
have believed that resuscitation was not only possible but imperative. In mythology, psychology, and philosophy, Pan lives on to
haunt the invisible membrane between sexuality and textuality.
Pan can be understood accordingly as having metamorphosed
into the flux and flow of language, and reincarnated in the notion
of “Pan-ic.” Indeed the very word panic expresses the contagious
spread of fear through the herd. In his eighteenth-century polemic,
“A Letter Concerning Enthusiasm,” the Earl of Shaftesbury
recounts an origin myth for this phenomenon:
We read in History that PAN, when he accompany’d BACCHUS in
an Expedition to the Indies, found means to strike a Terror thro’ a
Host of Enemys, by the help of a small Company, whose Clamors
he manag’d to good advantage among the echoing Rocks and
Caverns of a woody Vale. The hoarse bellowing of the Caves, join’d

28

After the Orgy
to the hideous aspect of such dark and desart Places, rais’d such a
Horror in the Enemy, that in this state their Imagination help’d
’em to hear Voices, and doubtless to see Forms too, which were
more than Human: whilst the Uncertainty of what they fear’d
made their Fear yet greater, and spread it faster by implicit Looks
than any Narration cou’d convey it. And this was what in aftertimes Men called a Panick. The story indeed gives a good Hint of
the nature of this Passion, which can hardly be without some mixture of Enthusiasm, and Horrors of a superstitious kind. (14-5)

Shaftesbury goes on to emphasize the “social and communicative” aspect of panic, before linking it specifically to religious manias:
One may with good reason call every Passion Panick which is rais’d
in a Multitude, and convey’d by Aspect, or as it were by Contact or
Sympathy. Thus popular Fury may be call’d Panick, when the Rage
of the People, as we have sometimes known, has put them beyond
themselves; especially where Religion has had to do. And in this
state their very Looks are infectious. The Fury flies from Face to
Face: and the Disease is no sooner seen than caught. (15)

Leaving aside the revolutionary potential of the “Rage of the
People,” we can acknowledge the viral rhetoric that depicts Pan’s
power. Shaftesbury’s crucial move is to link the prophetic function
of Pan with religion, and to remember that the pronouncement
recorded by Plutarch—“Pan is dead”—was a reaction to the perceived failure of the oracles after the birth of Christ. “Enthusiasm,”
for Shaftesbury, is a commodity peddled by “Vendors of Prophecy.”
Consequently, panic is “easy to be carry’d away with every Wind of
Doctrine, and addicted to every upstart Sect or Superstition” (28).
It would be hard to think of a more relevant comment in the era of
Waco, Heaven’s Gate, and the Japanese Aum Shinrikyo cult.
After locating the germs of panic in the imagination, Shaftesbury
goes on to describe the somatic signs of infection. In post-Freudian
times, these are easily interpreted as manifestations of sexual eruptions. As with certain mystical experiences, the fine line between
sacred and profane experience can be erased by the scorching fire of
passion. “I learn from holy Scripture,” Shaftesbury explains, “that
there was the evil, as well as the good Spirit of Prophecy. And I find
by present Experience, as well as by all History, Sacred and Profane,
that the Operation of this Spirit is every where the same, as to the
bodily Organs” (45). The spirit of Pan—described alternately as “the
Blaze” or “the Extasy”—is described in sexual terms: its outward
manifestations are “Quakings, Tremblings, Tossings of the Head and
Limbs, [and] Agitation.” When bodies are “labouring with
Inspiration,” “Eyes glow with the Passion” (45, 50) and breasts heave.

Panic Merchants

29

The Pan-effect thus continues in the form of the panic instinct.
In his monograph on Pan and the Nightmare, James Hillman
echoes Shaftesbury’s belief that Pan thrives best in the imagination. “Pan is still alive,” he writes, “although we experience him
only through psychopathological disturbances, other modes having
been lost in our culture” (1988;18). Since Pan never died (he was
merely repressed) he has been savoring the potential power of his
Return. This power leaks into culture via these psychopathologies,
most notably “the nightmare and its associated erotic, demonic and
panic qualities” (25).
By associating Pan with nightmares, Hillman evokes both an
explicitly Jungian unconscious and the Freudian theory of repression. If we are to believe the founders of psychoanalysis, and the subsequent absorption of their ideas into popular knowledge (especially
in the 1960s), then Pan shares this murky terrain with Eros. The
nightmares that emanate monstrously from the fertile excrement of
the unconscious are thus rooted in a suppressed sexuality and a primal sense of fear: “The poles of sexuality and panic, which can
instantly switch into each other or release each other, exhibit the most
crassly compulsive extremes of attraction and repulsion . . . . Pan,
as ruler of nature ‘in here,’ dominates sexual and panic reactions, and
is located in these extremes” (27—my emphasis).
In the 1960s, when the sexual revolution cannot be distinguished from the fear of nuclear Armageddon (as I shall argue in
chapter 5), the iconic resurgence of Pan signaled uneasy anxiousness as well as hedonistic promiscuity. Because “anxiety and desire
are twin nuclei of the Pan archetype” (31), it is impossible to determine which is cause and which is effect.
Symbolizing the paroxysm of erotic fear, Pan is the quintessential figure of libidinal millenarianism. Messianic figures from
Zoroaster to David Koresh are all indebted to the proleptic powers
of Pan. If it is true that “Apollo wheedled the art of prophecy” from
Pan (Graves 1960;102), we can appreciate the complicated role
played by Pan in apocalyptic discourses.
Because Pan is elusive as a symbolic figure or “metaphysical pattern,” he represents different concepts to different schools of
thought. All of them, however, connect his latent influence with the
vengeful power of “Nature.” In Tom Robbins’s novel, Jitterbug
Perfume (1990), Pan is portrayed as an almost transparent figure,
disappearing into the ether due to his archaic status in a modern
era. Nevertheless, this vanishing act does little to mask his musky
stench, which is still powerful enough to coax the libido out of even
the most prudish of souls. From Plutarch via Pascal to Robbins,
Pan is depicted as a casualty of civilization. Nevertheless, he man-

30

After the Orgy

ages to harness a kind of amorphous sexual power that challenges
the fragile laws of society.
In his weighty polemic against what he sees as the viruslike
influence of Nietzsche’s thought, Geoff Waite engages with the figure of Pan-Dionysus:
In Greek mythology and in the German intellectual tradition,
Dionysus is the proleptic god par excellence. He is “the coming
god,” not merely in the sense that his coming is anticipated in the
future—for example, every destructive-creative springtime—but
also in the strong sense that his primary attribute . . . is defined
in terms of coming and recoming, not actual arrival. The true
essence of the demigod consists in perpetually coming toward
humanity from the future but not necessarily ever arriving. (134)

This offers a crucial insight into libidinal millenarianism, relating
to both Jacques Derrida’s concern with the sexual undertones of
“coming” as an eschatological concept, and to the implicit identification of Pan with the apocalypse itself, as an end that never comes:
the always deferred Terminal Orgasm. Since Pan is the phallic
goat-god, it is no surprise that he can be appropriated by heterosexist narratives based on historical climax.
According to Hillman, Pan invented masturbation, which he
describes as “a way of enacting Pan” (36). Autoerotic activities are
also associated with the biblical figure of Onan, who was struck
dead by God for his nonprocreative (i.e., proto-Sadean) behavior.
Other than providing yet another fusion of sex and death, this
moral fable illustrates the matrix of “panic phenomena” whereby
the taboo is completed through transgression. By “enacting Pan”
we thus dissolve the distinction between the natural and the
(allegedly) unnatural.
The isolation of Des Esseintes in J.-K. Huysmans’s A Rebours
(1884), is a monastic-cum-onanistic response to the decadent orgy
articulated through the main character’s fondness for artifice. So
too was Nietzsche’s, whose falling out with high society is said to
have begun with Richard Wagner’s description of him as “an
onanist.” The solitary who surfs the Internet in search of porn is
also responding (albeit “positively”) to the orgiastic excess of a decadent society, expressed through technology. All these scenarios
speak of a hypermediated form of alienation.
Pan thus straddles both the instinct to survive (the “lust for
life”), and the “necro-porn” or “sacrificial sex” of certain romantic,
decadent, and postmodern subcultures. According to those scandalized by such behavior, the Apocalypse will surely come when
God decides to smite both the Onans and the libertines of our own

Panic Merchants

31

decadent Western society. Hillman asks why we expect prophecy to
“come with a long beard and a thunderous voice,” when it could
just as easily manifest itself as “a jet of desire” (53). Ejaculation
both mimics and mocks the coming of the Lord. But if Terence
McKenna is right, and “Western Civilization has shot its wad,”
then the apocalypse must have already happened.

The Goat in the Machine

There is something inherently subversive about taking all this
incredibly expensive technological equipment and putting a
naked woman on it.
Richard Kadrey in Wired for Sex
I felt really sad for the panic buttons, because panic seems like
such an outdated, corny reaction to all of the change in the
world. I mean if you have to be negative, there’s a reasonable
enough menu of options available—disengagement—atomization—torpor—but panic? Corrrrrrrrny.
Douglas Coupland, Microserfs

Cybersex is a thriving industry in the fin de millénium. The user is
able to interface with two-dimensional representations of his or her
(although usually his) fantasy, stroking the screen while “enacting
Pan.” Mark Kingwell explains that because new technologies mobilize sexual imagery in sophisticated advertising strategies, we now
“soothe ourselves with our candy substitutes. In erotica everything
is promised and nothing delivered; consuming it, we subsist on a
sugar diet of pure stimulated desire” (200).
This scenario was eagerly anticipated in the 1960s by Marshall
McLuhan, who believed that the electronic media had a pan-sensual potential for transfiguring sexuality in such a way as to make
“Henry Miller’s style of randy rutting old-fashioned and obsolete”
(Neville 70). While many would regard such obsolescence as wholly
positive, it has become increasingly clear that the old phallocentric
power structures have merely been encoded in the digital future.
Kadrey’s claim that there is something “inherently subversive” in
digital representations of female nudity rests on a severely compromised definition of subversion, for it fails to take account of the
adman’s exploitation of libido.

32

After the Orgy

Pixis Interactive is based in Silicon Valley, and is one of the
biggest producers of digital pornography (or erotica, depending on
how you see it). It releases computer games in which the lust-object
stares out from the screen and addresses players in first-person
mode. Such games are “interactive” because they offer players several options by clicking on a command linked to a particular operation (i.e., undress and turn around). One option, always available in
an erotic emergency, is the Panic Button.
Arthur Kroker—who affixes the word “panic” to any buzzword of the day—has described the apocalyptic effects of this
ultramodern technolorgy as panic sex, a term that maps the simulated terrain covered so thoroughly by Jean Baudrillard.
Perhaps Hillman, however, describes the situation most clearly:
“Let us say that the world of nature, Pan’s world, is in a continual state of subliminal panic just as it is in a continual state of subliminal sexual excitation. As the world is made by Eros, held
together by that cosmogonic force and charged with the libidinal
desire that is Pan . . . so its other side, panic . . . belongs to
the same constellation” (29-30).
As we have seen, this “continual state of subliminal excitation”
also saturates the technological. In millenarian terms (and I explore
this matter more thoroughly in chapter 3) the divine dwells inside or
alongside technology, so that artifice creates a new “metaphorical
pattern . . . incorporating anxiety and sexuality” (ibid.: 32).
According to Hillman, panic is not to be treated with Valium or
suspicion, because it is a natural—even ethical—response to the
technological sublime: “We must follow the path cleared by
Nietzsche, whose investigation of kinds of consciousness and behaviour through Apollo and Dionysus can be extended to Pan. Then
panic will no longer be regarded as a physiological defence mechanism . . . but will be seen as the right response to the numinous”
(30).
In William Gibson’s cyberpunk novel, Mona Lisa Overdrive
(1988), there comes a point when technological acceleration is
referred to as either the Rapture or “When it Changed.” Like a vacuum sucking in oxygen, the new realm of cyberspace attracts new
electronic deities, and the matrix finds itself populated by sentient,
even sacred, creatures. Gibson refers to these gods as the Loa, from
voodoo mythology. One could, however, propose Pan as the goat in
the machine—a lustful ghost-god, overseeing virtual orgies with
digital nymphs who are mere vapors of data.6
If Dionysus-Pan is indeed the proleptic god par excellence,
then we must take the next step and acknowledge his presence in
technological terms. “Prolepsis,” Waite tells us, “has also to do with
the mechanical reproducibility—fast-forward (anticipation) and

Panic Merchants

33

fast-reverse (memory)” (132). Pan is no longer the god of nature, but
of technology; or more accurately, the god of nature in technology.
Indeed, as I write, there is a World Wide Website known as “Pan’s
Online Grove”: dedicated to literary works inspired by the horny
one, it also sells T-shirts imprinted with his image. Thus Pan has
left the hidden spaces of both the forest and the psyche in order to
inhabit the shadows of cyberspace.
Michel Maffesoli has thought long and hard about the legacy of
Pan and its relation to both technology and sexuality. In The
Time of the Tribes (1996), he continues to work self-consciously
within “the Dionysian thematic,” celebrating the “panvitalism” of
the people. Maffesoli—who is “confident in the fact that certain
‘outdated’ considerations may be perfectly adequate to their
time” (2)—identifies an “organic” explosion of microgroups that
establish a creative and conflicting notion of the masses. His
faith in the future depends on the atavistic power of
Pan/Dionysus, which celebrates the “pagan fibre which . . . has
never entirely disappeared from the masses” (41).7 This tendency
to seek a carnivalesque continuity relates to a familiar millenarian motif, namely, an imminent transcendence spawned by the
orgiastic aura of “these closing days of the modern era” (1).
The lifeblood of Maffesoli’s Dionysian sociolorgy concerns those
mushrooming affinity groups that make up the social fabric of the
fin de millénium, from populist subcultures to elitist secret societies. Stressing the kinship between proximity and promiscuity, he
claims that such allegiances are at root erotic, and nurtured by a
shared space or territory, whether real or symbolic. “We have
dwelled so often on the dehumanization and the disenchantment
with the modern world and the solitude it induces,” he writes, “that
we are no longer capable of seeing the networks of solidarity that
exist within it” (72). Consequently, Maffesoli has no patience with
those theories of hyperalienation that are promoted by Baudrillard
and his disciples:
A tendency to see life as alienation or to hope for a perfect or
authentic existence makes us forget that daily routine is stubbornly founded on a series of interstitial and relative freedoms. As
has been seen in economics, it is possible to demonstrate the existence of a black-market sociality, which is easily tracked through
its diverse and minuscule manifestations. (21)

One such is the Minitel computer network in France, which,
by anticipating the veritable plague of Internet fever, qualifies as
one of Shaftesbury’s contagious enthusiasms. The Minitel was an
early electronic bulletin board, which allowed like-minded people

34

After the Orgy

to communicate across geographic frontiers. It was thus the latest
technological evolution—after the printing press, the telegraph
and the amplifier—capable of fostering a sense of community. By
creating a network that eluded governmental regulation (for a
time, at least) the Minitel anticipated Hakim Bey’s notion of a
Temporary Autonomous Zone: socialism with an interface. Both
Pan and Dionysus dwell in such a symbolic space, because
the growth in urban tribes has encouraged a “computerized
palaver” that assumes the rituals of the ancient agora. We would
no longer face the dangers, as was first believed, of the macroscopic computer disconnected from reality, but on the contrary, thanks
to the personal computer and cable TV, we are confronted with the
infinite diffraction of an orality disseminated by degrees. (25)

Technology is thus one of the key vectors of Maffesoli’s orgy, encouraging new articulations of the “social divine.”
Some of his claims are far-fetched: that we are moving from an
“optical” period to a “tactile” one, for instance, or that alternative
movements such as astrology and naturapathy are “in the process
of overturning the social configuration.” Nonetheless, the notion
that postmodern society is in some sense reinventing archaic values
is compelling. Tattooing, body-piercing, branding, scarification, and
other rituals of the “new primitivism” are spectacular manifestations of such cyberatavism. Whether experienced on the street or in
books like Adam Parfrey’s Apocalypse Culture (1990), the subliminal Pan-ic of the “popular-secular apocalyptic” can hardly be
denied. Indeed, only those who have not witnessed the ecstatic ritual of the “rave” could dismiss Maffesoli’s prophecy that the “confusion of the dionysian myth has produced significant effects of civilization,” and that perhaps “our megalopolises are the site of their
rebirth” (129). Fleshing out this insight into our neo-decadent period, Maffesoli sees evidence of a spiritual renovation in
beaches crammed with holiday-makers, department stores
thronged with howling consumers, riotous sporting events and the
anodyne crowds milling about with no apparent purpose. In many
respects, it would seem that Dionysus has overwhelmed them all.
The tribes he inspires demonstrate a troublesome ambiguity:
although not disdaining the most sophisticated technology, they
remain nonetheless somewhat barbaric. Perhaps this is a sign of
postmodernity. Be that as it may, the principle of reality, on the
one hand, forces us to accept these hordes, since they are there,
and on the other, urges us to remember that time and again
throughout history it was barbarity that brought many moribund
civilizations back to life. (28)

Panic Merchants

35

Maffesoli’s attraction/repulsion concerning “the masses”
exhibits the patronizing nostalgia that marks this particular school
of thought from Baudelaire to Baudrillard. And like the latter,
Maffesoli preempts allegations of snobbery by stating that although
“the founding being-together may never in fact have existed . . .
it remains nevertheless the nostalgic basis” of his inquiry (128129). That the aristocratic elitism of the nineteenth-century fin de
siècle could mutate into the anarchic populism of the 1990s—and
still retain a direct lineage – is one of the historical wonders of millenarian scholarship.
As a timely negotiation between the archaic and the futuristic,
The Time of the Tribes almost succumbs to a sentimental form of
utopianism. It believes that the mortal fragility of the orgy provides
the key to social behavior, unlocking “a sign of the future in that
which is ending” (78). This vision of the future as a “succession of
‘presents’” not only preoccupied Friedrich Nietzsche’s Zarathustra,
but has also inspired popular culture’s nihilistic energy from the
Ranters to the punks. Moreover, Maffesoli’s project consistently
hinges on the “ambience of the moment” (145), prompting the question, “Does not each great caesura in human evolution—revolution,
decadence, and the birth of empire—see the rise of an array of new
lifestyles?” (96). The surfeit of new subcultures that emerged in the
1990s certainly suggests that culture is evolving according to some
kind of dionysian directive. The question is, toward what?

This page intentionally left blank.

2

The Rapture of Rupture

[H]uman beings are aware that they will die. In that awareness, humans are always in the process of dying—whether
denying or accepting—because they can imagine the end. A
human death is an imagined death.
David Chidester (ix)
Transcendence is both real and impossible, as is the
human race.
Nick Land (143)

Before we contemplate life “after the orgy,” however, we must look
at the orgy itself, or at least those whose rhetoric was orgiastic.
The Marquis de Sade, Georges Bataille, and Friedrich Nietzsche
constitute a canon for any libidinal genealogy located within historical philosophy. Their works help to define many pivotal terms,
while simultaneously tracing the discursive boundaries that
encircle millenarianism. To review some of their core concepts is
therefore to understand not only the ideological “pollution at the
source,” as it were, but also the many mutations their ideas have
undergone during their crooked journey to the popular culture of
today. As a consequence, we should familiarize ourselves with
three distinct, yet interrelated concepts, in order to understand
the isomorphic relationship between sexuality (Eros) and endtime scenarios (Thanatos): Sade’s death of God, Bataille’s eroticism, and Nietzsche’s Dionysus. I shall go through each in turn.
Transgression and transcendence, are two common responses to a
perceived threat of the End of the World. Western millenarianism
is largely the history of interactions between these two philosophi-

37

38

After the Orgy

cal strands. Each attempt to renegotiate and surpass limits, particularly the “ultimate limit” of death. Transgression aims to overcome the limit by crashing through it, perhaps perishing in the
process, whereas transcendence seeks to rise above the limit while
remaining intact. In his cross-cultural study of Patterns of
Transcendence, Chidester notes that concepts of transcendence
“always appear in relation to the human limit situation of death,
but they approach that limit in remarkably different ways. Limit
is an interesting word. From a Latin word limen meaning wall,
door, or threshold, the limit of death may appear as a wall that
blocks any progress, as a door to open, or as a threshold to cross
into another world” (1990: xi).
Chidester goes on to identify one particular strategy as “experiential transcendence,” which attempts to reconcile being and notbeing by incorporating death into life: “Either through acceptance
or ecstasy—that is, through profound and often intense experiences
of rising above death while still alive—experiential transcendence
may appear as a kind of rehearsal for death” (ibid.). If the metaphor
of “rising above” is temporarily removed from this definition, then
transcendence turns out to bear an uncanny resemblance to what
is often portrayed as its opposite: transgression.
Georges Bataille’s definition of eroticism—“assenting to life up
to the point of death” (1986: 11)—could also serve as a general definition of transgression, for it provides a common thread that binds
his own writings to those of Nietzsche and Sade. These three
thinkers seek an ultimate affirmation in a universe perceived as
indifferent, or even hostile, to human existence in general and personal identity in particular. Traditionally they have been framed as
negative thinkers who write against God, against Nature, and
against prevailing moral systems. According to Michael Foucault,
however, transgression is an affirmative gesture that “must be liberated from the scandalous or subversive, that is, from anything
aroused by negative associations” (1977: 35).8 The individual projects of Sade, Nietzsche, and Bataille transcend this negativity by
spilling over into an ecstatic embrace of both life and death, which
Nietzsche calls “No-doing and Yes-saying.”
By transgressing the laws of nature and society, Bataille,
Nietzsche, and Sade seek to create a philosophy that transcends the
fate that condemns individuality to a life-sentence of sentience.
This is a more complex maneuver than at first appears, for there is
no smooth progression from transgression to transcendence. These
two impulses do not run parallel like Eros and Thanatos, snaking
together at multiple moments like a DNA coil. Rather they run perpendicularly, intersecting only at one crucial point, namely, that
end point where rupture spills over into rapture.

The Rapture of Rupture

39

On the face of it, transgression and transcendence are diametrically opposed. For if the transgressive engages actively with the
physical world (through symbolic inversion), the transcendent is
comparatively passive in relating to the physical world only
through symbolic aversion. Quintessential examples would contrast Sade’s libertine in blood-drenched ecstasy with the evangelist’s rapturous believer ascending to heaven. Both, however, are
ecstatic moments, incorporating a sense of vertigo experienced as
psychic hemorrhage. Both are thus forms of Chidester’s “experiential transcendence.”
The mystical writings of Saint Theresa of Avila provide an
excellent example of the point at which transcendence and transgression not only display certain similarities but actually exchange
fundamental properties: “In his hands I saw a long golden spear
and at the end of the iron tip I seemed to see a point of fire. With
this he seemed to pierce my heart several times so that it penetrated to my entrails. When he drew it out I thought he was drawing them out with it and he left me completely afire with a great
love for God” (Bataille, 1986: 224).
These two impulses bubble to the surface most visibly and violently in the radically unstable space of the erotic. As Freud
hypothesizes in relation to civilization’s discontent (1962), an eroticized death is the shadow that mocks our more noble efforts, and
indeed may even spell the end of all of our endeavors.
The three authors I focus on in this chapter—Sade, Nietzsche and
Bataille—all exemplify “heterotopic” or transgressive writing.
Simon During argues that such a discursive mode rejects traditionally “stable” or “realistic” textual codes in order to “clear an ideological space: a space for action, experimentation, chance, freedom,
mobility” (7). By celebrating the base materialism of the body
against the spirituality of the soul or mind, transgressive writing
seeks to explode those orthodox notions of coherence and consistency that run in tandem with humanist narratives. Fragmentation
and rupture are privileged above unity and rapture. Contradictions
are reconciled, but not through the patient route of logic or dialects.
Instead they either undergo a dionysian unification through violent
fusion, or else remain unreconciled like pieces of broken glass to
slash curious but unprepared readers.
This is why Sade’s writings can tolerate glaring inconsistencies.
At one moment, in his book Philosophy in the Bedroom, Dolmance
tells Eugenie, “your body is yours and yours alone, and only you
have the right to use it as you see fit” (1995: 53); later he will tell
her, “your sex can never serve Nature better than when it prostitutes itself to ours” (116). In the space between such inconsistencies

40

After the Orgy

are forged the possibilities of the heterotopic text, including the
possibility of its own imminent collapse.
Nietzsche, Sade, and Bataille share a hatred of Christianity
and “the gnostic desire to escape the loathed body” (Weiss, 130).
They also share an urgent interest in the “libidinal economy”—the
symbolic and political “science of drives” (Land 30) which they
hoped would soon break Christianity’s choke-hold over the Western
mind. They not only perceived, but consciously and actively fueled,
the sense of an ending.
They differed, of course, on details of the impending collapse.
Nietzsche and Sade believed in a spiritual caste system for men
who were marked for greatness and superiority, whereas Bataille
remained relatively faithful to his more democratic Marxist leanings. Nietzsche never wrote pornography, whereas Sade and
Bataille did so tirelessly. Sade tried to say everything in an encyclopedic compulsion, whereas Nietzsche and Bataille believed the
essential to be ultimately unsayable. And Bataille, at times,
strayed toward the mystical, whereas Sade and Nietzsche saw such
tendencies as symptomatic of a weak mind. Nevertheless, to compare the transgressive strain in their writings provides an opportunity to unbandage that festering area where the scatological
resides within the eschatological.

Sade and the Death of God

There is no better way to know death than to link it with
some licentious image.
Marquis de Sade (Bataille, 1986: 11)

In “A Preface to Transgression” (1977), Foucault traces a direct link
between the writings of Sade, the “death of God” and the formation
of “sexuality” in the official languages of modernity. He explains
that the excesses of the Divine Marquis were designed to provoke a
God who was either nonexistent or too pathetic to respond. When
Newtonian models of scientific inquiry began to erode the moral
panopticon of an all-seeing, vengeful deity, Sade took it upon himself to explain that human behavior was now “liberated.” As
Foucault notes, “the death of God does not restore us to a limited
and positivistic world, but to a world exposed by the experience of
its limits” (32-33). Through excess we discover “that sexuality and

The Rapture of Rupture

41

the death of God are bound to the same experience.” Eroticism, for
Foucault at least, is this “experience of sexuality which links, for its
own ends, an overcoming of limits to the death of God” (ibid.). The
loss of subjectivity in ecstasy and sexual rapture thus becomes confused with the philosophical loss of sovereignty in the death of God.
Civilization rests on a rigorous separation of the human from
the natural domain. The incest taboo is often cited as the universal
constitutional organization of culture (see especially Claude LéviStrauss’s Elementary Structures of Kinship). We must therefore
remind ourselves of the oxymoronic nature of the term human
nature, since it is “precisely the unnatural which is particularly
human” (Weiss, 1989: 43). To consolidate human community and
communication we rely on the supernatural: a sacred communion.
By removing the theological crutch of religion, Sade’s creed first
exposes the complicity between immortality and morality, and then
replaces it with mortality and immorality.
As a consequence of Sade’s deicide, and the resulting psychosocial revolution, transgression becomes a game of not only
crossing limits but of constituting new ones. After God’s funeral we
are in virgin epistemological territory, having buried transcendental guarantees of individual sovereignty in the same coffin (along
with the “limit-condition” that he represented). Hence, any discussion of transgression necessarily revolves around the twin-pin of
Nature and the Sacred.
Sexuality is our most obvious substitute for the spiritual loss
that flows from what Salman Rushdie once referred to as our “godshaped hole.” In addition to psychoanalytic notions of primal lack we
must now suffer another, perhaps even more unbearable absence,
for which we have only ourselves to blame (or thank, depending on
your perspective). By killing God we also murder that divine part of
ourselves that hitherto identified us as uniquely human. Thus, sexuality—or at least the language of sexuality—rushes into this new
abysmal space like air into a vacuum. In this sense, Sade’s horrific
compositions trace the outline of God’s absence like chalk scrawled
on the pavement at the scene of the crime.
Transgression consists of “profanation in a world which no
longer recognizes any positive meaning in the sacred” (ibid.: 30).
Sade can delight in such expletives as “Black Christ Vomit!” at the
moment of orgasm, even though only a few pages earlier he had
claimed that blasphemy holds no intrinsic value, “since there is little use defiling the name of a God who now has ceased to exist” (94).
The Supreme Being, however, retains the power to be reevoked and
defiled in the interests of the pleasure of transgression, because he
represents “those ultimate boundaries of religion, propriety,
humaneness and virtue” (ibid.: 71—my emphasis). Sade’s virulent

After the Orgy

42

nihilism is thus an active negation of the moral manipulation of the
sacred, and is thereby implicated with (organized) religion by association. Such complicity leads Land to conclude that “Sade’s writings are baked to charcoal in the sacred” (145).
Transgression is parasitic in nature. It needs limits in order
to exist, for to exceed them is its raison d’être. Like a shooting
star, it burns intensely for a moment and then extinguishes itself.
Such a concept is obviously open to romantic interpretation—an
allegation to which Nietzsche and Bataille are vulnerable.
However, there is no time or place for transgression on the other
side of the limit, since it is born and dies in that moment of rupture-rapture. In Foucault’s words, the unbearable finitude of
transgression “consumes and consummates us” (1977: 49). As a
consequence, transgression defines itself against traditional
metaphysical or Christian notions of transcendence that seek
serenity inside infinity. Put simply, the transgressive philosopher
has no faith in any “afterlife.”
Foucault explains that “the limit and transgression depend
on each other for whatever density of being they possess: a limit
could not exist if it were absolutely uncrossable and, reciprocally,
transgression would be pointless if it merely crossed a limit composed of illusions and shadows” (ibid.: 34). Sade understood this
relationship when he stated that “there is nothing that can set
bounds to licentiousness . . . [for] the best way of enlarging and
multiplying one’s desires is to try to limit them” (Bataille, 1986:
48). Freedom thus becomes the liberty to impose one’s own limits
and to enjoy their provocative charge. The libertine is like the
writer, for both thrive on restrictions. The libidinal landscape
inhabited by desire could not function as such if it were horizonless. Freedom in a vacuum is impossible, whereas freedom in a
void is merely meaningless.

Avoiding the Void

Nature has endowed each of us with a capacity for kind feelings: we should not squander them on others.
Dolmance (Sade 48)
If you want to use all created beings, you have the right to do
so; for every creature that you use, you drive up into its Origin.
Heresy of the Free Spirit (Cohn, 1993: 179)

The Rapture of Rupture

43

It is difficult to reconcile the concept of virulent nihilism with the
religious anticipation of a Last Judgment or Kingdom of God. Indeed,
Linda Grant’s study, Sexing the Millennium, rests on the premise that
“libertinage is the antithesis of millenarianism” (1993: 39). For Grant
libertines realize that “only through the body’s pleasure can we feel,
experience and be,” and consequently they are prepared “to cross
every known sexual frontier out of a kind of existentialism, an egotism
that makes them believe they are separate from the rest of humanity” (ibid.). This distinction, however, fails to account for the multivalent properties of “end-pleasure,” and its proven capacity to attach
itself to a variety of different ideological positions. Libertinage, and
specifically Sade himself, represents the point at which millenarianism adapts itself to modernity by turning itself inside out while
retaining its basic shape—all under the guise of a secular rationality.
In Philosophy in the Bedroom (one of his most “accessible”
texts), Sade juxtaposes theory and practice, pleasure and pain, sex
and death, and transgression and transcendence in a narrative that
is at once didactic and subversive. The innocent and malleable
Eugenie is initiated into libertine ethics and aesthetics by the experienced Dolmance, who teaches her the violent consequences of a
nonexistent God. Dolmance explains that “virtue is just an illusion
whose worship causes perpetual suffering in countless transgressions of true desire. I ask you: can such denials be natural? Would
Nature truly advocate that which offends her?” (38).
Nature is a complex code word in Sade’s semiotic system. In its
most obvious and superficial sense, “nature” functions as a replacement for the deceased Christian God, and is equally wrathful in
demanding human obedience. Conversely, “nature” functions as yet
another norm or law to pervert. This is the paradoxical dynamic of
Sade’s philosophy, and its unresolved energy powers the libidinal
piston of his excess. As Allen S. Weiss points out, “Nature is that
which must be transgressed in order to affirm one’s humanity, one’s
sovereignty; yet that nature can never be transgressed, since we
are part of it—an impossible dialectic” (1989: 45).
The most common libertine argument against existing social
mores is that they transgress the Law of Nature. Sexual excess can
thus be justified as the transgression of a transgression (which,
according to the laws of a double negative, cancels itself out). Sade’s
concept of Nature, however, functions as a philosophical Trojan
Horse in which to conceal his own missives against Nature; for as a
consistently transgressive thinker, he abhors all external laws,
including Nature’s. Sade would certainly have appreciated
Nietzsche’s rhetorical question: “for how should man force nature to
yield up her secrets but by successfully resisting her, that is to say,
by unnatural acts?” (1956: 61).

44

After the Orgy

However, Sade’s valorization of Nature has little in common
with the philanthropic romanticism of a Jean Jacques Rousseau or
Wilhelm Reich.9 On the contrary, since he emphasizes the malevolent agenda of Nature’s seemingly insatiable appetite for destruction. “Her” hidden agenda is thus revealed to Eugenie during
Dolmance’s enthusiastic defence of sodomy:
How absurd to say that this mania offends Nature, when she originates it! Would she ordain an action that offends her? Never! . .
. Propagation persists due to her tolerance. Would she make law
an act that threatens her omnipotence, given that propagation is
just a consequence of her primary aims, and that if our race met
with annihilation she would cast new creations of primordial
intent, whose perfection would be so much more flattering to her
pride and power? (66)

Madame De Saint-Ange replies; “Can you know, Dolmance, that by
this system you could prove that the total destruction of the human
race is nothing more than a service to Nature?” (ibid.).
By interpreting Nature’s “primary aim” as destruction rather
than creation, Sade calls the bluff of a tradition based firmly on
anthrocentric optimism. Hence, in a passage that anticipates the
more radical views of today’s environmentalists, Dolmance says;
Esteeming ourselves the highest creatures in the universe we stupidly assume that every hurt endured by so sublime a being must
thus be cataclysmic; we have believed that Nature would perish if
our magnificent species happened to cease to exist; in fact, total
annihilation of that race would, by returning from our trust the
creative power lent to us by Nature, reinvigorate her . . . what
does she care if the human race is wiped from the Earth? (76, 128)

Such opinions help us to gauge the extent of Sade’s antihumanism. Far from contributing to the Enlightenment project, Sade
is determined to diminish our species’ status as the apex of evolution and as Nature’s most noble creation. In his book, Juliette, Sade
introduces a fictional Pope who dispenses this advice: “So rend
away, hack and hew, torment, break, wreck, massacre, burn, grind
to dust, melt . . . . Unable to please her [Mother Nature] by the
atrocity of a global destruction, at least provide her the pleasure of
local atrocity” (Airaksinen 63).
Although Sade is commonly portrayed as an isolated or
unprecedented monstrosity, his inverted ethical system can be
detected in the teachings of the medieval Free Spirit, which
emerged in Europe half a millennium before the marquis. The central doctrine of this heresy was the sovereignty of the self. Allowing

The Rapture of Rupture

45

one to behave like a god, it led to proto-Sadean maxims such as this:
“It would be better that the whole world should be destroyed and
perish utterly that a ‘free man’ should refrain from one act to which
his nature moves him” (Cohn, 1993: 178). Cohn describes this seminal form of nihilism as “an entirely convincing picture of an eroticism which, far from springing from a carefree sensuality, possessed above all a symbolic value as a sign of spiritual emancipation” (ibid.: 150-151). Sade experienced that emancipation only
through his writings.
In provocative contrast to the most basic of civilized ideals,
Sade thus asks; “Who could deem our race so important that anyone
failing to seek its continuance is a common criminal?” (128). It is not
surprising that disciples of the Free Spirit were executed as
heretics, and that Sade was incarcerated by both sides of the political spectrum, for no philosophy of the social can tolerate the recommendation to “form or destroy as thou wilt at thy ease,” because
“tomorrow’s sun shall rise just the same” (65). Sade’s utopia is society’s dystopia, a hellish no-place that contests both nature and culture.
Sade thus unmasks human hubris, whether directed toward
God (metaphysics) or Nature (physics). Both forces are vengeful,
and ultimately destroy their own creations. In a chilling precursor
to the personal apocalyptic agenda of today’s extreme millenarians,
Dolmance insists that “we are but the blind instruments of her
impulses; were she to bid us set fire to the very universe, our only
possible crime would be in not obeying” (181).
Sade realized (long before Charles Darwin, Nietzsche, and
Jean Paul Sartre) the consequences for human freedom if God
turned out to be an illusion. For if so, we would be liberated from
the abstract but vengeful justice of the Last Judgment. After the
death of God, our experience of the world becomes profoundly finite
and mortal. And yet our sovereign mandate is to “appropriate the
organic flow” (Nuttall 72). A fleeting transcendence is therefore possible, according to Sade, but only through playing god ourselves, in
a solipsistic process of objectification, violation and transgression.
In his study Of Glamor, Sex and De Sade, Timo Airaksinen
reminds us of Sade’s influence on so-called decadent literature, in
that his “ethics and utopian speculations can be understood as a
rebellion against nature from within, by means of artificial constructions” (1991: 56):
Pleasure, which is nature’s vengeance, is transformed into reaction towards nature: the intolerably uncontrollable sensual irritation is directed against innocent victims via pain and mental
anguish. But this presupposes mastery over what is natural. The
result is a skillfully built artificial world . . . . The human devel-

46

After the Orgy
opment is from scavenger to avenger to predator. It leads from
shit, through murder and torture, towards orgasms. Coprophilia,
necrophilia, and nothingness illustrate the three stages of man’s
cosmic fate. (50)

Pleasure is thus “a cycle of sensual, cerebral and orgasmic stages,
where the middle point is artificial and thus independent of nature”
(47). Sade is dependent on morality (and ultimately “the natural”)
because he needs such constraints in order to transgress them. His
orgies are not chaotic explosions of Eros, but highly stylized and
organized arrangements that often end in death. Desire becomes a
mechanical product. “If sexual activity mirrors the chaos of true
nature,” observes John Walker, “Sade’s libertines proceed to render
the act distinctly un-natural, each Dionysian transgression generating more Apollonian verbalizing.” Or as Bataille succinctly puts
it, Sade “starts from an attitude of utter irresponsibility and ends
with one of stringent self-control” (1986: 174-175).
Sade’s pleasure is thus circular and temporary, for “after its consummation nothing remains” (Airaksinen 90). The transcendence
achieved by the marquis’s monstrous characters occurs inside, and
not beyond, the shattered limits (ibid.: x). In stark contrast to the
Bible, Sade’s writings do not teach us how to avoid the void, but rather
how to revel in it: “shower my smoking heart with wilder perversions;
then witness how I hurl myself headlong into the abyss!” (123).
Sade’s most fundamental premise rests on humanity’s ambiguous
relationship to Nature, as both its “blind instrument” and conscious
perverter. As his Juliette says, “Man is in no wise Nature’s dependent . . . [but] her froth, her precipitated residue” (Walker). Herein
lies our alienation, that is, our consciously mediated relationship
with its unconscious rhythms. Anticipating Bataille’s definition of
eroticism, Dolmance asks, “are we not born solitary, isolated?” (138).
In Sade’s writings, however, the gulf that separates one person from
an other effectively breaks any emotive or moral conductivity
between human beings. Pity, compassion, and empathy are illusions
imposed in the interests of social unity and Christian hegemony.
From this Sade derives his basic ethical tenet: “why then should we
go easy on an individual who feels one thing while we feel another?”
(96).
This solipsistic philosophy is capable of absorbing even the
shock waves of homicide by interpreting such an act as merely fulfilling the wishes of Nature. Imagine a defense lawyer trying to convince a jury that “murder does not destroy; he who commits it merely alters forms, giving back to Nature those elements from which
that skilled artisan instantly sculpts other beings” (76). Again we

The Rapture of Rupture

47

see the nexus between mortality and morality. Since there is no God
to condemn and punish, there is no reason to refrain.
In contrast to the homogenizing or (ultimately) democratizing
tendencies of Nature, however, Sade’s textual universe sustains a
hierarchy headed by the libertine. For while Sade suggests that we
should mimic the destructive forces of nature, he offers an escape
route for those who believe that such an ethic should not be turned
against themselves: “if a person understands the meaning of the
principle correctly, he can destroy without being destroyed. In this
way the principle offers a justificatory argument for the wicked person, and shows him a way out of the maelstrom of meaningless suffering and death” (Airaksinen 53).
This “way out” (which, incidentally, is the motive behind all
millenarianism, whether or not it is explicitly libidinal) is the point
where transgression spills into transcendence, and—just as importantly with Sade—vice versa. “Perhaps the most important lesson
to learn,” writes Airaksinen,
is that pleasure must be understood as transcendence, as the
crossing of limits so that one enters the void where all is permissible, nothing matters, and nothing can be achieved. Only through
crime is transcendence transformed into transgression, the feeling
of the total void . . . . Ethics is not concerned with such a void;
on the contrary, it is concerned with a careful redefinition of
things, and their social control . . . . Good aims are well-defined,
and therefore [to Sade] they are not worthwhile. Evil things, on
the other hand, are incomprehensible, and thus are pleasant like
orgasm, or the jump into the void. (67—my emphasis)

Libertinage is accordingly for Grant, “an erotic politics for the
end of a millennium when you believe that there will not be another thousand years . . . . It leads to death; why not? Everything
else does” (39). This explains why, in our age of AIDS, terrorism and
nuclear weapons, the writings and (usually diluted) practices of the
“divine marquis” are enjoying a renaissance in the Western metropolis. Absence of faith in the existence and durability of a person’s
soul is all that distinguishes Sade from traditional millenarians.
Airaksinen agrees that “the Christian flagellant . . . is not far
from the Sadean libertine. Both reach for personal transcendence
through pain and blood. Both also deny the necessity of the mediating role of the church between themselves and their God” (176).
Sade thus seeks a deeper truth in the orgasm, which—when
combined with murder—inflates the petite mort into a grande mort.
Witness Eugenie’s oft-echoed climactic cry, “I can bear it no longer!
Ah, I’m dying!” or Dolmance’s less decorous, “Christ’s shit, I perish!
I expire! The graveworms chitter through” (34, 111). By the end of

48

After the Orgy

the narrative, Eugenie shows that she has been indoctrinated completely into libertinism by announcing her orgasm with the words,
“that’s it, I’m annihilated” (151). Land insists that “the little death is
not merely a simulacrum or sublimation of a big one,” but rather “a
corruption that leaves the bilateral architecture of life and death in
tatters” (191). Within such libidinal blueprints we discern the “particular scaling of death that is close to Sade, a numerical hypertrophy that tips orgy into massacre” (ibid.: 194).
Sade’s elitism also sanctions his basic distinction between libertine-master and innocent victim. Death is experienced only vicariously by the former, through the murder of the Other. If, as Land
believes, the only possibility of redemption is through self-annihilation (15), then the libertine privileges survival above ultimate transcendence. In Bataille’s language, the Sadean subject clings to his
discontinuity. The libertine’s orgasm—despite Land’s lyrical assertion to the contrary—is only a simulation of death, and thus conforms to the trajectory of the “thanatic asymptote.”

Eroticism and the Thanatic Asymptote

Eroticism is in time what the tiger is in space.
Bataille (1988: 11–12)

The works of Bataille take their cue from the work of the Marquis
de Sade, often reading like sustained footnotes to the libertine challenge. Pornographic literature (or “pornology” as Deleuze prefers)
was favored by these compatriots as the most appropriate medium
in which to express the horrors of existence, especially those that
modernity consistently attempts to either obscure or exorcise. A significant portion of their work explores and strengthens links
between the “little death” of orgasm and the “big death” of the
organism, for both agree that “we can only reach a state of ecstasy
when we are conscious of death or annihilation, even if remotely”
(Bataille, 1986: 267).
Although the philosophical meridian-shadow of Freud separates their respective writings, they share an obsession with the
death-drive and its expression in erotic encounters. Sade would certainly support Bataille’s claim that “the feeling of elemental violence
. . . kindles every manifestation of eroticism. In essence, the
domain of eroticism is the domain of violence, of violation” (ibid.: 16).

The Rapture of Rupture

49

Bataille’s philosophical study, Erotism (1986), subscribes to
Sade’s vision of the world as a primordial vortex from which Nature
sculpts creations earmarked for destruction. However, his depiction
of human behavior within this secular framework departs from the
marquis’s philosophy at certain significant moments. For while
Bataille seeks a nihilistic sovereignty, he does not propose a solipsistic model of behavior in God’s absence. Instead he emphasizes
the quasi-mystical urge for fusion and continuity—or, in psychoanalytic terms—the unconscious desire to return to dead matter.
Unlike Sade, Bataille believes that “man achieves his inner
experience at the instant when bursting out of the chrysalis he feels
that he is tearing himself, not tearing something outside that
resists him” (ibid.: 39—my emphasis). Thus, while Bataille considers violence to be an inherent aspect of the erotic, he sees it as
focused on the self (through subjective perception) rather than projected outward onto a victim.10 This is not to say that the erotic
object is never sacrificed for pleasure, or that power is distributed
equally between the partners. What it means, is that erotic interaction is not inherently hierarchical. Nor is it orchestrated by a sovereign subject determined to survive the experience (as is the case
in Sadean narrative). For Bataille, the erotic is equally dangerous
territory for all involved.
“What does physical eroticism signify,” he asks, “if not a violation of the very being of its practitioners?—a violation bordering on
death, bordering on murder?” (ibid.: 17). This “border” is crucial in
Bataille’s philosophy, kinetically charged with the potential of its
crossing. In Sade’s textual universe, the border of murder is crossed
only by the Other: the orgasm of the libertine functions as a spasm
of evil empathy, a souvenir recovered from a fatal journey. Bataille
seems to concur when stating that “If you die, it is not my death”
(ibid.: 12). The libertine, however, dies only the metaphoric death of
orgasm, verbalizing and externalizing it. Bataille’s system permits
more room for hesitation, resistance, and ambivalence—more foreplay between Eros and Thanatos.
Eroticism is the field in which “discontinuous beings” play out
their nostalgia for continuity. According to this tradition, from the
moment we are born our conscious individuality wrenches us out of
the “continuity” of the universe. We become discontinuous beings
who yearn for our former state. As the decadent writer Marcel
Schwob puts it,
The soul of the female lover wishes to dwell in the beautiful body
of the one which she loves, and the soul of the male lover ardently desires to dissolve itself in the substance of his mistress. Alas,
that exchange is never attained. The souls climb up to the lover’s

50

After the Orgy
lips; they meet one another; they mingle with one another . . .
but they cannot migrate. (Stableford, 1992: 284)

Between one human being and another there exists “a gulf, a discontinuity” that can never be crossed; “nevertheless we can experience its dizziness together” (Bataille, 1986: 12-13). This dizziness is
the erotic experience. Thus, “erotic activity, by dissolving the separate beings that participate in it, reveals their fundamental continuity, like the waves of a stormy sea” (ibid.: 22).
In a different metaphor, Bataille describes sexual union as a
“half-way house between life and death” (ibid.: 168). So while sex is
the biological urge to procreate, eroticism is the venting of metaphysical frustration that accompanies the same act. This should not
be confused, however, with nineteenth-century romantic notions
such as the Siren song or Valkyrie, for death is certainly no passive
and serene return to Mother Nature’s womb. Death is the most violent thing of all, for it “jerks us out of a tenacious obsession with the
lastingness of our discontinuous being” (ibid.: 16). Erotic activity
thus initiates a partial dissolution of the subject.
Although Bataille defines eroticism as assenting to life up to
the point of death, this does not imply, “up to, and including,
death.” (Sade’s particular sacrilege was his attempt to turn the
“aura of death,” which constitutes the erotic, into actuality.) Instead
of tracing the outline of an absent God, Bataillean eroticism follows
the movement of what I call the “thanatic asymptote”: the seemingly endless approach of the death-drive. The pull of our (unconscious) obsession with this primal continuity is accompanied by the
“tormenting desire that this evanescent thing should last” (ibid.:
15). Part of us seeks self-destruction, while the other advocates selfpreservation in the hope that this “evanescent thing”—the flickering flame of our individual existence and experience—will continue
in its isolation. If we can’t have life-after-death we seek death-within-life. Eroticism then becomes simply our flirtation with death.
Paul Virilio provides us with a useful metaphor of eroticism
when he describes the sensation of bungee-jumping into the void:
“the ultimate getting off, anticipating a near death experience”
(1995: 93). During such an experience, we do not want a safety net,
for this would diminish the rush of our adrenaline-inducing vertigo; yet we do not want to remain there, either, for we soon feel sick.
We want to experience “It” momentarily and then be yanked back
to safety. This is the thanatic asymptote. In lovemaking, as our bodies cleave together in a grotesque and pathetic attempt at fusion,
we actively court oblivion, only to panic and cling to the life buoy of
our individuality. Like a mathematical asymptote, we attempt to
get closer to the line, yet never actually cross it. In Saint Theresa’s

The Rapture of Rupture

51

words, “I die because I cannot die” (Bataille, 1986: 240).
Of course people frequently do cross this line, and not only in
the writings of Sade. However, when this particular transgression
occurs, the tension that produces eroticism snaps, leaving only sex
crimes or accidental suicides from onanistic experiments. In terms
of our flirtation with death, however, we end up teasing only ourselves, for the Reaper is as patient as he is indifferent.
Eroticism thus consists in the violent juxtaposition of the “rupture of discontinuity” with the “rapture of continuity” (ibid.: 104).
This is a metapsychological process that incorporates—perhaps
even defines—the religious. For if eroticism simulates that dynamic disharmony that lies at the heart of religious experience, then
“the Christian religion is possibly the least religious of them all” in
its rejection of the sensual body (ibid.: 32). (Not to mention its individualistic and discontinuous vision of heaven.) However—in a neat
twist—the Christian notion of sin increases the sense of shame,
which Bataille believes gives birth to eroticism. This enables
Christianity to be actively anti-erotic while creating the conditions
under which eroticism flourishes; as any fan of the pop-star
Madonna could tell you. Transgression thus reveals what
Christianity attempts to conceal, namely that “the sacred and the
forbidden are one, [and] that the sacred can be reached through the
violence of a broken taboo” (ibid.: 126).
The experience of transgressing religious and social taboos
provokes a crisis in the subject that is incapable of distinguishing
between pleasure and anguish. Since the commonest taboos relate
to sex and death, both have become sacred matters through religion. Indeed Bataille tells us that “transgression does not deny the
taboo but transcends it and completes it” (ibid.: 63):
If we view the primary taboos as the refusal laid down by the individual to co-operate with nature regarded as a squandering of living energy and an orgy of annihilation we can no longer differentiate between death and sexuality. Sexuality and death are simply
the culminating points of the holiday nature celebrates with the
inexhaustible multitude of living beings, both of them signifying
the boundless wastage of nature’s resources as opposed to the urge
to live on characteristic of every living creature. (ibid.: 61)

According to this logic, wastage and loss are thus something to
celebrate. The self is experienced as loss, in a squandering of its
own values. In symbolic opposition to the Christian and capitalistic
fetish of accumulation, Bataille offers a potlatch of the spirit (not to
be confused with the soul). Bataille’s writings attempt to transcend
the blind will of nature, while shedding the illusion that such transcendence will last any longer than an instant. Transgression is

After the Orgy

52

thus an incarnation of the impulse to make order out of chaos: “By
introducing transcendence into an organized world, transgression
becomes a principle of an organized disorder” (ibid.: 119). As a
transgression indistinguishable from Chidester’s “experiential
transcendence,” Bataille’s orgasm seeks to incorporate death within life in order to surpass it.
Bataille, like Sade, is at pains to ensure that transgression is
not interpreted as either a “back-to-nature” instinct or the return of
our latent or repressed animality. This would be to mistake intangible experience for anatomy, because physical sexuality relates to
eroticism in the same way that the brain relates to the mind:
In the human sphere sexual activity has broken away from animal
simplicity. It is in essence a transgression, not, after the taboo, a
return to primitive freedom. Transgression belongs to humanity
given shape by the business of work. Transgression itself is organized. Eroticism as a whole is an organized activity, and this is why
it changes over the years. (ibid.: 108)

Bataille’s definition of eroticism thus develops historically,
anticipating Herbert Marcuse’s belief in placing the sexual act at
the basis of the social edifice. However, Bataille resists liberalhumanist applications by insisting that “if transgression is impossible, then profanation takes its place. Degradation, which turns
eroticism into something foul and horrible, is better than the neutrality of reasonable and nondestructive behaviour” (ibid.: 140).
This view is championed today by “libidinal materialists” (Land
xxi) such as Michel Mafessoli, Norman O. Brown, and Land.
Bataille’s nature, like Sade’s, is a vortex of destruction. It
demands that we crash headlong into our ruin. For Bataille,
“humanity became possible at the instant when, seized by an insurmountable dizziness, man tried to answer ‘No’” (1986: 62). ‘No,’
however, is the hallmark of death (Brown, 1990: 252), and so the
more we say it, the less we escape from it. In such a logical
labyrinth, our only alternative is to adopt Nietzsche’s strategy in
saying “Yes” to whatever the universe hurls at us. As a result, feeble mortal negation gives way to a powerful Dionysian affirmation.

Nietzsche’s Dionysus

I assess the value of people, of races, according to how nec-

The Rapture of Rupture

53

essarily they are unable to separate the god from the satyr.
Nietzsche (1979: 58)
Reality is never anything but a sector of the imaginary field in
which we have accepted the renunciation . . . of our fantasms
of desire.
Jean-François Lyotard (1964: 284)

In one of his earliest published works, The Birth of Tragedy (1872),
Nietzsche employs the Dionysian/Apollonian distinction to analyze
the tragic and noble cultural climate of the Hellenic golden age. He
does so while simultaneously berating the present state of his
German contemporaries. In his final complete work, Ecce Homo
(1888), Nietzsche continued to champion the Dionysian spirit—calling himself the last disciple of the philosopher Dionysus.11
Nietzsche’s career is thus bookended by excursions into the
Dionysian. While a great deal of philosophical terrain had been covered in the sixteen years separating these two works (in which
Nietzsche’s notion of Dionysus went through some subtle changes),
his working definition of this deity remained remarkably consistent.
Dionysus and Apollo represent two antagonistic life forces or
artistic principles: one rational, moral, and idealistic; the other
irrational, amoral, and realistic. Dionysus is a musical god who
exults in the flux of dissolution, whereas Apollo represents the plastic arts, imposing form and order on the chaotic realm of Nature.
Above all, Dionysus symbolizes “the extreme limit of affirmation”
(Nietzsche, 1979: 79).
The Christian God for Nietzsche represents “the low-water
mark in the descending development of divine types. God degenerated into the contradiction of life, instead of being its transfiguration and eternal Yes! God as the declaration of war against life,
against nature, against the will to live! . . . deification of nothingness, the will to nothingness pronounced holy!” (1982: 585-586).
Nietzsche offers Dionysus as the alternative to Christianity—
the anti-Christ. The intoxicating laughter of Dionysus in fact prefigures Bataille’s “practice of joy before death,” (Pefanis 46), a project of self-overcoming rather than self-preservation. The philosophical embodiment of Dionysus in the late nineteenth century is thus
an eruption of the pagan life force, the return of the libido, which
for two millennia had been suffocated by the body-hating teachings
of “monotonotheism” (1982: 586). For Nietzsche, as for James
Joyce’s Molly Bloom, “pagans are all those who say Yes to life, for
whom god is the word for the great Yes to all things” (ibid.: 641).

54

After the Orgy

Nietzsche thus anticipates Foucault’s point that the soul has
been the prison of the body, and not the other way around, as traditional asceticism would have us believe: “The preaching of chastity is
a public incitement to anti-nature. Every expression of contempt for
the sexual life, every befouling of it through the concept “impure,”
is the crime against life—is the intrinsic sin against the holy spirit
of life” (1979: 77).
This sits easily with Sade’s views on how Christianity stifles
sexuality. And like Bataille, Nietzsche is not content simply to do
away with the sacred. Instead he aims to show that the Christian
version of sacrality is debased and impoverished. These “protonihilists” are thus not antireligious, for their writings form part of a
search for the pantheistic legacy of the pagans. Nietzsche refused
to reduce the sacred to such shopworn concepts as “the sublime,”
“the metaphysical,” “the ideal,” and “the infinite” (Weiss, 133).
Transcendence is considered a valid goal, so long as its ephemeral
qualities are understood and appreciated.
Dionysus is born from the “superfluity of life” (Nietzsche,
1979: 81). He is a symbol of that entropy or erosion that the
Apollonian impulse of self-preservation must constantly, not to
mention vainly, counteract. Assuming that a form of ressentiment
accompanies the subject’s entry into temporal consciousness (i.e.,
the knowledge that we have to die sooner or later), then a
Dionysian consciousness renounces such a vendetta against the
ravenous appetite of time. Since we have no way of persuading
Saturn to refrain from eating his children, we may as well turn his
meal into a feast of Caligulan proportions.
Nietzsche speaks of the Dionysian rapture, “whose closest
analogy is furnished by physical intoxication” (1956: 22). However,
Dionysian excess (in contrast to 1960s’ interpretations of it) is not
the motive for drunken hedonism, but instead represents the
impulse to “tear aside the veil that conceals the abyss at the heart
of reality” (Gillespie 208). (This is the same impulse, let us not forget, behind The Revelation of St. John, and affirms the libidinal
thrust of apocalyptic rhetoric.)
Dionysian rapture is a form of transcendence in stark contrast
to the mode of escape envisaged by the saints. It serves as the basis
of an unflinching attempt to surpass the trivialities of the self: “A
spirit thus emancipated stands in the midst of the universe with a
joyful and trusting fatalism, in the faith that only what is separate
and individual may be rejected, that in the totality everything is
redeemed and affirmed—he no longer denies” (Nietzsche, 1979: 13).
In an insight that obviously influenced Bataille, Nietzsche
writes; “It is as though in these Greek festivals a sentimental trait
of nature were coming to the fore, as though nature were bemoan-

The Rapture of Rupture

55

ing the fact of her fragmentation, her decomposition into separate
individuals” (1956: 27). This drive toward unification functions
throughout Nietzsche’s writings, wearing different masks as the
Overman, Zarathustra, the Antichrist, the will to power or
Dionysus himself.
Nietzsche believed that the Greeks were capable of comprehending
the unbearable nature of Dionysian reality only if it was tempered
by an Apollonian frame or focus, which created the illusion that for
a moment we control—or at least can distil for our pleasure—the
abysmal core of existence. In The Birth of Tragedy, Nietzsche
explains how Hellenic drama was a sublime “neurosis arising from
health, from the youthful condition of the race” (1872: 8). Tragedy
is thus “a concrete manifestation of Dionysiac conditions, music
made visible, an ecstatic dreamworld” (89). Through this unlikely
(if not impossible) partnership between Apollo and Dionysus, the
Greeks experienced tragic emotion momentarily, and felt they had
solved the enigma of existence.
Dionysian wisdom is thus equivalent to Bataille’s erotic
epiphany, which also fails to end discontinuity, although it allows “this
fractured unity to shine forth out of the individual” (Gillespie 209):
For a brief moment we become, ourselves, the primal Being, and
we experience its insatiable hunger for existence. Now we see the
struggle, the pain, the destruction of appearances, as necessary,
because of the constant proliferation of forms pushing into life,
because of the extravagant fecundity of the world will. We feel the
furious prodding of this travail in the very moment in which we
become one with the immense lust for life and are made aware of
the eternity and indestructibility of that lust. Pity and terror
notwithstanding, we realize our great good fortune in having life
– not as individuals, but as part of the life force with whose procreative lust we have become one. (Neitzsche: 102-103)

For Nietzsche, this rendering of the “world will” is a supreme
aesthetic achievement, which two millennia of Christian degeneracy and enforced amnesia have made us no longer capable of. In
Hellenic tragedy the “great Dionysian question mark” (ibid.: 13)
was bent into an exclamation mark for a fleeting moment by the
power of the playwright, only to spring back into its natural shape
at the end of the performance. (Nietzsche, however, would soon lose
interest in Apollo, along with the romantic humanism he represents. He came to see Apollo as not only a reactive force that tries
to deny the power of Dionysus, but as part of the great GermanicChristian conspiracy against life.)

56

After the Orgy

Already, in The Birth of Tragedy, Nietzsche singles out Christian
morality as the “will to deny life, a secret instinct of destruction, a
principle of calumny, a reductive agent – the beginning of the end?”
(11). As he explains, his “vital instincts turned against ethics and
founded a radical counter-doctrine, slanted aesthetically, to oppose
the Christian libel on life. But it still wanted a name . . . I christened it rather arbitrarily – for who can tell the real name of the
Antichrist?—the name of a Greek god, Dionysos” (ibid.).
In “christening” his philosophy thus, Nietzsche created his own
eschatology, appropriating the historical figure of the Antichrist for
his own Armageddon, which awaits the final demise of Christ
rather than his return. Nietzsche speculated that nihilism would
blossom during the next 200 years (1888-2088): “This period will be
characterized by three great affects, disgust, pity, and a lust for
destruction, which will produce the catastrophe that will usher in a
thousand-year Dionysian Reich” (Gillespie 181). Here we see
Nietzsche in his millenarian prophet mode, which influenced Adolf
Hitler more in tone than in content.
Nietzsche, however, is notorious for those inconsistencies and
incoherences that are now identified as distinctive features of
transgressive writing. However, one contradiction in particular
resists reconciliation: although Nietzsche hated “every kind of temporal expectation and promise” (1982: 604), he personally anticipated a cultural turning point of millennial proportions.
Consequently, at one moment he laments the life-strangling notion
of a Last Judgment, and at another triumphantly claims that “all
that is now called culture, education, civilization will one day have
to appear before the incorruptible judge, Dionysos” (1956: 120). It
seems that the sticking point is not judgment itself, but who is
doing the judging.
Despite his fear that one day he would be pronounced holy,
Nietzsche aimed his emotive rhetoric at the familiar rhetorical terrain of apocalyptic end-time scenarios:
This plenitude and sequence of breakdown, destruction, ruin, and
cataclysm that is now impending—who could guess enough of it
today to be compelled to play the teacher and advance proclaimer
of this monstrous logic of terror, the prophet of a gloom and eclipse
of the sun whose like has probably never yet occurred on earth?
(Gillespie xi-xii)

Indeed Nietzsche—usually more original than this—subscribes to the millenarian motif of anticipating a thousand-year
period of truth that would herald the consummation of a Dionysian
empire. The young Nietzsche believed that this imminent kingdom
was presaged in the tragic and turgid strains of Wagner’s music:

The Rapture of Rupture

57

And yet there have been indications that the German spirit is still
alive, and marvelously alive, like a knight who sleeps his enchanted
sleep and dreams far underground. From out of these depths a
Dionysian song rises, letting us know that this German knight in his
austere enchantment is still dreaming of the age-old Dionysian myth
. . . . One day the knight will awaken, in all the morning freshness
of his long sleep. He will slay dragons, destroy the cunning dwarfs,
rouse Brünnhilde, and not even Wotan’s spear will be able to bar his
way. (1956: 144)

Such prophecies are often the rallying cries of those wishing to
excite and organize people in the interests of a nationalistic agenda. Indeed, Norman Cohn’s classic study of millenarianism (1993)
exhaustively demonstrates that eschatological speculations are
never free from political content or consequences. Nietzsche clearly
saw it as his responsibility—as Dionysus’ last disciple—to
announce and usher in this age. Thus, against John’s Revelation he
posited his own revaluation (Umwertung aller Werte)—a sweeping
de- and reconstruction of values that was to have apocalyptic consequences: “I swear to you that in two years we shall have the
whole earth in convulsions” (1979: 11).
While Nietzsche’s apocalypse may not have been biblically
spectacular, its tremors continue to be felt on the seismograph of
political entropy, cultural nihilism and, other maladies covered
by the diagnosis “postmodernity” (see Geoff Waite’s Nietzsche’s
Corps/e (1996) for a reading of Nietzsche’s plaguelike influence
over the present). Indeed, toward the end of Ecce Homo (1888),
Nietzsche’s identification with the Dionysian Antichrist is almost
complete: “For when truth steps into battle with the lie of millennia we shall have convulsions, an earthquake spasm, a transposition of valley and mountain such as has never been dreamed
of” (127).

Nihilism and the Thirst for Annihilation

What? You search? You would multiply yourself by ten, by a
hundred? You seek followers? Seek zeros!
Nietzsche (1982a: 468)
When we speak it rattles like a jagged stone in our throats.
A little over two millennia ago we began to cough up strange
new words with our blood and bile, and in certain quarters

58

After the Orgy
the excruciation of libido began to be called “philosophy.”
Land (152)

The word nihilism has had many different and sometimes contradictory meanings. Modern history, as interpreted by Nietzsche, is
the story of how a dominant nihilism—identified variously as
Christianity, capitalism, or humanism—becomes globalized. The
fact that nihilism treats all transcendence as inherently transitory results in a massive renegotiation concerning notions such as
“freedom” and “meaning.”
Nihilism can be either active or passive, and Land explains the
difference succinctly: “passive nihilism is the zero of religion, whilst
active nihilism is the religion of zero” (145). While Sade, Bataille, and
Nietzsche exemplify the latter, Arthur Schopenhauer and the media
caricature of “Generation X” afford us a glimpse of the former.
Land evokes the nihilistic worldview as it pertains to the subject:
Life is ejected from the energy-blank and smeared as a crust upon
chaotic zero, a mould upon death. This crust is also a maze—a
complex exit back to the energy base-line—and the complexity of
the maze is life trying to escape from out of itself, being nothing
but escape from itself, from which it tries to escape: maze-wanderer. That is to say, life is itself the maze of its route to death; a
tangle of mazings which trace a unilateral deviation from blank.
(47)

It is no surprise that such a perspective has been silenced, persecuted, ignored, and derided by all sides of the political spectrum.
Nihilism does not encourage the mental foundation needed to support such social utilities as elections, telethons, or cake-stalls.
Although passive nihilism is less confrontational and antagonistic,
it carries a similar socially corrosive effect (as illustrated by the
young Woody Allen in Annie Hall, who refused to do his homework
“because the universe is breaking up”). Nietzsche, however, had no
time for its accompanying apathy.
For centuries the notion of immortality has been used as a
deterrant to those who would stray from the flock, serving as a
backdrop to the corrective corridors of hell. As Nietzsche reminds
us, “the concepts beyond, Last Judgement, immortality of the soul
and soul itself are instruments of torture, systems of cruelties by
virtue of which the priest became master” (1982: 612). Eternity is a
loaded concept, for its value depends wholly on either the promise
of eternal bliss or the threat of eternal punishment. Instead of the
heavenly “forever,” Nietzsche posits the ethical hypothesis of an

The Rapture of Rupture

59

“eternal return” on earth.
If we remind ourselves that Dionysus is the prophetic god of
coming, then we can see the libidinal subtext of Nietzsche’s concept,
whereby the Eternal Return (Ewige Wiederkunft des Gleichen)
translates more accurately as the Eternal Recoming (Kunft deriving from the word kommen, “to come”) (Waite 323). This extremely
complex philosophical metaphor is open to many conflicting interpretations. Yet the eternal return is akin to what Land calls “the
abortion of transcendence” (143), since it actively denies the presumption of an Afterlife. If people are confronted with infinite repetition (as in Harold Ramis’s Hollywood-Nietzschean fable
Groundhog’s Day) then the emotional luxury of regret becomes
superfluous. It is thus up to the individual to turn such existential
restrictions into their own heaven or hell.
Consequently, Nietzsche believes that Christianity is best
understood as that which worships “the inverse values to those
which alone could guarantee it prosperity [and] the exalted right to
a future” (ibid.: 34). We must become strong enough to bestow this
right on ourselves, for it is not simply given us by divine authority.
The future is that realm in which the liberated mind is free to enjoy
“further experimentation, a continuation of the fluid state of values, testing, choosing, criticizing values in infinitum” (1982: 644).
Christianity cannot tolerate such indeterminacy, which is why it
erects two ideological walls against it:
one, revelation, the claim that the reason in these laws is not of
human origin, not sought and found slowly and after many errors,
but of divine origin and hence whole, perfect, without history, a
gift, a miracle, merely communicated. Then, tradition, the claim
that the law has existed since time immemorial and that it would
be irreverent, a crime against one’s forefathers, to raise any doubt
against it. The authority of the law is founded on the theses: God
gave it, the forefathers lived it. (ibid.)

“What did God give man revelation for?”(ibid.: 641), asks
Nietzsche—meaning why did we give it to ourselves, and why did
we decided to narrate history as a story foretold? While a fatalistic
conclusion is essential in Nietzsche’s beloved Greek tragedy, its aesthetic mandate does not translate to the historical realm. As Land
points out, “it is precisely because history has made no sense that
we have learned from it, and the lesson remains a brutal one” (155).
Nietzsche loathed the limitations associated with telic discourses, which is why he placed Socialists in the same despicable
category as Christians. (As Nietzsche would say, revelation and revolution: that rhymes, that does not only rhyme.) The “revaluation”
of Ecce Homo thus counterbalances the combined weight of revela-

60

After the Orgy

tion and revolution: “The purpose of history, guided by genealogy, is
not to discover the roots of our identity but to commit itself to its dissipation” (Weiss, 63). Only the Dionysian disciple possesses the kind
of subjectivity strong enough to rejoice in such dissipation, and to
revel in nihilistic freedom: “The problem I thus pose is not what
shall succeed mankind in the sequence of living beings (man is an
end), but what type of man shall be bred, shall be willed, for being
higher in value, worthier of life, more certain of a future” (1982:
570).
The magnification of man is thus offered as a way of transcending the emasculating effects of the nihilistic. Hence
Nietzsche’s urgent quest for the Overman, the equivalent of
Brahmanic consciousness in his heavily gendered spiritual castesystem. Such an elitist quest—whether initiated by Nietzsche or
Hitler—is a final and desperate bid to halt the corrosive march of
modernity. That antiapocalyptic historical consciousness that nurtured the quest for the Overman prompts Land to announce that
only since Nietzsche has our history come to seem (imminently)
terminal (134).
In summary, Sade, Nietzsche, and Bataille figure the limen of death
as a wall rather than as a door or bridge. Death stands as a provocation. But instead of waiting for the assistance of divine ascension
to see over it, they crash headlong through it. Against the humanism of secular modernity, Sade valorized artifice over Nature, and
chronicled an apocalyptic form of sexual nihilism. Bataille then
adapted Sade’s libidinal language to a more fusional and selfdestructive model, so that eroticism came to signify humanity’s
sense of discontinuity, and its flirtation with death. Given that the
“thanatic asymptote” follows the same historical and ideological arc
as libidinal millenarianism itself—always approaching but never
actually arriving—we can see how these writers contributed to the
apocalyptic climate of the twentieth century.
The philosophies of Sade, Bataille, and Nietzsche were all fabricated in times of perceived crisis or ending: the Terror, the
Holocaust, the fin de siècle. Whereas Sade and Bataille wished to
push the orgy to its apocalyptic conclusion, Nietzsche used it more
as a symbolic springboard for his own brand of libidinal millenarianism, namely, that reevaluation of all values which saturates
twentieth-century discourses of the self and society.
Bataille, Nietzsche, and Sade all cut through the Grand
Narratives of modernity in order to expose its collusion with
Christian moral systems. Contemporary theorists such as Weiss,
Land and Lyotard classify their works as symptomatic of “libidinal
aesthetics,” and group them variously with Pierre Klossowski,

The Rapture of Rupture

61

Maurice Blanchot, Raymond Roussel, Louis Ferdinand Céline,
Antonin Artaud and others. Their writing is not the legitimate
model of a reflective author sculpting “his” life into a coherent narrative, but rather the site of a visceral outpouring of the repressed,
denied, profane, and unclean.
Transgression does not seek merely to reverse or balance the
dissymmetry of an enforced order, but also to dissolve the authority
of “progress” in a gesture of joy, despair, and defiance. That such a
project is reminiscent of both deconstruction and some versions of
poststructuralism should not surprise us, for Sade, Nietzsche, and
Bataille have had a major influence on the intellectual development
of more contemporary prophets such as Lacan, Derrida, Deleuze,
Blanchot, and Foucault.
Foucault’s later writings, however, attempt to rectify the failure of Bataille, Nietzsche, and Sade to complete the spiral back into
the Apollonian, “a movement crucial for the critique of our present
episteme” (Walker). These writers
remain semi-immersed in deadly Dionysian nature, the “society of
blood” characteristic of the pre-enlightenment age. As a result,
though “subversive,” they provide no definitive answers for the
problem of an ultra-Apollonian, post-Enlightenment power which
seeks to produce subjects so to “normalize” and control them. (ibid.)

Foucault acknowledges that “incursions into the Dionysian are
always quickly bound in again by order” (ibid.), and that this
boundary-policing is becoming increasingly insidious in the market-driven millennium. As a consequence, libidinal economists
must not merely affirm the Dionysian, but learn to manipulate
Apollonian normalizations of the Dionysian in turn.

This page intentionally left blank.

3

The Virtual Apocalypse

These [technological] discoveries bend our senses and our
organs in a way that causes us to believe that our physical
and moral constitution is no longer in rapport with them.
Science, as it were, proposes that we should enter a new
world that has not been made for us. We would like to venture
into it; but it does not take us long to recognize that it
requires a constitution we lack and organs we do not have.
G. Claudin, 1858 (Schivelbusch 152)

As we prepared for our transition into the twenty-first century, an
emergent discussion of digital communication technologies warned
of the possible “annihilation of space and time.” We must remind
ourselves, however, that the invention of the steam engine and the
railroad inspired similar declarations in mid-nineteenth-century
Europe. In 1839 an article in the Quarterly Review discussed “the
gradual annihilation, approaching almost to the final extinction, of
that space and of those distances which have hitherto been supposed
unalterably to separate the various nations of the globe” (41). 12 Here
we can detect the initial movements of a new geographic consciousness that has steadily moved toward a utopian Pangea. This universal ideal is now realized in the globalist rhetoric of Internetinterested parties such as the Microsoft Corporation, whose slogan
is, Where Do You Want to Go Today?
In his classic history of The Railway Journey, Wolfgang
Schivelbusch discusses the “disorientation experienced by the traditional space-time continuum when confronted by . . . new technology” (1980: 44). His study reveals that planetary shrinkage was
prophesied long before McLuhan imaged the world as a “global village.” In 1843 for instance, Heinrich Heine observed how “[s]pace is
being killed by the railways, and we are left with time alone . . . .

63

64

After the Orgy

I feel as if the mountains and forests of all countries were advancing on Paris. Even now, I can smell the German linden trees; the
North Sea’s breakers are rolling against my door” (ibid.).
As was to be the case with both atomic power and the modem,
the train encouraged a belief in new opportunities for understanding our fellow men and women. “To thus foreshorten for everyone
the distances that separate localities from each other,” Constantine
Pecqueur noted, “is to equally diminish the distances that separate
men from one another” (ibid. 74). Schivelbusch emphasizes this
confusion of the spatial with the social by early nineteenth-century
progressive thinkers, who believed that the railroad would be a
“technical guarantor of democracy, harmony between nations,
peace and progress” (73).
Yet what happens when two points, previously buffered by distance, are brought together by new technologies? According to
Schivelbusch, an accident occurs “As the space between the
points—the traditional travelling space—is destroyed, those points
move into each other’s immediate vicinity: one might say that they
collide” (45). Such a collision necessarily involves some kind of initial psychic shock. The earliest recorded reactions to train travel,
however, tend to dwell on the threat of physical danger before contemplating the philosophical “shock” of this newfound velocity.
The accident is one of the four modes of Being in Aristotle’s
Metaphysics. However, not until the industrial revolution—when
measurable accidents increased—did the word lose its association
with coincidence or fate. The accident thus became a by-product of
industry in the modern era, a technological phenomenon that
brings death on a scale previously unheard-of outside the spheres
of natural disaster or war.13
In our own time, the accident has become intimately connected
to the government’s management of resources. Because it is factored
into every economic equation, we have developed—at least according to Ernst Jünger—a “second and colder consciousness” (BuckMorss 138-139). As Jean Baudrillard observes, “The blood on the
roads is a desperate form of compensation for the State’s tarmac
gifts . . . . The accident thus takes its place in the space that institutes a symbolic debt towards the State” (1993: 43). Nevertheless, as
inheritors of Jünger’s “second consciousness” we do not, on the
whole, think of accidents as being so perilously near as they were to
early commuters on the first trains. Take, for instance, the first
major railway disaster, on May 8, 1842 on the Paris-Versailles line,
which killed or wounded over one hundred and fifty people. This
accident immediately threw much of Europe into panic, accounting
for the sense of fear and helplessness that permeates many historical accounts of this new technology and its passive mode of trans-

The Virtual Apocalypse

65

port.
To Thomas Creevy, writing in 1829, traveling by train “is really flying, and it is impossible to divest yourself of the notion of
instant death to all upon the least accident happening”
(Schivelbusch 131). Sixteen years later a German traveller
describes a “certain dampening of the spirits that never quite goes
away despite all the pleasant aspects of train journeys,” which he
attributes to the ever-present “close possibility of an accident, and
the inability to exercise any influence on the running of the cars”
(ibid.). Those who survived accidents physically unscathed seemed
unable to absorb psychologically the shock of experiencing the
unprecedented destructive power of technology. “There is something in the crash,” wrote William Camps in 1886,
the shock, and the violence of a railway collision, which would seem
to produce effects upon the nervous system quite beyond those of
any ordinary injury . . . [and these] . . . to such an extent, that
the unfortunate sufferer may not altogether recover throughout the
remainder of his life, which I apprehend, may, in some instances at
least, be reasonably expected to be curtailed in its duration. (139)

One nineteenth-century physician, Max Nordau—who I discuss in more detail in chapter 4—regarded the increasing cases of
“railway spine” and “railway brain” (ill-defined nineteeth century
afflictions) as evidence of human fragility in the face of accelerating
technologies (41). Schivelbusch also attributed the profound impact
of railroad trauma to the relative sophistication of the technology,
for “the more efficient the technology, the more catastrophic its
destruction when it collapses” (133). Consequently,
[t]here is an exact ratio between the level of the technology with
which nature is controlled, and the degree of severity of its accidents. The preindustrial era does not know any technological accidents in that sense . . . . The preindustrial catastrophes are natural events, natural accidents. They attack the objects they
destroy from the outside, as storms, floods, thunderbolts, hailstones, etc. After the industrial revolution, destruction by technological accident comes from the inside. (ibid.)

What are the implications of such an argument in the post(or at least “late”) industrial era, as mechanical production in the
west gives way to electronic maintenance? The Union Carbide disaster in Bhopal, Chernobyl, and daily transit accidents vividly
illustrate the continuing relevance of such a theory. At first
glance, at least, new technological vectors suggest a cushioning of
potential impacts. Yet the lessons of railroad trauma should con-

66

After the Orgy

tinue to be heeded, for as we have seen, people may survive a
crash physically untouched but mentally devastated. Why should
things be any different in virtual reality?
Psychoanalysts sometimes posit a causal link between the imminence of accidents and the eroticization of trains. Noting the “connection between mechanical agitation and sexual arousal”
(Schivelbsch 197), Sigmund Freud identified the railroad as the
most powerful agent of such stimulation. (Indeed, it is no “accident”
that one of the most enduring phallic symbols is the train.) Freud
believed that “a compulsive link of this kind between railway-travel and sexuality is clearly derived from the pleasurable character of
the sensations of movement” (ibid.). Early train travelers experienced the fearful independence of their own sexuality as somehow
corresponding to derailment: “Their fear is related to the danger of
finding themselves in a kind of unstoppable motion that they can
no longer control. The same patients generally exhibit fear of locomotion in any vehicle they cannot bring to a halt themselves at any
time” (83). Freud even goes so far as to attribute the nausea of
motion sickness to the repression of sexual desires awakened by
train travel (197). While open to dispute, such theories point to the
constellation, which exists between sexuality, neurosis, and a technological apocalypse. The nineteeth-century condition of “libidinal
neurosis” (Schivelbusch 143) thus speaks of an erogenous component within the acceleration of Western culture, and specifically in
the endeavor to treat the “erotic as a regulated machine” (Lyotard).
J.-K. Huysmans’s mouth-piece, Des Esseintes, eroticizes the
train itself, by feminizing two locomotives “lately adopted for service
on the Northern Railroad of France”:
One, the Cramspton, an adorable blonde, shrill-voiced, slenderwaisted, with her glittering corset of polished brass, her supple
catlike grace, a fair and fascinating blonde, the perfection of whose
charms is almost terrifying when, stiffening her muscles of steel,
pouring the sweat of steam down her hot flanks . . . . The other,
the Engerth, a massively built, dark-browed brunette, of harsh,
hoarse-toned utterance, with thick-set loins. (22-23)

Vague sexual arousal is intensified here into that fetishistic gaze
which was to be exercised in the Futurist writings of F. T. Marinetti
and reach its apotheosis in J. G. Ballard’s novel, Crash (1975).
According to an 1855 article in the Journal of Public Health and
Sanitary Review, “[t]he causes of the evil are not to be found in the
noise, vibration and speed of the railway carriage . . . but in the
excitement, anxiety, and the nervous shock consequent on the frequent efforts to catch the last express; to be in time for the fearful-

The Virtual Apocalypse

67

ly punctual train” (Schivelbusch 203).
A contemporary example of “fearfully punctual” technology is
the home computer, and the escalating industry that generates its
built-in obsolescence. Those who cannot afford to purchase a computer are denied access to the social and economic mobility that
such technology—potentially, at least—produces. That tiny percentage of the world population that can afford computers is then
obliged to upgrade continuously in order to keep pace with one of
capitalism’s purest forms. In 1868 such a phenomenon was
described by Haviland as being “hurried to death” (Schivelbusch
203), and in 1970 by Alvin Toffler as “future shock.” Both testify to
a temporal version of the everyday collisions documented by historians, statisticians, photographers, artists, and coroners.

Virilio’s Accident

If I were asked to condense the whole of the present century
into one mental picture I would pick a familiar everyday
sight: a man in a motor car, driving along a concrete highway
to some unknown destination. Almost every aspect of modern
life is there, both for good and for ill—our sense of speed,
drama and aggression, the worlds of advertising and consumer goods, engineering and mass manufacture, and the
shared experience of moving together through an elaborately
signalled landscape.
Ballard (1996: 262)
There are no accidents, only nature throwing her weight
around.
Camille Paglia (38)

There is a scene in Huysmans’s A Rebours (1884) where Des
Esseintes attempts to break free from his stagnant lifestyle by taking a trip across the Channel to England. He only makes it as far
as a tavern on the rue d’Amsterdam near the train station. As he
eats his dinner while waiting for his train to depart, he overhears
some Englishmen talking nearby, who inspire him to imagine the
journey that lies ahead. He soon finds himself so overcome by an
“enervating lassitude” that he decides it would be “a nuisance” to
make his connection. “After all,” he says, “I have felt and seen what

68

After the Orgy

I wanted to feel and see. I have been steeped in English life ever
since I left home; it would have been a fool’s trick to go and lose these
imperishable impressions by a clumsy change of locality” (130).
Because the trip has occurred already in his mind, Des
Esseintes needs no corresponding journey in reality to legitimize
his “memories.” His voyage has been conducted entirely in that
imaginative realm we now call “virtual”, “and this merely by a trifling subterfuge, by a more or less close simulation of the object
aimed at by these desires” (20). This is the perfect arrangement for
a connoisseur of sensation who is nevertheless too apathetic to venture outside his domicile.
Des Esseintes thus anticipates the quintessential attitude of
twenty-first-century couch potatoes when he asks; “What was the
good of moving, when a man can travel so gloriously sitting in a
chair?” (130). This chair then becomes a significant site of early
virtual movement, allowing the world to revolve around the self
like stars around a prodigal sun. Over a century later, Ballard
was quoted as saying, “I keep meaning to go [to the United
States], but it’s just inertia. Also, I think one doesn’t really need
to travel—TV travels for you” (Juno 35). He goes on to remark
that “[i]f one had to categorize the future in one word, it would be
‘home.’ Just as the 20th century has been the age of mobility, largely through the motor car, so the next era will be one in which
instead of having to seek out one’s adventures through travel, one
creates them, in whatever form one chooses, in one’s home” (159).
The combination of accelerated communication technologies with
increased global mobility has produced a paradoxical tendency
toward stasis. From reality’s gridlock to the Internet’s “net-lag,”
things are grinding to a halt. As Mark Kingwell notes, “We are
always speeding up to a standstill” (159).
We are thus living on the threshold of an era in which fiberoptic cables carry vicarious experiences to and for us. After all, we
live in an age where we can dine with our family via real-time technologies, even when scattered to the four corners of the globe. As
Paul Virilio notes (perhaps recalling Des Esseintes); “When cosmic
imagery is completely digitalized in the next century by computer
processes, cybernauts will be able to travel in their armchairs as
simple televiewers, discovering a surrogate world that will have
emerged from information energy” (1995: 154).
As we have seen, however, acceleration comes at a price: namely, the psychic coordinates of the Victorian worldview. Virilio
revives the doom-mongering of the first half of the nineteenth century when he writes that “with acceleration there is no more here
and there, only the mental confusion of near and far, present and
future, real and unreal—a mix of history, stories and the halluci-

The Virtual Apocalypse

69

natory utopia of communication technologies” (ibid.: 35).
This digital disorientation leads us into Baudrillard territory,
whereby the copy is indistinguishable from the original, the simulation from “the real.” Virilio, however, takes this a step further
than Baudrillard, by arguing that such a distinction is already
dated. Instead, “reality has become symmetrical,” splitting into two
distinct parts: the virtual and the actual. “This,” Virilio argues, “is
a considerable event which goes far beyond simulation” (Wilson).
Virilio thinks that this split is an effect of “the digital or computer bomb, which destroys the principle of reality itself” (ibid.).
Acknowledging that the nuclear bomb and the computer were invented simultaneously, he sees them now locked into an apocalyptic “race
for ubiquity and instantaneity” (1995: 7): “These new technologies try
to make virtual reality more powerful than actual reality, which is the
true accident,” he continues. “The day when virtual reality becomes
more powerful than reality will be the day of the big accident.
Mankind never experienced such an extraordinary accident” (Wilson).
Many engines have helped propel human history, but two in particular drove the final century of the last millennium: the automobile
and the computer. The information engine and the combustion
engine combined to colonize our perception of the world, and our
place in it. “The communications industry would never have got
where it is today,” Virilio tells us, “had it not started out as an art
of the motor” (1995: 23). Television thus becomes a “museum of accidents,” and even a term like impact study exposes the way in which
progress has been metaphorically motorized.
In discussing the reality-engine (a Virtual Reality term), Virilio
concludes that “[t]o navigate space, cyberspace, as one formerly
steered a motor vehicle . . . is indeed the great aesthetic mutation of information technologies” (ibid.: 145). For this reason, the
Internet is also referred to as the “information super-highway.”
Such a metaphor, however, speaks volumes about the way in which
we view our passage through time. Our emphasis on speed has
meant that we do not consider the Internet as a “sea” of data,
despite ample opportunities to do so. We surf the net, as well as
trawl through it for information; we have software piracy, and the
registered logo of the new defunct Netscape Navigator featured
both a ship’s wheel and a lighthouse.
In Fast Cars, Clean Bodies (1995), Kristin Ross identifies the
car as the central vehicle of all twentieth-century modernization.
Personal mobility resulted in a newfound freedom, and produced a
new subjectivity whose circumference (unlike domestic space) was
simultaneously nowhere and everywhere. If we map this new decentred subjectivity onto the information superhighway, we get what

70

After the Orgy

Scott Bukatman calls “terminal identity”: a pun on the apocalyptic
technology of the cybernaut. In popular-romantic accounts, hackers
are like James Dean: young male rebels, tearing along the fiberoptic autobahns at breakneck speed, and seeking the self-transcendence of “escape velocity.” Like Dean, however, they are also heading for a crash. Ballard’s Crash and Neal Stephenson’s Snow Crash
(1993) give us two perspectives of this (always) impending impact.
The crash is seen by the media, the government, and the medical
profession—and therefore by most of us—as an aberration. We have
car accidents, the name itself eliding any notion of purpose or
responsibility. But what if, as Baudrillard suggests, the crash could
be separated from the notion of an accident and considered as
something more deliberate than just a fatal by-product. Something
more than simply “the part conceded to fate by the system itself and
calculated into its general reckoning” (1991: 315). In this case the
accident is “no longer on the margins; it is at the heart. It is no
longer the exception to a triumphant rationality; it has become the
Rule, it has devoured the Rule” (ibid.).
Indeed, a comprehensive North American study published in
the same year as Ballard’s Crash begins with “a specific theory of
the etiology of accident—namely, that in many, perhaps even most
accidents, suicide or suicidelike factors are in evidence”
(Tabachnick et al. ix). A similar hypothesis inspired Ballard to ask
if we are “merely victims in a meaningless tragedy,” or whether
“these appalling accidents take place with some kind of unconscious
collaboration on our part?” (1996: 263).
The counterdestructive potential of the car crash was a key
motif in the writings of the Italian Futurist, Marinetti. As “probably the most aggressive and naïve attempt to establish an aesthetic on the preaching of de Sade and Nietzsche” (Nuttall 75),
Futurism reacted to the political climate leading up to the First
World War by embracing technology and rejecting the Luddite legacy of romanticism. Reversing the hierarchy of man-over-machine,
Marinetti composed homages to the tightly coiled power of machinery, which enabled humans to transcend their condition by fusing
with pure velocity: “We stand on the last promontory of the centuries! . . . . Why should we look back, when what we want is to
break down the mysterious doors of the Impossible? Time and
Space died yesterday. We already live in the absolute, because we
have created eternal, omnipresent speed” (48-49).
Prefiguring the “road rage” mentality of busy commuters, the
Futurists proclaimed the need to “persecute, lash, torture all those
who sin against speed” (103). They also anticipated various cyborg
philosophies regarding an enhanced posthumanity, linking Nietzsche

The Virtual Apocalypse

71

and Nordau to William Gibson and Stelarc. The techno-Übermensch
will be “endowed with surprising organs . . . adapted to the needs
of a world of ceaseless shocks” (99). Alternatively, he may confirm
Marshall McLuhan’s suspicion that man himself has become merely
“the sex organs of the machine world” (1974: 46).
Marinetti’s Founding and Manifesto of Futurism (1909) was
itself (in Ballard’s phrase) a “death-born Aphrodite,” heavy with the
Freudian symbolism of the Accident. The narrative describes a
group of like-minded people who, driving through the countryside
and fervently discusing the future of Europe, crash into the “maternal ditch” of a factory drain. This accident jolts them into a new
sense of awareness which—prefiguring Ballard’s characters—
enables a deeper appreciation of the relationship between humanity and technology. Emerging from the slimy wreckage of his car, a
reborn Marinetti proclaims the “immanent, inevitable identification of man with motor” (1991: 99). The accident—injected with
personal and global significance—thus becomes the catalyst for
both subjective revelation and apocalyptic Revelation: ‘Look there,
on the earth, the very first dawn! There’s nothing to match the
splendor of the sun’s red sword, slashing for the first time through
our millennial gloom!’ . . . . I stretched out on my car like a corpse
on its bier, but revived at once under the steering wheel, a guillotine blade that threatened my stomach” (48).
In public life, however, the accident remains a glitch, a bug or
blockage in a system designed for “figures of incessant circulation”
(Baudrillard, 1991: 315).

Bacchanical Man and Ballard’s Crash

No more riots, no need for much repression; to empty the
streets, it’s enough to promise everyone the highway.
Paul Virilio (1986: 25).

In a 1984 interview with REsearch magazine, Ballard describes a
serene pattern of circulation that transcends basic notions of law
and order:
It seems to me that we’re moving into an area where the moral
structures of society, the whole social basis of the lives we lead are
provided for us externally without any sort of contribution by our-

72

After the Orgy
selves—they’re provided to a large extent by the nature of modern
science and technology. We don’t think of say the modern traffic
system as being a moral structure, but in a sense the green and
red lights that move traffic around safely are making a whole set
of moral decisions for us, which allow us to get on with the business of, say, having a row with the girlfriend as we go around the
cloverleaf in complete safety . . . . This leaves our imagination
free and untrammeled by moral considerations. (Revell 46)

In 1996 it was estimated that America were six years away from
the prototype of an automated highway system for “smart vehicles,”
which would move passengers around like “oversized slot-cars”
(Wiesenfelder 128). Recently the U.S. Department of
Transportation awarded $161 million to the National Automated
Highway System Consortium, a General Motors-led alliance to
“provide fully automatic vehicle operation in dedicated lanes.” The
objective is “to streamline traffic and virtually eliminate highway
accidents” (ibid.—my emphasis).
What would Ballard make of such a smooth mode of circulation, whose express purpose is to reduce accidents to “if not zero—
then close to it?” (ibid.). Is this the point at which a moral structure
becomes totalitarian? Baudrillard protests such a system when he
writes that “we support the concept of road signs when it comes to
sexual distinctions, or to fashion, or to the corruption and disarray
of our values, but we don’t support it when it comes to the realm of
order” (1983: 46).
While busy with Crash, Ballard wrote a journalistic piece
called “The Car, The Future” (1971), which uncannily predicts the
Automated Highway System. By the closing years of the century, he
says, “[i]t seems inevitable that we will gradually surrender our
present freedom to step into our cars and drive where and when we
wish.” This is because “[t]raffic movements and densities will be
increasingly watched and controlled by electronic devices, automatic signals and barriers” (265). Ballard foresees that one of the
first casualties of the twenty-first century will be that symbol of
personal agency, the steering wheel: “the private car will remain,
but one by one its brake pedal, accelerator and control systems, like
the atrophying organs of our own bodies, will be removed” (ibid.).
At the threshold of the digital age, Ballard understood the
deeply symbiotic relationship between mechanical and electronic
technologies. For when considering what will take the place of the
steering wheel, he imagines it is likely to be
a wheel of a different kind—a telephone dial. When our greatgrandchildren sit down in their cars in the year 2050, they will see
in front of them two objects—one that resembles a telephone, the

The Virtual Apocalypse

73

other a telephone directory. The directory will contain a list of all
possible destinations, each with a number that may be dialled.
Having selected his destination, our driver will look up the number and then dial it on the telephone. His signal will be transmitted to the transport exchange . . . [also known as] Central Traffic
Control. (265-266)

This hybrid vision of the future blurs the boundary between highway and superhighway. For even when we fight inertia, and decide
to change location, we still do so through electronic mediation.
Viewed from above, our highways have hitherto resembled the
movement of bits of data around the infobahn. In Ballard’s automated highway, however, the fractal model of the Internet is
replaced by a centripetal processing-station. Obviously, such a rigorously defined system would rob the car of its very essence: the
illusion of freedom. But as Ballard reminds us, the automobile provides other kinds of freedom than mobility, including the “perverse”
freedom to kill ourselves—or others—by terminal velocity. After all,
the crash is “almost the only way in which one can now legally take
another person’s life” (Ballard, 1975: 37).
One person who relishes such a freedom is the protagonist of
Ballard’s abject text, Crash. Vaughan is a self-styled “modern martyr of the superhighways” (1975: 162). Formerly a computer specialist who worked on the “application of computerized techniques
to the control of all international traffic systems” (ibid.: 53-54), he
became a morbidly fetishistic MD with the desire to literalize his
Freudian death-“drive.” In doing so, Vaughan abandons a corporate-sponsored quest for order to embrace the necrophiliac-nightmare logic of the car crash.
The Canadian filmmaker David Cronenberg (who filmed Crash
in 1996) has often explored the dynamic between a dionysian
attraction to chaos and the social drive toward order.14 As both “our
foremost theoretician of viral sex” (Dery, 235), and “the filmmaker
of terminal identity” (Bukatman 80), Cronenberg was really the
only candidate for the job. Asked about one of his earlier movies,
Shivers (1975), Cronenberg replied: “I had read Norman O. Brown’s
Life against Death . . . in which he . . . discuss[es] the Freudian
theory of polymorphous perversity. . . . Even old Norm had some
trouble when he tried to figure out how that kind of Dionysian consciousness would function in a society where you had to cross the
street and not get hit by a car” (ibid.: 277). Crash is an explicit
treatment of this very conundrum. The only truly dionysian
response, it concludes, is to let yourself get hit.
An entire discipline has mushroomed around Ballard’s excremental book, which is essentially about a group of people who see

74

After the Orgy

the highway system as an amoral structure, and certainly have no
interest in negotiating it “in complete safety.” In Jünger’s terms, the
inhabitants of Ballard’s story are the alienated subjects of this “second” and “colder” consciousness, which evolved simultaneously (and
in order to cope with) the dehumanizing conditions of the industrial
age.
Described by its author as “the first pornographic book based
on technology” (Juno 98), Crash exhibits the “clear equation . . .
between sex and the kinaesthetics of the highway” (Ballard, 1975:
147). The characters are in search of “a new sexuality born from a
perverse technology” (10), manifested in the violent conjunction of
flesh, celluloid, and chrome. Ballard’s fetishistic text is obsessed
with the juxtaposition of body and machine, especially when mediated through the lens. The Bataillean notion of an unconscious
yearning for fusion—a nostalgia for a lost continuity—is taken to
its late twentieth-century conclusion in Crash, where people press
their genitals into dashboards in a humourless parody of the urge
to mate with machinery:
[Vaughan] moved around the car, marking the profile of his penis on
the doors and fractured windows, on the trunk lid and rear fender.
Carrying his penis in his hand to shield it from sharp metal,
Vaughan climbed into the front seat and began to draw the outline
of his penis against the instrument panel and centre arm-rest, marking out the erotic focus of a crash or sex-act, celebrating the marriage
of his own genitalia and the skull shattered dashboard binnacle
against which the middle-aged woman dentist had died. (13)

The interchangeable properties of “car crash or sex-act” highlight
the historical flirtation between Eros and Thanatos. Unlike Sade,
however, Vaughan is willing to push the thanatic asymptote over
the line into his own literal death.
Bukatman believes that Ballard’s major accomplishment is to
have created a character who “seeks joyful synthesis with precisely
those objects that . . . reinforce the discontinuous experience of
being” (293). Bodily fluids thus comingle with engine oil to create
an explosive and transcendent cocktail, which takes alienation into
previously unexplored “posthumanist” territory.
In 1976, Baudrillard published a piece praising Crash. It has since
been smothered in an avalanche of criticism accusing him of being
both “dangerously partial and naïvely celebratory” (Sobchack,
1991: 327). Yet it remains illuminating, if only as a cracked mirror
reflecting a distorted image of Ballard’s text.
Perhaps Baudrillard’s most contentious claim is his assertion that

The Virtual Apocalypse

75

[t]here is no affectivity behind all this: no psychology, no ambivalence
or desire, no libido or death-drive. Death is a natural implication in
this limitless exploration of the possible forms of violence done to the
body, but this is never (as in sadism or masochism) what the violence
purposely and perversely aims at, never a distortion of sense and
sex . . . . There is no repressed unconscious. (314)

Such an interpretation leapfrogs the familiar psychoanalytic models that seek to explain extreme behavior. The book evacuates all
motive and emotion, reflecting the author’s belief that we must
transfigure Freud’s internal libido by projecting it onto the external
world of objects. This is why Baudrillard believes that traditional
descriptions such as “perverted” and “voyeuristic” should not be
applied to the behavior of Crash’s characters, since these concepts
belong to an obsolete order: “There is no possibility of dysfunction
in the universe of the accident; thus no perversion either. The
Accident, like death, is no longer of the order of the neurotic, of the
repressed, of the residual, or of the transgressive; it is the initiator
of a new manner of non-perverted pleasure” (315). The libido is not
projected onto the outside world, but leaks into the mind from outside, via technology. The carnage in Crash is thus offered as something other than a return of the repressed.
Graeme Revell implicitly recognizes the novel’s debt to Sade,
noting that “this abandonment of sentiment and emotion is no
cause for regret; rather it has cleared a space for the free play of our
perversions and especially our apparently unlimited capacity for
abstraction” (145). The question of desire in this text is indeed perplexing, since it is both omnipresent and strangely absent, as in the
Sadean universe. Living up to his name, Pan is present everywhere
in Vaughan’s “panicky universe.” He is located, however, not within a pagan or biological impulse, but in the sterile and traditionally unerotic mise-en-scène of the postindustrial Western metropolis:
“This obsession with the sexual possibilities of everything around
me had been jerked loose from my mind by the crash. I imagined
the ward filled with convalescing air-disaster victims, each of their
minds a brothel of images. The crash between our two cars was a
model of some ultimate and yet undreamt sexual union” (23). The
narrator soon becomes overwhelmed with the polymorphous eroticism of his hospital, whose “elegant aluminized air-vents in the
walls of the x-ray department beckoned as invitingly as the
warmest orifice” (34).
Baudrillard believes Crash heralds the arrival of “an
unprecedented sort of sexuality . . . a kind of potential dizziness linked to the pure inscription of the body’s non-existent
signs” (1991: 314). Yet this contrasts sharply with Ballard’s
relentless emphasis on the organic as well as on the technologi-

76

After the Orgy

cal. Although Ballard appreciates the seductive power of the
sign—he talks of crashes releasing codes lying dormant within
us—his keen materialism, based in his love of the dionysian,
refuses to embrace such an intellectual conceit.
Yet Ballard’s novel certainly rethinks the relationship between
technology and transgression in order to update the dionysian
imperative. Discontinuity is no longer something to be negotiated
solely between people, for machinery is now (as McLuhan insisted)
an equal part of the erotic equation. It is even endowed with its own
“machine libido” (Juno et al. 156). Echoing Huysmans’s literary
diagnoses (discussed in chapter 4), Ballard observes that “the social
novel is reaching fewer and fewer readers,” because “social relationships are no longer as important as the individual’s relationship with the technological landscape of the twentieth century”
(ibid.: 99). Indeed, the narrator of Crash explicitly states that he
“realized that the human inhabitants of this technological landscape no longer provided its sharpest pointers, its keys to the border-zones of identity” (40). Where Baudrillard and Ballard diverge,
however, is on whether this meta-alienation is a desirable state of
affairs—that is, whether it results in “a sexuality that is without
referentiality and without limits” (Baudrillard, 1991: 313), or
whether it leads to an extremely messy death.
Baudrillard’s alleged “body-loathing” represents the desire—
shared by both the Australian performance artist Stelarc and the
techno-Darwinian Extropian cult—to transcend the body while
simultaneously (and miraculously) leaving consciousness intact.
(This desire to transcend the flesh did not, of course, originate in
the cyberage. In The Temptation of St. Anthony (1874), Gustave
Flaubert writes; “Aren’t you tired of this body that weighs on your
soul and cramps it like a narrow cell would? Demolish the flesh,
then . . . we shun the flesh, we execrate it” [in Virilio, 1995: 80].)
In contrast, Ballard, who often writes about human resilience,
wants to dismember the present in order to remember the future—
to narrate “a transcendence which is also always a surrender”
(Bukatman 329). He thus seeks to interrogate the apocalyptic
undercurrent of certain techno-tendencies.
The outraged reactions that greeted Baudrillard’s piece suggest that it struck a nerve. His cerebral celebration of the soon-tobe obsolete body provoked his numerous critics to cry, Enough
cyberbole! (Dery, 247). They argued that in celebrating the jouissance of collision, Baudrillard ignores Ballard’s explicit references
to the book’s (albeit elusive) morality. In the introduction to the
French translation of Crash, Ballard writes; “Will modern technology provide us with hitherto undreamed-of means for tapping our
own psychopathologies? Is this harnessing of our innate perversity

The Virtual Apocalypse

77

conceivably of benefit to us? Is there some deviant logic unfolding
more powerful than that provided by reason?” (Juno et al. 98).
Here we can see that Ballard’s book is still firmly rooted in
Freudian territory: for although there may be no emotional depth
behind the actions of Vaughan and his cohorts, there still exist the
contaminated residues of psychology, ambivalence, desire, libido,
and death (categories that Baudrillard rejects). As N. Katherine
Hayles maintains, “desire is not absent. Rather it is reconfigured
and intensified” (322). Desire in Crash is like a spark in the void,
present only when flesh and technology collide.
Considering the terms of this debate, it seems that Ballard
may have underestimated the powers of persuasion wielded by
postmodernists on late-modernist texts. It is certainly naive of him
to state in the same introduction that “the ultimate role of Crash is
cautionary, a warning against the brutal, erotic and overlit realm
that beckons more and more persuasively to us from the margins of
the technological landscape” (Juno et al. 98). Elsewhere Ballard
claims that his “fiction really is investigative, exploratory, and
comes to no moral conclusions whatever” (Revell 43), somewhat
vindicating Baudrillard’s perspective.
Yet we need to beware of “the scandal of metaphor,” as Vivian
Sobchack attests in her famous response to Baudrillard. With reference to her own experience of thigh cancer, she remembers “the
cold touch of technology” on her flesh as “distractions from [her]
erotic possibilities, and not, as Baudrillard would have it, erotically distracting” (1991: 328). Mobilizing her own experience against
Baudrillard’s exponential powers of abstraction, Sobchack warns
against the “self-exterminating impulses” of those cyborg discourses that talk of the body as thought, rather than of my body as lived
(and thus miss the irony and politics of Donna Haraway’s manifesto). Hence her attack on those who seek to transcend the flesh
through a masculinist and masturbatory urge to “beat the meat”
(1995: 209). Sobchack insists a jolt of pain relocates us firmly in our
mortal subjectivity and isolation, countering the sci-fi strategy of
reducing the human to an assemblage of “organs without bodies.”
Despite what Baudrillard (and, to a certain extent, Ballard) would
have us believe, she argues, the crash does not provide an ejective
epiphany outside of our banal alienation.
Since having her leg amputated, Sobchack has produced an
addendum to her essay. “What many surgeries and my prosthetic
experience have really taught me,” she writes, “is that, if we are to
survive into the next century, we must counter the millennial discourses that would decontextualize our flesh into insensate sign or
digitize it into cyberspace” (ibid.: 209). She warns that “if we don’t
keep this subjective kind of bodily sense in mind as we negotiate

78

After the Orgy

our techno-culture, then we, like Vaughan, like Baudrillard, will
objectify ourselves to death” (1991: 329). Her impassioned point is
well taken. Yet to conflate Baudrillard with Vaughan is to misread
the pulse of the issue, since to attack Baudrillard is to assault a
decoy. To criticize an acknowledgment that such a tendency
exists—no matter how cynical or complicit it may be—is something
akin to moral censorship, because it condemns the source of such
urges instead of seeking its meaning. Ballard’s book continues to
fascinate precisely because it both condemns and romanticizes a
cyborgian sexuality. Ethical politics do not thrive in ambivalent
spaces, of which Crash is a prime example. Does this mean we
should vilify it?
Brooks Landon admits that Ballard’s text is something of an
endurance test for more than the intellect: “Reading Crash makes
my knees hurt, my teeth ache, my skin crawl, my stomach churn,
my balls shrivel because—God help me—the book is so perfectly, so
threateningly right, even (gulp) normal” (327). Such bodily reactions say a great deal about its dionysian affiliations. So long as a
body is connected to the brain that reads it, Crash will have a visceral impact. Baudrillard’s “obscenity” was to take the text’s terms
too far: by overemphasizing the technological over the organic, he
thereby scatters the seeds of a “transgressive conservatism.” The
mistake made by his critics, on the other hand, is to overemphasize
a lingering morality in Ballard’s text, and thereby to neglect the
nihilistic power of its amoral world. Hopefully a nascent politics of
exhaustion can be forged between these antagonistic perspectives
on technophilic millenarianism.
Who could deny, however, that by faithfully following the trajectory of western culture to its technological (near) conclusion,
Crash continues the libertine and decadent legacy? By updating its
themes within a familiar dionysian constellation, Crash perpetuates the cult of the artificial, the eroticism of the machine, and the
libidinal tang of apocalypse.

Technol-orgy: From Autogeddon to Infocalypse

Our atrocity, the one that distinguishes us from all others, is
the act of gathering the pieces and running them through a
computer to establish the identity of the dead.
Baudrillard (1983: 43)
It’s all kind of paranoid and audio-visual.

The Virtual Apocalypse

79
Cherry 2000

Crash introduces us to Ballard’s vision of Autogeddon: a vast,
orgasmic car-crash:
The passengers in the airliners lifting away from the airport were
fleeing the disaster area, escaping from this coming Autogeddon.
These premonitions of disaster remained with me. During my first
days at home I spent all my time on the veranda, watching the
traffic move along the motorway, determined to spot the first signs
of this end of the world by automobile, for which the accident had
been my own private rehearsal. (41)

Autogeddon is Ballard’s millenarian vision of the urban landscape
in the twentieth century, which increasingly was “being created by
and for the car” (1996: 262). In case his readers miss the apocalyptic flavor of this concept, Ballard refers to “another cargo of eager
victims—one almost expects to see Breughel and Hieronymus
Bosch cruising the freeways in their rental company cars” (42). In
cosmological terms, it is the big prang: the collective extension of
that drive-in rite de passage that turns the backseat of cars into
“upholstered altars on which virginity is ritually sacrificed” (Dery,
190). Yet for those characters who inhabit the universe of Crash,
Autogeddon is a spectacular cyborgy, which is to be encouraged
rather than avoided.
Vaughan fantasizes with libidinal fervor about the arrival of
Autogeddon: “In his mind Vaughan saw the whole world dying in a
simultaneous automobile disaster, millions of vehicles hurled
together in a terminal congress of spurting loins and engine coolant”
(13). He is not the only one to experience orgiastic anticipation, for
everybody contaminated by the collision is aroused in some sense.
Baudrillard—never one to pass up the possibility of an orgy—quotes
the passage in which a large group of people witness an accident.
Responsive to the “pervasive sexuality [which] filled the air,” they
feel like “members of a congregation leaving after a sermon urging
us to celebrate our sexualities with friends and strangers, and were
driving into the night to imitate the bloody eucharist we had
observed with the most unlikely partners” (1991: 319). The gorestained wreckage becomes a catalyst for a heightened dionysian
awareness. Vaughan is thus both a martyr and a satyr of the superhighways; a “Maldoror of the motorways” (Juno 140).
All of this serves to remind us that—like previous millenarian
prophecies—Autogeddon has failed to arrive on schedule, and thus
we must look elsewhere for the end. Ballard deplores the passing of

80

After the Orgy

the car and the “old-fashioned” idea of freedom it enshrined. “In
terms of pollution, noise and human life the price of that freedom
may be high,” he concedes. “But perhaps the car, by the very muddle and congestion it causes, may be holding back the remorseless
spread of the regimented, electronic society” (1996: 266). In identifying this encroaching evil, he anticipates the next panic site of
apocalyptic rhetoric.
Knowing enough about history to assume that his vision of
Autogeddon will be superseded, Ballard begins to map the way in
which the age of the automobile gives way to the “mysterious scenarios of computer circuitry” (1975: 154): “The wounds on my knees
and chest were beacons tuned to a series of beckoning transmitters,
carrying the signals, unknown to myself, which would unlock this
immense stasis and free these drivers for the real destinations set
for their vehicles, the paradises of the electric highway” (ibid.: 44).
Both the car and the film-projector have collaborated to colonize Western minds in the post-war period. Today, this process is
replicated in the domestic space of the computer workstation. The
premating ritual of sitting shoulder to shoulder and staring
straight ahead at some “reel time” spectacle—whether on the movie
screen or through a windscreen—confers on speed itself a libidinal
inevitability. As Linda Grant notes, “we’re so frightened of sex that
the only way we can involve ourselves with it is separated by a
sheet of glass” (266). The unfolding complicity between the car and
the projector, as witnessed in cybersex, conceals the (profoundly
phallocentric) desire either to crash through the hymenlike impenetrability of the screen, or—as Benjamin would put it—to witness
the car careen out of the screen and into “reality.”
In Crash, slow-motion replays of crash-tests first soothe and
then arouse the narrator. Television cables carry dystopian images
that act as aphrodisiacs to the jaded palates of James Ballard and
his wife, who distractedly consume
[a]ll those scenes of pain and violence that illuminated the margins of our lives—television newsreels of wars and student riots,
natural disasters and police brutality which we vaguely watched
on the colour TV set in our bedroom as we masturbated each other.
This violence experienced at so many removes had become intimately associated with our sex acts. The beatings and burnings
married in our minds with the delicious tremors of our erectile tissues, the spilt blood of students with the genital fluids that irrigated our fingers and mouths. (30—my emphasis)

Traditional warnings against the evils of mediation reach an ironic
zenith in this portrait of “the most terrifying casualty of the century: the death of affect” (Juno et al 96).

The Virtual Apocalypse

81

The Pan-opticon becomes inverted by the citizen of the society
of the spectacle. (“The spectacle is the ultimate commodity in that
it makes all others possible”—Bukatman 37.) Where the subject
once experienced itself as the object of surveillance, now, through
the penetrating presence of technology, the subject is the all-seeing
center in a scopophilic organization of the senses. The possibility of
libidinal burnout is thus heightened through information overload,
the “deadening effect of the mass media” (Guattari 5).
The inherently Apollonian process of vision ensures that such
scopophilic investments are “not libidinal tropisms like any other,
but compromises; coaxing drives into the domesticated state associated with representation,” ultimately funneled into the market
(Land 70). Yet in our image-saturated society, this “compromise”
has usurped all other libidinal possibilities. As a consequence, the
schism between vision and “experience” becomes the locus of erotic
pleasure in an alienating spiral that coils increasingly, and frustratingly, around the self.
Virilio’s “museum of accidents” (also known as “television”)
thus coincides with Ballard’s “atrocity exhibition” (also known as
“the crash”). Hence, due to our “second and colder consciousness,”
shock—like panic—appears anachronistic, for we are too seduced
and tranquillized by mediated stimuli to react in such nineteenthcentury modes. “Nothing’s shocking,” insists Perry Farrell, a musician described by Spin magazine as “Dionysian.”
Susan Buck-Morss comments on Jünger’s belief that this
“second” consciousness is intimately connected to photography,
because the camera lens is an
“artificial eye” which “arrests the bullet in flight just as it does the
human being at the instant of being torn to pieces by an explosion.” The powerfully prosthetic sense organs of technology are the
new “ego” of a transformed synaesthetic system. Now they provide
the porous surface between inner and outer, both perceptual organ
and mechanism of defense. Technology as a tool and a weapon
extends human power—at the same time intensifying the vulnerability of what Benjamin called “the tiny, fragile human body”—
and thereby produces a counter-need, to use technology as a protective shield against the “colder order” that it creates. (138-139)

Vaughan fastidiously enacts Walter Benjamin’s observation that
humanity’s “self-alienation has reached such a degree that it can
experience its own destruction as an aesthetic pleasure of the first
order” (1992: 235). In Crash the ultimate conclusion of this alienated
“colder order” is mass suicide by automobile. Autogeddon is thus not
only the tragic unfolding of this claustrophobic and profane world, but
also its exit. When his car launches off the freeway, Vaughan’s extinc-

82

After the Orgy

tion is just another site where a transgressive act spills over into the
more general desire for “experiential transcendence” (Chidester xi).
Vaughan thus seeks to get up enough speed to reach escape
velocity. In the context of Ballard’s persistent literary efforts to
bring the world to an end (The Drowned World, The Drought, The
Crystal World, etc.), the redemptive agenda of Crash detaches itself
from the colorless horizon of the Shepparton highways. As Ballard
reminds us, “we’re all looking for some sort of vertical route out of
the particular concrete jungle that we live in” (Juno et al. 164).
Yet the crash-site enshrines a sobering reminder of mortality’s
painful relationship to transcendence:
I stared down at this dusty necklace, the debris of a thousand
automobile accidents. Within fifty years, as more and more cars
collided here, the glass fragments would form a sizable bar, within thirty years a beach of sharp crystal. A new race of beachcombers might appear, squatting on these heaps of fractured
windshields, sifting them for cigarette butts, spent condoms and
loose coins. Buried beneath this new geological layer laid down by
the age of the automobile accident would be my own small death,
as anonymous as a vitrified scar in a fossil tree. (Ballard, 1975: 47)

Crash’s pornographic depiction of disaster-footage thus points to
television (and to its multimedia heirs) as that vector of violence
that ultimately—or should that be soon?—replace the asphalt roads
as the biggest killer in industrialized nations. Fully aware of the
possibilities facing the next generation, Ballard ensures that
“Vaughan’s transgressive car crashes have been superseded by the
kinetic appropriation of cyberspace” (Bukatman 294).
What does this mean for someone in front of a computer screen
rather than behind a windscreen? What happens when we are so
fused with the machine that it does not so much shatter around us,
but inside us, as part of us? Just as Ballard’s vision of Autogeddon
anticipates its own updating in Neal Stephenson’s concept of the
Infocalypse, the macro-spectacle of Crash becomes the micromillennial meltdown of Snow Crash.

Snow Crash and Scopophilia

Hiro’s father, who was stationed in Japan for many years, was
obsessed with cameras. He kept bringing them back from his stints
in the Far East, encased in many protective layers, so that when he

The Virtual Apocalypse

83

took them out to show Hiro, it was like watching an exquisite
striptease as they emerged from all that black leather and nylon,
zippers and straps. And once the lens was finally exposed, pure
geometric equation made real, so powerful and vulnerable at once,
Hiro could only think it was like nuzzling through skirts and lingerie and outer labia and inner labia . . . . It made him feel naked
and weak and brave.
Neal Stephenson, Snow Crash (23)

Vaughan is rarely seen without a camera. It is the conductive medium through which all his abject obsessions flow. In our society of
the spectacle, the camera is the essential scopophilic tool. The narrator of Crash remembers Vaughan at night with “nervous young
women in the crushed rear compartments of abandoned cars in
breakers’ yards, and their photographs in the postures of uneasy
sex acts. Their tight faces and strained thighs were lit by his
polaroid flash, like startled survivors of a submarine disaster” (7).15
Vaughan’s fetishistic universe produces, “magnified sections of
lip and eyebrow, elbow and cleavage [that] formed a broken mosaic” (ibid.). He uses celluloid to cut women up in the sinister simulation of car accidents. Discussing the crucial role of the camera in
Crash, Baudrillard notes that “the added depth and the raising of
the visual medium to the second order can, by itself, suffice to fuse
together technology, sex and death” (1991: 317).
In the epigraph to this section, the protagonist of Stephenson’s
Snow Crash (appropriately named Hiro Protagonist) not only
fetishizes the camera, but deflects the gaze back onto the site of its
own production. This maneuver is the same as that made by Des
Esseintes in A Rebours when he eroticizes the train instead of the
journey. As a child of the spectacular society, Hiro discovers the
metapleasures of lens-lust. His world is the twenty-first century,
and thus Hiro takes for granted both the flattening of emotion and
the two-dimensional bodies of the photographed. In the urban
metropolis, the sign itself is paramount, so that the sexy billboardbody is experienced as more real than the model’s “actual” fleshand-blood body. “The generation by [super]models of a real without
origin or reality” (Baudrillard in Ruddick 360) thus enables the
hyperreal to erase the real.
Here we see the conditions that culminate in “death fashion”
(as discussed in chapter 6). This convergence between nihilism and
capitalism recalls Virilio’s assertion that “to link beauty and murder is to create an impasse, a no-way-out situation; it is to stimulate the desire to destroy the world, to ‘finish it off ’” (1995: 19). An

84

After the Orgy

example of this millenarian trend in the marketplace is a 1995
advertisement for Diesel Clothing, which depicts a four-car pileup.
All the victims are young, attractive, impeccably dressed, and
strewn over the road in various states of death or injury.
Kathleen Woodward has noted the “beguiling, almost mesmerizing relationship between the progressive vanishing of the
body . . . and the hypervisuality of both the society of the spectacle and . . . the psychic world of cyberspace” (Sobchack, 1995:
211). Snow Crash acknowledges this relationship by introducing
the simulated bodies of “avatars” in virtual space before dragging
the narrative back into the real world of the flesh. Stephenson
thus replaces Gibson’s Cyberspace with the Metaverse. In this
more pragmatic and prosaic rendering of tomorrow’s Internet,
hackers are no longer merely disembodied digital flows. Instead,
they strut around as avatars—software simulations of their own
bodies in varying degrees of likeness, depending on how much
they can afford and how good they are at programming.
In a time when human roadkill litter the privatized streets, the
Metaverse is a virtual space with relative freedom of movement.
When it was first designed, computer-literate people treated the
Metaverse as a cyberplayground or electronic Eden, and continued to
do so until the general public began to infiltrate their final frontier:
[O]nce the Metaverse began to fill up with obstacles that you could
run into, the job of traveling across it at high speed suddenly
became more interesting. Maneuverability became an issue. Size
became an issue. Hiro and Da5id and the rest of them began to
switch away from the enormous, bizarre vehicles they had favored
at first—Victorian houses on tank treads, rolling ocean liners, milewide crystalline spheres, flaming chariots drawn by dragons —in
favor of small maneuverable vehicles. Motorcycles basically. (354)

At first the Metaverse is likened to Paradise before the Fall.
What destroys it is not an apple but a hypercard, a contaminated piece of software which, once “opened” by the avatar of a hacker, infects the binary “bio-ware” of the brain, and spectacularly
“snow-crashes” their system. The snow-crash virus is a bit-map,
“a series of white and black pixels, where white represents zero
and black represents one” (351). Consequently, computer programmers are particularly vulnerable, since years of binary coding have formed deeply dichotomous structures in their neocortexes. As one character notes, “The corporate assembly line hackers are suckers for infection. They’re going to go down by the
thousands, just like Sennacherib’s army before the walls of
Jerusalem” (126).
(The concept of “language as a virus,” on which William

The Virtual Apocalypse

85

Bourroughs based his oeuvre, is as old as The Iliad, which describes
Proteus as sending Bellerophon to Lycia with “signs of disastrous
meaning, many lethal marks that he wrote in a folded tablet, and
told him to show them to his father-in-law, to ensure his death”
(Virilio, 1995: 27). Gibson’s Black Ice security software—a “kind of
neural-feedback weapon”—also kills those who come into contact
with it like “some hideous Word that eats the mind from the inside
out” (1995: 210).
The disastrous effects of this snow-crash virus confirms
Schivelbusch’s observation that the more efficient the technology,
the more catastrophic its destruction when it collapses (133). Hiro
meditates on the implications of an impending digital plague:
It serves them right, he realizes now. They made the place too vulnerable. They figured that the worst thing that could happen was
that a virus might get transferred into your computer and force
you to ungoggle and reboot your system. Maybe destroy a little
data if you were stupid enough not to install any medicine.
Therefore, the Metaverse is wide open and undefended, like airports in the days before bombs and metal detectors, like elementary schools in the days before maniacs with assault rifles. (351)

Before the advent of snow-crash, victims of a (virtual) fatal situation would be kicked off the system and then have to cope with the
bother of logging on again. This was the closest simulation of death
in the Metaverse. But once the snow-crash virus has been introduced, the phrase “my system crashed” acquires more sinister
implications. For when your computer crashes, so does your brain.
The logical outcome of such a symbiotic relationship is what
Bukatman calls a “terminal identity”:
If Hiro reaches out and takes the hypercard, then the data it represents will be transferred from this guy’s system into Hiro’s computer. Hiro, naturally, wouldn’t touch it under any circumstances,
any more than you would take a free syringe from a stranger in
Times Square and jab it into your neck . . .
“Does it fuck up your brain?” Hiro says. “Or your computer?”
“Both. Neither. What’s the difference?” (44)

In realizing the catastrophic potential of software, Stephenson
not only complements Virilio’s vision of the computer as a bomb, but
also continues the genealogy that links steam to electricity. “At the
beginning,” says a systems and software engineer, “anyone who
could weld metal was putting steam engines together and they
were exploding and killing people all over the place. There was no
science of metallurgy. Software is in that phase now” (Robotham

86

After the Orgy

12). Stephenson depicts the next step, at which software becomes
dangerous not because of accidents, but because it can be used by
terrorists, thereby viewing the Internet as a potential parasite
preying on the human nervous system. Snow Crash thus fulfills
Crash’s urge to meld with the machine, and shows how this leaves
us vulnerable to our own perverted infections.
So what exactly is “snow crash,” and where does it come from? In constructing a complex and layered genealogy throughout his book,
Stephenson traces the history of European civilization and language
back to a Sumerian “metavirus.” Transmitted through language and
culture, it also resides physically inside the brain like the herpes
virus. On account of its Darwinian resilience, the metavirus comes in
many forms, including its newest incarnation in digital binary code:
the snow crash. It is thus the “the atomic bomb of informational warfare—a virus that causes any system to infect itself with new viruses” (200). Stephenson reconciles the biological with the semiotic by
routing transmission through the eyes and into the brain. In doing
so, he opposes Descartes’s cyborg cheerleaders, reminding us that the
consequences of technology are always suffered by human bodies, no
matter how neglected, despised, and denied.
Scientists often wonder where virulent strains go when they
are not wreaking havoc on the general populace. A case in point is
the Ebola virus, which emerges every few years only to “disappear”
again completely. Stephenson’s metavirus lies dormant in that
reservoir of ur-language, the universal biological communication
code. This ur-language can be accessed or unleashed through “glossolalia,” or speaking in tongues: “The twentieth century’s mass
media, high literacy rates, and high-speed transportation all served
as superb vectors for the infection. In a packed revival hall or a
Third World refugee encampment, glossolalia spread from one person to the next as fast as panic” (403).16
Such virulence questions the plausibility of our own survival.
If this metavirus has been with us since the Sumerians, why
haven’t we been wiped out already? What has spared us from
“Infocalypse”? Stephenson’s theory resembles Baudrillard’s paradoxical belief that a plague cannot survive by “totaling” a system—
if a virus is 100 percent virulent it will become extinct for lack of a
host. Humanity’s natural immunity to the metavirus is provided by
“the Babel factor”:
Like mass hysteria. Or a tune that gets into your head that you
keep on humming all day until you spread it to someone else.
Jokes. Urban legends. Crackpot religions. Marxism. No matter
how smart we get, there is always this deep irrational part that
makes us potential hosts for self-replicating information . . . .

The Virtual Apocalypse

87

The only thing that keeps these things from taking over the world
is the Babel factor – the walls of mutual incomprehension that
compartmentalize the human race and stop the spread of viruses.
(400)

Both the metavirus, and language itself, thus spread through
society by means of glossolalia, blood transfusions, and fiber-optic
cables. The snow-crash strain, transmitted electronically through the
twenty-first-century Internet, is therefore susceptible to “accidents”
as defined by Norman Tabachnick, M.D. and his colleagues in the
case of car-crashes: “An accident involves a transfer of physical (or
chemical, or thermal, or electrical) energy between two separate
reservoirs of energy,” they write. “People . . . can be damaged or
destroyed when something without much resilience hits them with
great force or when something very hot or highly charged with electrical energy comes into contact with them” (xii).
Snow crash falls within the bounds of such a definition: “Snow
crash is computer lingo. It means a system crash—a bug—at such
a fundamental level that it frags the part of the computer that controls the electron beam in the monitor, making it spray wildly
across the screen, turning the perfect gridwork of pixels into a
gyrating blizzard” (42). This recalls Ballard’s description of
Vaughan’s “semen emptying across the luminescent dials that registered forever the last temperature and fuel levels of the engine”
(1975: 6). Both writers portray digital disfunction and biological
excess in ejaculatory terms; Ballard literally, and Stephenson
metaphorically (a particularly significant point if we recall
Derrida’s libidinal reading of Revelation).
Within the logic of the narrative, the Babel factor thus plays
the same role in Snow Crash as the accident does in Crash. It
impedes “incessant circulation” by functioning like a spermicide
to prevent the dissemination of information. Yet since hackers of
all nations speak the same language (if in different dialects), the
Babel factor cannot protect the Metaverse. As Baudrillard warns,
“virtual languages” are ways of reinventing “anti-Babel, the universal language, the true Babylon, where all languages are confounded and prostituted one to another” (1996: 90-91). The possibility of highway Autogeddon is thus mirrored by the immanence
of superhighway Infocalypse.

88

After the Orgy

Cyborgies in the Dionysian Landscape

[T]he virtual camera is in our heads. No need of a medium
to reflect our problems in real time: every existence is
telepresent to itself.
Baudrillard (1996: 26)
Now, not everyone has the good fortune to be a machine.
Baudrillard (1996: 84)

One advantage of cybersex—acknowledged by critics and supporters alike—is its apparent immunity to Sexually Transmitted
Diseases. Yet the existence of computer viruses suggests that this
may be just another conceptual Eden waiting for its Fall. If a snowcrash-like virus were to become a reality, then cybersex would carry
all the risks of bodily contacts. Such a possibility plugs into those
tales of mass contagion that have inspired millennial fever from the
Earl of Shaftesbury to Stephenson.
Consider Ng, another Snow Crash character. He was severely
injured in a helicopter crash during the Vietnam war, and now
spends his whole life inside an enormous truck that roams the highways and byways of the post-Ballardian landscape. Whereas
Vaughan experienced psycho-symbiosis with his vehicle, Ng has
actually merged with his truck in a cyborg relationship of interdependency: “Where the driver’s seat ought to be, there is a sort of
neoprene pouch about the size of a garbage can suspended from the
ceiling by a web of straps, shock cords, tubes, wires, fiber-optic
cables, and hydraulic lines” (225). Living inside this pouch like
some kind of cyber-marsupial, Ng terrorizes the roads in the tradition of Convoy (1978) and Mad Max: Road Warrior (1979). “America
is wonderful because you can get anything on a drive-thru basis,”
he remarks. “So this vehicle is much better than a tiny pathetic
wheelchair. It is an extension of my body” (226).
To recall Des Esseintes’s “virtual chair” is to clarify the links
between imagination and artifice, scopophilia and technology.
According to Rodolphe Gasché, Des Esseintes occupies a world in
which he “can withdraw from all aggressions and solidly sensual
acts, a world where sensuous desires are satisfied by illusions and
ingenious trickery, which alter in turn the nature of these desires
themselves” (194—my emphasis). Prosthetically enhanced, Ng is
heir to Des Esseintes’s armchair, while his pouch allows him
access to the Metaverse, where he frequents a Japanese harem.

The Virtual Apocalypse

89

His crippled torso floats in some kind of “pleasure gel,” which simulates the movements of his virtual concubines. Luckily for him,
Ng was never a hacker, and so is not susceptible to the snow-crash
virus. For now at least, he can indulge in his cybersexual fantasies
without fear of contagion.
The prospect of human beings in different parts of the world
dressed in teledildonic data-suits and thrusting into empty air
strikes many people as both pathetic and surreal. Nevertheless, it
has inflamed the erotic imaginations of such diverse groups as corporate designers, filmmakers, postmodern theorists, compulsive
onanists, and cyber-Dionysians (plus combinations thereof). Gerard
Van Der Leun calls sex “a virus that almost always infects new
technology first” (Dery, 218). This view is confirmed by Mike Saenz,
who designs X-rated and interactive CD-ROMS. “Lust motivates
technology,” he says. “The first personal robots, let’s face it, are not
going to be bought to bring people drinks” (ibid.).
The 1987 science-fiction movie, Cherry 2000, takes its title
from a technologically sophisticated pleasure-cyborg, whose lack of
conversational skills is compensated for by the best sexual technique that Silicon Valley has to offer. According to one particularly
sleazy character, her behavior in the bedroom is “like slammin’ an
octopus.” Not being waterproof, she unfortunately short-circuits
during a particularly amorous encounter with her “husband,” Sam
Treadwell, on the sud-soaked kitchen floor: “sorry kid, total internal meltdown.” Although he could buy any replacement model he
chooses—the Bambi 14 (“brand new, never been used”) or the Cindy
990 (“strictly domestic actually . . . below the waist, no-man’s
land”) —Sam romanticizes about the Cherry 2000, believing himself to be in love with her “intangible” qualities. Unfortunately he
must go into the Lawless Zone in order to retrieve another compatible synthetic body before he can install her microchip—that tiny
disc on which her (albeit limited) personality is digitally encoded.
Cherry 2000 thus extends James Ballard’s description of his
wife’s (presumably nonsilicon) breasts as prime examples of “soft
technology” (27).17 Twenty-first-century urban mating-rituals are
portrayed as highly mediated: every sexual encounter between
actual humans is computer-simulated beforehand, and then agreed
to on a contractual basis. Needless to say, spontaneity is one of the
first casualties of this artificial, alienating, and legally binding system. Real women are presented as alternatively confrontational,
shrill, or demanding, which is why Sam Treadwell believes in the
relative authenticity, not to mention the 1950s’ compliance, of his
Cherry 2000.
The link between women and technology in the masculinist
imaginary, discussed by McLuhan in his chapter, “Motorcar: The

90

After the Orgy

Mechanical Bride,” from Understanding Media (1974), is thematized
as the film unfolds. The sex-bot’s body is referred to as “the chassis,”
while one particular model – praised for its “craftsmanship, diskdrive
and pelvic-roll” evokes nostalgia for the days “when Detroit still
cared.” To mention the car capital of America in the context of computer hardware is to emphasize not only the symbolic affiliation
between these two technologies but also the libidinal investments
that sustain and articulate their more mundane applications.
Although the Cherry 2000 is an “advanced” fantasy in the 1980s, in
the year 2017 she has become “a thing of the past . . . . They don’t
make ‘em like this anymore.” The temporal slippage effected by this
futuristic anachronism is to remind us that, with the right tools and
technology, the mode of reproduction can create works of art
which—contra Benjamin—actually do have the aura of originals.
Although present technology is not yet advanced enough to
produce a Cherry-like cyborg, that goal is already on the agenda of
today’s marketeers. The “RealDoll” web site offers glorified blow-up
dolls, made out of silicon and articulated steel skeletons, for around
$4,500. They have names like Stacy and Julie, and according to the
company’s feedback-section perform miracles in the bedroom. After
allegedly having sex on air with his RealDoll, the radio personality
Howard Stern echoed Sam Treadwell’s feelings on this matter:
“Best sex I ever had! I swear to god! This RealDoll feels better than
a real woman! She’s fantastic! I love her!” (http://www.realdoll.com).
René Descartes himself allegedly owned a female automaton
called “Francine”, however we’ll never know the feelings he had for
his proto-Cherry. It is possible, however, that Sam is negotiating
the same philosophical problems concerning sexuality, identity,
knowledge, and truth. To his detractors, Sam insists that “there
was romance” in his sexual encounters with his cybernetic companion, who had “a dreamlike quality about her.” The film’s ultimate message, however—conveyed through Sam’s protracted
seduction by E. Johnson, the “real” female tracker—is that “there’s
a lot more to love than hotwiring.”
Such new configurations of libidinal technology provoke many
questions concerning authenticity, morality, and mediation. For
instance, what would Vaughan have made of virtual reality and
cybersex? Would he have used it to exploit his autoerotic fantasies,
crashing again and again into an avatar of Elizabeth Taylor in
order to experience it from every possible angle without actually
dying? His love of car-porn suggests that he would.
Long before the term cybersex was coined, Ballard (with customary prescience) expressed his belief

The Virtual Apocalypse

91

that organic sex, body against body, skin area against skin area, is
becoming no longer possible, simply because if anything is to have
any meaning for us it must take place in terms of the values and
experiences of the media landscape, the violent landscape—this
sort of Dionysiac landscape of the 1970s . . . . We’ve got to recognize that what one sees through the window of the TV screen is
as important as what one sees through a window on the street
(Juno et al. 157).

This Dionysiac landscape has only intensified from the 1970s to the
present, so that people are still obsessed with Ballard’s famous
equation, “sex times technology equals the future” (ibid.: 164).
Ballard thus saw the car-crash as a “liberation of human and
machine libido,” completing the cathartic function of the media.
The sterile bloodletting that is screened (in both senses) daily in our
lounge-rooms then swivels between Sadean and Bataillean versions of simulated sacrifice. Ballard goes on to raise “the possibility of Vietnam having some good effects, or of car crashes serving a
useful purpose within the societal organism, or of a purgative
aspect to the assassination of public figures, just as there used to be
in ancient ritual murders, and always has been in the death of
charismatic figures” (ibid.: 154).
The most famous car crash of the century killed Princess
Diana. When news broke—in the pre-millennial year of 1997—that
the princess had died in a Mercedes Benz speeding at 196 kilometres per hour, shockwaves extended through the fiber-optic tentacles of the mass media. The first news reports were an unconscious
herald that Autogeddon had finally arrived. Blame focused initially on the paparazzi, who chased her and billionaire boyfriend, Dodi
Al Fayed, into the treacherous Parisian tunnel; and this anger was
maintained despite the revelation that the chauffeur had been both
criminally drunk and unlicensed at the time. Public anger soon
fused with guilt as the realization dawned on the people that their
insatiable appetite for pictures of the princess had fed the supplyand-demand spiral that eventually hounded the princess to death.
In the first few days after the accident, self-flagellation by
both the media and the public became part of the mourning
process. What Haraway has called “the deeply predatory nature of
a photographic consciousness” (1985: 89) rebounded back on to the
global readership: the sacrifice had left blood on the hands of
everyone but the “innocent” princess. Seeing that Diana was the
most photographed person on the planet, the Chinese maxim, “to
have your picture taken shortens your life” seemed to have come to
its logical conclusion.
Any notion that the princess’s death was cathartic, had “some
good effects,” or was the source of “collective satisfaction”

92

After the Orgy

(Baudrillard, 1993: 165), would be reviled by the millions of mourners at her state funeral in London. There is little doubt, however, that
the scopophilic logic that helped cause the accident in the first place
reverberated on a symbolic level throughout the following months
during media autopsies of the event. Rolls of film snapped seconds
after the moment of impact were said to capture a “beautiful”
princess, trapped like a dying swan in the shell of twisted metal and
shattered glass. In fact, Ballard’s novel prefigures this cyber-Ophelia
in depicting a female crash victim around whom “the entire car had
deformed itself . . . in a gesture of homage” (93). Although, these
photos were boycotted by magazines and newspapers fearful of an
inevitable backlash, some of them were to surface in tabloids published outside England. They instantly acquired a mythical status
and abject power over the nation: the masses were going to pay for
their murderous curiosity by resisting the perverse pleasure of seeing their princess’s terminal portrait.
Vaughan would no doubt have eroticized Diana’s demise even
more passionately than Jayne Mansfield’s, for all the elements of
his obsession were present in a heightened and hyperreal form.
Unlike the crashes of James Dean, Albert Camus, or Princess
Grace, the camera-eye was on the scene immediately—and not only
as a witness, but as a major contributing factor. Its probing lens
was pressed up to what little glass remained, finally snapping the
trapped princess—perfectly still, perfectly compliant—in close-up:
in death, the perfect model.
The speed of information, the speed of capital, and the speed of
libidinal projection coalesced in the princess’s sacrifice to her
scopophilic subjects. In Ballard’s terms, this crash was effectively
willed into being by the unconscious groundswell of thanatic desire
and erotic anxiety. For although the pornographic subtext of
Diana’s death was not acknowledged by either staunch royalists or
by the chastised tabloids, it was taken for granted by the explosion
of Internet sex-sites that first claimed to have the grisly paparazzi
pictures (only to admit that they were just trying to attract attention to their banal wares). And those photographs continue to circulate, invisible or obscured, like Bataille’s accursed share within
Baudrillard’s symbolic economy.
Virilio discusses the psychic crisis provided by Virtual Reality technologies, which create the impression that one could throw away
one’s eyes “and still be able to see.” Because “we haven’t adjusted
yet, we are forgetting our body, we are losing it. This is the accident
of the body” (Wilson). Nowadays, “the creation of a virtual image is
a form of accident. This explains why virtual reality is a cosmic
accident. It’s the accident of the real” (ibid.). Hence, in our search

The Virtual Apocalypse

93

for continuity we have thus gone beyond simulation, and split the
real into “actual” and “virtual” dimensions: a profound existential
break. Not content with splitting the atom—the very building
blocks of matter—we also bisect real time, the fabric of consciousness. Can it be a coincidence that both occur at the end of the millennium?
The information age therefore operates with two dominant
scopic models or metaphors for Western culture. One can be represented by the climactic scene of 2001: A Space Odyssey (1968), the
other by the United States’ “smart bombs” of the Gulf War. The first
shows a close-up of the astronaut Dave Bowman’s eye as he is bombarded by images and information. (The vehicle he is traveling in is
also ocular in shape.) He emerges through this experience, like
Marinetti, an evolved being, having climbed up the next rung of
humanity through a transcendent velocity. The second model is a
camera-eye, which processes information right up to the moment it
crashes and explodes. As Judith Butler notes, these weapons are
a bomb with a camera attached in front, a kind of optical phallus;
it relays that film back to a command control and that film is
refilmed on television, effectively constituting the television
screen and its viewer as the extended apparatus of the bomb itself.
In this sense, by viewing we are bombing, identified with both
bomber and bomb, flying through space, transported from the
North American continent to Iraq, and yet securely wedged in the
couch in one’s own living room. (11)

As our fragile mammal brains try to decode signals beamed at us
with increasing speed and accuracy, we find ourselves subject increasingly to Nordau’s “organic wear and tear.” Every generation believes
that it stands at the apex of a culture that is accelerating exponentially. In the early eighteenth century, The Earl of Shaftesbury
observed the negative pressure exerted “when the Ideas or Images
received are too big for the narrow human vessel to contain” (53).
Like us, information wants to be free—free to crash in a thanatic, ecstatic and orgiastic confusion. “When everything rushes at
man,” writes Virilio,
man-the-target is assailed on all sides, and our only salvation now
is to be found in illusion, in flight from the reality of the moment,
from the loss of free will whose advent Pascal evoked when he
wrote, “Our senses cannot perceive extremes. Too much noise
deafens us, too much light dazzles . . . . Extreme qualities are
our enemies. We no longer feel anything; we suffer.” (1995: 132)

Take, for instance, Kathryn Bigelow’s movie, Strange Days

94

After the Orgy

(1995). The harrowing rape scene—in which a woman is forced to
experience the subjectivity of her murderer through VR technology —relates to the “smart bomb” or Princess Diana model of culture. Needless to say, it is the more nihilistic perspective. In this
scene—which is essentially a reprise of Michael Powell’s Peeping
Tom (1960)—we witness the apocalyptic convergence of Ballard
and Bataille.
The latter, whose most famous work followed a disembodied eye,
did not address the violence of technologically mediated eroticism,
whereas Ballard (who put the car into carnage and carnality) has
prepared us for this terminal point in our “civilization.” In Bigelow’s
metavoyeuristic rape scene, suicide and homicide, narcissism and
onanism, converge in a libidinal feedback-loop that ultimately leads
to the fragging of identity and the brain-fry of snow crash.
Virilio emphasizes the fact that although “people make fun of
cybersex . . . it’s really something to take into account: it is a
drama, a split of the human being!” (Wilson). Strange Days is one
of the first popular films to explore the implications of such a split.
It follows one day in the life of Lenny, a dealer in SQID
(Superconducting Quantum Interference Devices), who peddles
real-life experiences recorded with highly sophisticated Pan-sensory equipment. These enable the (usually male) customer to virtually rob a store or become an eighteen-year-old girl taking a shower.
His sales pitch insists that “[t]his is not like TV only better. This is
life, it’s a piece of somebody’s life. It’s pure and uncut, straight from
the cerebral cortex. I mean you’re there, you’re doing it, you’re seeing it . . . hearing it . . . feeling it. I’m the magic-man, the Santa
Claus of the subconscious.” Or as sceptics tell him, “You sell porno
to wire-heads.”
Bukatman has discussed the phenomenon of image addiction,
which he believes “might be regarded as a primary symptom of terminal identity” (26). Indeed, he believes such intense dependence
has become “the very condition of existence in postmodern culture”
(69). The desperate behavior of Lenny’s clients in Strange Days supports Burroughs’s claim that the “[i]mage is a form of junk, an addictive substance that controls its user” (Bukatman 75). The consequences of “scoring,” however, simultaneously display the millennial fear of penetration and infection: the image as both drug and
virus. This “cybrid” seems to mutate in the public unconscious as
fast as those postantibiotic superbugs in our oversterilized hospitals.
The events in Strange Days occur not on an ordinary day but
on New Year’s Eve, 1999—an appropriate time for Virilio’s “big
accident.” Most of Lenny’s customers (and indeed Lenny himself)
forego the adrenaline rush of law-breaking for the dionysian

The Virtual Apocalypse

95

rewards of orgiastic “experiences.” The anchors of traditional
morality begin to break loose with the advent of such disorienting
technology. The popularity of these secondhand sexual transgressions, and the irrational violence they unleash, suggests that hitech progress has no trouble in outstripping ethics or “civilized”
behavior. Once again, Pan is the goat in the machine (or so Bigelow
would lead us to believe).
Strange Days supports Ballard’s theory that if “violence, like
pornography, is some kind of evolutionary standby system, a lastresort device for throwing a wild joker into the game,” then a
“widespread taste for pornography means that nature is alerting
us to some threat of extinction” (Juno et al. 156). If so, we have the
key coordinates of libidinal millenarianism, whereby a resurgent
nature—traditionally represented by Pan (or Pan-like tricksters)—will escape from technological repression. As we shall soon
see, A Rebours’ Des Esseintes demonstrates his antagonism to
nature by retreating into the virtual world of vicarious sensory
experience. His fantasies are not explicitly libidinal because he is
already tired of the libertine lifestyle. He lives after the orgy. The
characters of Strange Days, on the other hand, are determined to
recreate, rewind, and replay the elusive orgy, looking for answers
to the future within its sadistic choreography.
Ballard again documents the implications of technological
transgression:
For the first time it will become truly possible to explore extensively and in depth the psychopathology of one’s own life without
fear of moral condemnation . . . . Many, perhaps most of these,
need to be expressed in concrete forms, and their expression at
present gets people into trouble. One can think of a million examples, but if your deviant impulses push you in the direction of
molesting old ladies, or cutting girls’ pigtails off in bus queues,
then, quite rightly, you find yourself in the local magistrates court
if you succumb to them . . . . But with the new multi-media
potential of your own computerized TV studio, where limitless
simulations can be played out in totally convincing style, one will
be able to explore, in a wholly benign and harmless way, every
type of impulse. (ibid.: 159)

The moral of Strange Days, however, is that such technology—far
from being “wholly benign and harmless”—encourages violence
against women in both realms. Ballard does not anticipate a blurring of the boundaries between actual and virtual realities: he
assumes not only that they will remain discrete, but that we will be
able to experience them as such. Consequently, Virilio’s digital accident has enormous implications for our understanding of trans-

96

After the Orgy

gression and how it relates to the artificial. For when virtual reality becomes more powerful than actual reality, every transgression
will have to be reassessed—legally, ethically, and metaphysically.
In a transgressive act, whether real or simulated, the subject
experiences a tearing of the self, and briefly inhabits a liminal and
unstable psychic space. Although the murder-rape scene in Strange
Days causes nausea and panic in those who view it through the
SQID, they nevertheless watch it to the end. Like the viewer of
“smart bomb” technology, they are captivated by their “own”
destruction. This is the ultimate thanatic asymptote.
In one of his Doom Patrols (1997), Steven Shaviro states that
the Apocalypse
may be called virtual (as when we speak of “virtual images”)
rather than actual, since it affects not the immediate experiential
world but “the soul of the world, the world’s dream of itself.” But
such a virtual event is perfectly real, as Deleuze repeatedly says,
even if it isn’t actual; the psychic apocalypse, like a neutron bomb,
may leave physical structures untouched, but it turns human society into a collection of “dead shells, zombie cultures, shambling
aimlessly towards oblivion.”

Ballard’s Crash anticipates its adaptation to the digital landscapes
of the information revolution in the sense that virtual perception—
whether through drugs or SQID trodes—are depicted as Trojan
Horses that we willingly admit into our minds. A different drug,
LSD, is taken by James Ballard to heighten his perception of
impending impact: “This hyper-irritation reminded me of my own
long recovery from a bad acid trip some years earlier, when I had
felt for months afterwards as if a vent of hell had opened momentarily in my mind, as if the membranes of my brain had been
exposed in some appalling crash” (165).
Many characters in Strange Days have a snow-crash-like ending to their image addiction, with their brains frying like eggs. The
utopian promises of virtual reality are hijacked and warped into
dystopian forms in the backstreets of Los Angeles, as an urge to
transcend the limits of the self gives way to the violation of others.
The implicit moral of Strange Days has the same heavily gendered
liberal-humanistic agenda as Cherry 2000’s ultimatum: choose
between the robobabe and the “real” woman. Both films thus
romanticize unmediated sexual congress, displaying a nostalgia for
skin against skin. As Baudrillard says, “contact (as in lenses)”
(1990: 56). As if recalling Franz Kafka’s apocalyptic vision of “souls
who no longer have eyes but only eye sockets” (Virilio, 1995: 157),
or the effects of the meteor-shower in John Wyndham’s Day of the
Triffids, these morality tales for the society of the spectacle dis-

The Virtual Apocalypse

97

pense the traditional Victorian warning: “stop it, or you’ll go blind.”

Carmageddon
The Pope will, of course, not have a hip like God made, but
one that a bio-engineer made.
Gianfranco Fineschi: orthopedic surgeon
(Big Issue, London, May 1994: 4)
Premises of the Machine Age.—The press, the machine, the
railway, the telegraph are premises whose thousand-year
conclusion no one yet has dared draw.
Nietzsche’s diary, 1880 (Waite 153)

I began this chapter by documenting some early reactions to train
travel and to its perceived physical and mental stresses on the
human organism. Nordau, for instance, attributed the “degeneration” of European stock partly to the unprecedented speed and
potential violence of traveling by train. I have traced this thanatic
asymptote to the primal scene of the accident, where the apocalyptic orgy lurks within the telos of techné.
Techné—Martin Heidegger’s “danger that saves”—seems both
more dangerous and closer to salvation in the symbolic space of our
information age. As framed by Don DeLillo’s White Noise (1985),
“This is the whole point of technology. It creates an appetite for
immortality on the one hand. It threatens universal extinction on
the other. Technology is lust removed from nature” (285). As we
reinternalize technology, we find that the natural and the artificial
fuse once again—this time in the dionysian flux of (snow) crash. In
this context, each new generation of the apocalyptic code is constricted by the flaws and bugs of the one before.
As I write there is a computer-game on the market called
“Carmageddon”, in which the object is to kill as many people as possible. Extra points are awarded for spectacular multiple homicides,
and for sideswiping aged pedestrians. It is an antisocial example of
Hakim Bey’s Temporary Autonomous Zone, a virtual place in which
people can enact ethically unsound urges without fear of the law. As
an adrenaline-fueled footnote to Ballard’s novel, it is the latest in a
long line of decadent texts that “satyrize” the innuendo locked within technology’s “standing reserve.” The trick is to know when to
save, before the game crashes itself and erases any evidence of

98

After the Orgy

progress.
If Pan is the goat in the machine, as I have repeatedly claimed,
then he represents a digital refiguration of the Sadean perspective
of nature—nature as mandate and prohibition, Eros and Thanatos,
liberator and oppressor, master and servant. This premise does
more than merely reconcile apparent opposites. It recognizes the
impossibility of being “against nature.” One can only be against
human nature, that is to say, culture.
Each of the texts I have examined might be considered as a
trace of DNA found on the corpse of God. From this molecular
Dionysian-Nietzschean ambience, we can reconstruct a crime that
rages against history, and yet constitutes the compost for its renewal. Ironically, the fearful anticipation of an apocalyptic end is thus
the engine of history itself, which continues on its way like the battered participants in a crash derby.
The amnesiacal journalist, Steve Erickson, has written that
“technology is the only faith remaining after politics and religion
have betrayed us.” Technology and sex will continue to converge
“until a vague new sexual gestalt infiltrates the labyrinth of all our
libidos, including those of us who stay the fuck away from the
Internet” (53). The redemptive potential of technology, however, is
less important than the epiphany created by its spectacular crash.
This is why the blockbuster movie, Speed (1994), struck such a
chord with audiences: it was a metaphor for their lives in a
Kamikaze Culture, in which to dip below fifty miles an hour is to
explode (see also Joseph Natoli’s Speeding to the Millennium on
this point). The task of the average young urbanite is to steer the
deadly projectile of existence into “the highways of the mind”
(McLuhan, 1974: 113). Yet even though we remain glued to our
ergonomic chairs and seventeen-inch computer screens, physically
not going anywhere at all, we nevertheless demand speed. We pay
large sums of money to upgrade our processing speed, to buy more
time so we don’t have to stare at Microsoft’s hourglass-cursor, which
reminds us of our mortality by keeping us in digital limbo. As
Baudrillard has said, “[a]t more than a hundred miles an hour,
there’s a presumption of eternity” (Ross 21).

4

Decaying Forward:
Satiety and Society

Thunder against it. Complain that it is not poetic. Call it a
period of transition and decadence.
Gustave Flaubert’s entry for “Epoch (our)”
in his Dictionary of Received Ideas
In history as in nature, the rotten is the laboratory of life.
Karl Marx (Weiss, 90)

One of the most valuable documents about the nineteenth-century
fin de siècle is Max Nordau’s wide-ranging polemic, Degeneration.
Published in German in 1892 as Entartung, and translated into
English three years later, this book champions the progressivist liberal-humanism of its author against such classic decadent texts as
J.-K. Huysmans’s A Rebours. Offering a basic taxonomy of “degenerates,” it classifies these “aberrant” people as either “mystics” or
“egomaniacs,” and identifies them as enemies of the Enlightenment
project. The degenerate is treated with a clinical eye for dissection
and diagnosis (indeed, Nordau was a physician). If we consider the
Victorian context of his observations, it should come as no surprise
that his prescriptions focus on symptoms rooted in various sexual
pathologies. Nordau’s importance stems from the fact that he
argues against his age’s libidinal millenarianism, while simultaneously perpetuating its terms and concerns.
Nordau compares the fin de siècle mood to “the impotent
despair of a sick man, who feels himself dying by inches in the
midst of an eternally living nature blooming insolently forever”
(3). Sex and death are further intertwined when he describes this
cultural pathology as equivalent to

99

100

After the Orgy
[t]he envy of a rich, hoary voluptuary, who sees a pair of young
lovers making for a sequestered forest nook; it is the mortification
of the exhausted and impotent refugee from a Florentine plague,
seeking in an enchanted garden the experiences of a Decamerone,
but striving in vain to snatch one more pleasure of sense from the
uncertain hour. (ibid.)

Nordau’s definitions of “healthy” and “sick” circle around a shared
territory (“the uncertain hour”), which is both liminal and libidinal.
All further diagnostic distinctions emerge from this highly charged
and ambiguous rhetorical space.
Believing that eroticism “includes precisely the most characteristic and conspicuous phenomena of degeneration,” Nordau cites
Richard Wagner and other “higher degenerates” as exemplary victims of “erotic madness” (182). His Darwinian argument then
traces this madness to two historical forces, which merge in the
middle of the nineteenth century to create a degenerative effect in
those who are too weak to assimilate change. The first force is time
itself, which healthy men acknowledge as a force indifferent to
human measuring systems, such as the calendar. The marking of
time, however, nevertheless suggests to impressionable and mystically inclined minds the supernatural patterns of divine plans,
pointing toward some kind of conclusion. Nordau argues that just
because we have to know what day it is in order to conduct our daily
business, we shouldn’t instill the years with numerological significance. For him, the approaching twentieth century thus becomes
burdened with the “childish” projections of fatalistic fantasies. This
delusional tendency is further aggravated by the second historical
force, namely, the rapid industrialization of Western Europe.
Nordau argues that this unprecedented historical leap reinforces a
sense of cultural acceleration, whether this is interpreted as directed toward a brighter future or a dark abyss.
The cultural effect of these combined forces is thus an overwhelming fatigue. The late nineteenth century inherited stress fractures caused by the exhaustion of the previous generation, which had
to cope with “this enormous increase in organic expenditure” (39):
Humanity can point to no century in which the inventions which
penetrate so deeply, so tyrannically, into the life of every individual are crowded so thick as in ours . . . . The humblest village
inhabitant has to-day a wider geographical horizon, more numerous and complex intellectual interests, than the prime minister of
a petty, or even a second-rate state a century ago. If he do but read
his paper, let it be the most innocent provincial rag, he takes part,
certainly not by active interference and influence, but by a continuous receptive curiosity, in the thousand events which take place

Decaying Forward

101

in all parts of the globe, and he interests himself simultaneously
in the issue of a revolution in Chili, in a bush-war in East Africa,
a massacre in North China, a famine in Russia, a street-row in
Spain, an international exhibition in North America. A cook
receives and sends more letters than a university professor did
formerly, and a petty tradesman travels more and sees more countries and people than did the reigning prince of other times. (ibid.)

This extract provides a wealth of material on nascent forms of
democratization, globalization and “future shock,” all of which continue to inform public debates on cultural health at the beginning
of the twenty-first century. Moreover, it points to an earlier “information revolution”—which ran parallel to the industrial revolution
—anticipating today’s “screen fatigue,” “empathy burnout,” Chronic
Fatigue Syndrome, and other fin de siècle analogues.
Nordau preempts subsequent diagnoses on the social body:
All these activities, however, even the simplest, involve an effort
of the nervous system and a wearing of tissue. Every line we read
or write, every human face we see, every conversation we carry on,
every scene we perceive through the window of the flying express,
sets in activity our sensory nerves and our brain centres. Even the
little shocks of railway travelling, not perceived by consciousness,
the perpetual noises, and the various sights in the streets of a
large town, our suspense pending the sequel of progressing events,
the constant expectation of the newspaper, of the postman, of visitors, cost our brains wear and tear. (ibid.)

According to Nordau’s depiction of modernity, culture races ahead
of its subjects in a macro-political version of jet lag, described as the
process whereby “our stomachs cannot keep pace with the brain
and nervous system” (ibid.). The decadent “aesthetic schools” of
thought are represented as hysterical symptoms resulting from
“the excessive organic wear and tear suffered by the nations
through the immense demands on their activity, and through the
rank growth of large towns” (43).
But this should not be mistaken for a sympathetic diagnosis,
clearing the ground for some kind of social welfare program or policy change. Instead it merely confirms those processes of natural
selection that necessitate the survival of the fittest.18 Since Nordau
believes that the bodies of the “less vigorous” fill the “ditches on the
road of progress” (40), the targets of his contempt are degenerates
who lie in those ditches, singing drunkenly to the stars.
Definitions of “decadence” are notoriously ambiguous. Decadence can
be alternately Apollonian, Dionysian, Christian, pagan, masculine,

102

After the Orgy

feminine, chaotic, controlled, refined and/or debauched, depending
on whom you choose to believe at the time. In his own definition,
Mario Praz (1960) signals the inherently millenarian character of
decadence as an attraction to disaster:
The very ideas of Decadence, of immanent Divine punishment like
the fire of Sodom, of the “cupio dissolvi,” [the desire to dissolve], are
perhaps no more than the extreme sadistic refinements of a milieu
which was saturated to excess with complications of perversion.
In process of time it has become possible to see that it was a question of mental attitude, of a momentary dizziness on the brink of
a precipice, which, epidemic as it was, soon wore itself out . . .
the year 1900 no more marked the date of a cataclysm than the
year 1000. (1960: 416)

In his book on Decadence and the Making of Modernism (1995),
David Weir cites the compelling definition, “decline at its peak”
(174), after quoting the Russian poet Vyacheslav Ivanov on how
decadence is “the feeling, at once oppressive and exalting, of being
the last in a series” (5). The convergence of these two definitions—
a kind of negative climax alongside a conflicting sense of finality—
is where I begin my analysis of the nineteenth-century fin de siècle,
particularly as it relates to Huysmans’s A Rebours.
Much has been written about this book, often on account of its
status as the singular artifact of “a one-man movement” and as
what Brian Stableford calls “the Bible of would-be Decadents of all
kinds” (1992: 1). The novel’s slim narrative tells the story of a
fatigued degenerate (in Nordau’s terms) called Duc Jean des
Esseintes, who isolates himself in a domestic version of Charles
Baudelaire’s “artificial paradise” in order to perversely enjoy the
stagnation of self, outside and “against the grain” of Parisian social
life and the planet’s natural rhythms. (The decadent notion of “self”
is complex, and revolves around the Baudelairean project of aestheticizing the self into an objet d’art through techniques of artifice.
The “manufactured self” was to become less subversive, particularly after F. T. Marinetti, once its links with capitalistic subjectivity—
the “self-made man”—were clarified. In other words, the artificial
dandy is easily absorbed into the corporate cyborg.)
Like Sade’s protagonists, Des Esseintes attempts to create his
own “Temporary Autonomous Zone” (a notion I explore further in
chapter 6) in order to act out his disgust with the tyranny of natural processes. Having found no satisfaction in the debaucheries of a
decadent lifestyle, the duke withdraws into the neurotic sphere of
his own libidinal solipsism, magnifying and distilling the ennui of
the 1880s into an extremely idiosyncratic text. This decision could

Decaying Forward

103

be seen as a particularly acute case of the more general “repetitious, masturbatory response to chronic, low-grade anxiety which
leads in turn to boredom and guilty withdrawal” (Levin, 1996: 200).
Des Esseintes cultivates black plants, which grow into ugly, tumorous shapes; he takes his meals by enema in order to thwart the natural design of the body; he thrives on illusion, courting ventriloquists and filling his aquarium with mechanical fish. If there was
ever a character to represent a life “after the orgy” it is Des
Esseintes.
David Weir notes that “the backward glance seems implicit in
the concept of decadence: all is before, nothing is after” (5). Indeed,
Des Esseintes seems to be merely killing time before he dies, since
he doesn’t have the courage to kill himself. But Weir goes on to
refute such an interpretation, focusing instead on those dynamic
properties which lurk in decadent works like dormant seeds.
Indeed, he quotes Matei Calinescu, who reminds us that “[a] high
degree of technological development appears perfectly compatible
with an acute sense of decadence. The fact of progress is not denied,
but increasingly large numbers of people experience the results of
progress with an anguished sense of loss and alienation. Once
again, progress is decadence and decadence is progress” (11). This
seemingly paradoxical process enables Weir to claim that
Huysmans influenced James Joyce and other modernists who radicalized literature in the first half of the twentieth century, and to
reaffirm Herbert Marcuse’s point that “the term ‘decadent’ far more
denounces the genuinely progressive traits of a dying culture than
the real factors of decay” (1986: 60).
Controversial in content, the form of A Rebours was equally
troubling to readers who were disturbed by its flagrantly antinaturalist approach to representing time and the unfolding of events.
Where Stendhal thought of the novel in general “as a mirror
dragged along a highway” (Virilio, 1995: 44), Huysmans saw it as
an inverted telescope connecting the navel to the vast, mouldy canvas of history. The story in A Rebours is less a sequence of episodes
than a series of set pieces, which could be rearranged with no damage to the ensuing “plot.” Some critics have been perceptive enough
to see the book’s lack of direction as an integral part of its thematic concerns, rather than as evidence of flawed technique. Indeed
Weir draws on established scholarship to conclude that a sense of
“overness at the outset” (94)—a kind of historical Doppler effect—
is embedded into the very structure of A Rebours.
In identifying a psychology of belatedness (155) as an essentially decadent characteristic, Weir not only invokes Nordau’s
organic lag, but also echoes the claim that decadence “means no
more than a morbid complacency in feeling oneself passé” (Weir 6).

104

After the Orgy

“When the period at which a man of talent is condemned to live is
dull and stupid,” Des Esseintes confesses, “the artist is, unconsciously to himself, haunted by a sensation of morbid yearning for
another century” (Huysmans 168). The duke’s “postorgy” predicament thus testifies to the fact that the only thing worse than feeling that you missed the party is having actually been there and
found that it wasn’t so great. Unlike the Proustian principle, which
would dominate Western literary models of time in the twentieth
century, there is no nostalgia here for one’s own past; instead, Des
Esseintes yearns for another era, or so it would seem.
When A Rebours was first published, Barbey d’Aurevilly wrote
that “for a decadent of that force to have been produced, and for
something like M. Huysmans’ book to have sprouted in the head of
a human being, it would have to be necessary for us to have become
what we are—a race in its final hour” (Weir 85). And yet, according
to d’Aurevilly, this final hour had been stripped of its traditional
significance before the Second Coming, because the fin de siècle
was nothing more than “the dress rehearsal of the Last Judgement
without king or god” (Shaffer 139).
In the late nineteenth century, the second law of thermodynamics seemed to have a cultural counterpart, signaled by an outbreak of
malaise—the entropic heat-death of sociality. It prefigured Albert
Einstein’s theory of relativity, whereby time decreases in inverse
proportion to velocity. As Nordau noted with genuine concern, “[w]e
stand now in the midst of a severe mental epidemic; of a sort of black
death of degeneration and hysteria, and it is natural that we should
ask anxiously on all sides: ‘What is to come next?’” (537).
Such anxieties about the end of history—coupled with a nostalgia for more poetic times—are familiar in the millennial discourses of our own times. The decadents were a species of apocalyptic harbinger, repeating the familiar “end is nigh” mantra, but
with a new tone influenced by the Marquis de Sade, Arthur
Schopenhauer and other nihilistic (i.e., more secular) philosophies
of declining civilizations. Initially attracted to its anti-Christian
rhetoric, Friedrich Nietzsche would renounce such intellectual posturing in his last published work, Ecce Homo (1888), as simply “the
will to the end” (96).
While there are obvious parallels between then and now, Weir
distinguishes between the laments of late-nineteenth-century aesthetes from the historical predicament of postmodernists:
[S]omehow the cultural millennium never arrives, and the age
that succeeds a decadent period is always decadent itself in turn.
The postmodernist, multiculturalist condition expresses, I believe,
the same paradoxical nostalgia for the millennium that Flaubert
felt, except that now the old hope for a new cultural world seems

Decaying Forward

105

perpetually forestalled by the apocalypse of the past.
Flaubert and Baudelaire both thought of decadence as transition; to them, their age was in decay, but at least it was decaying forward. (202)

Weir goes on to note that postmodernism is “engaged in an active
pursuit of a prior condition in order to apprehend the present”
(198). Indeed, he asks, “what is progress now but a desire to go
backward to a time when it was possible to go forward? Progression
à rebours illustrates that even those with the best intentions are
destined for decadence” (203).
According to Weir, then, contemporary decadents pine for those
days when the avant-garde was a distinct cultural force, and exhibited fertile regenerative powers precisely through its decadence, by
decaying forward, in a kind of compost-effect. Des Esseintes, an
important precursor to this dynamic energy, longed for a degenerative momentum located—for him—in late Roman times. (Indeed, à
rebours can also be translated as “countdown,” further complicating
the relationship between anticipation and exhaustion.) In tracing
the roots of modernism to the decadents, Weir presents degeneration and regeneration as the two poles in a cultural feedback loop
that initially fosters progress, and then creates the illusion of
progress. This relates to Marx’s belief that “time is everything, man
is nothing; he is no more than the carcase of time” (Brown, 1970:
272). Of course it also evokes his famous view that history repeats
itself, the first time as tragedy, and the second time as farce. But
what of the third, fourth, and fifth times? And what if it really
began as a farce in the first place?
A particularly insightful essay by Rodolphe Gasché (1988) reconciles the differences between these two poles, and problematizes the
notion that the last fin de siècle believed itself to be decaying forward. According to Gasché, the stagnation of history first occurred
neither in Berlin in 1989, nor in Paris in the 1920s, but in Fontenay
in 1881; the year in which Huysmans began work on A Rebours.
(This book was not translated into English until 1922, although it
is referred to in Oscar Wilde’s Picture of Dorian Gray [1891] as a
text with viral properties.)
By interpreting A Rebours as primarily a “wake over the essence
of time” (189), Gasché fully exposes the latent lateness of Huysmans’s
text. Des Esseintes’s self-isolation, coupled with his fetish for historical artifacts, is interpreted as the desire to experience change in its
purest form, rather than as nostalgia for one “ideal” moment of history. This is in stark contrast to Nordau’s argument that the world was
changing too fast for its human population to keep pace. For Des

After the Orgy

106

Esseintes, the emerging technologies do not represent cultural
progress, but instead the ironic Sadean legacy of human obsolescence.
Gasché insists that Des Esseintes does not mourn past ages,
and indeed Huysmans himself leaves the question open in a letter to
a friend: “I do not care for the period in which I live, and . . . from
time to time I seek an escape route into the ‘beyond’” (Beaumont 60).
This “beyond” is not constituted by the zeitgeist that produced his
favourite authors or painters. Instead it relates to a “nostalgia for
the present” (Jameson). Gasché characterizes it thus:
Des Esseintes does not mourn past ages. Nor does he dream of a
future that would resemble a past characterized by fullness and
harmony. He is nostalgic of epochs that serve as a transition
between other epochs. As they have no other substance than that
of their fleeting time itself, they thus represent time and history
in their purest form, as the very essence of change. (188)

Literally, Des Esseintes’ emblematic historical consciousness
“amounts to an end of time itself,” so that the object of his nostalgia is “historical formation in general as a thing past” (189). To use
a simplistic metaphor, Des Esseintes didn’t so much miss the boat,
as the stream that carried it. Looked at in this way, the theoretical
lens of libidinal millenarianism can help us to avoid barnacled
interpretations of decadence and degeneration as merely the excreta of progress. Linear and fatalistic histories, such as the Christian
narrative of Revelation, are thus complicated by the decadent
agenda. What does it mean to be “after” in an age of profound temporal confusion? By placing Des Esseintes’s homage to the artificial
in the context of an attempted “redemption from matter” (199),
Gasché sees such a project as unfolding in the uncanny silence
before the storm of twentieth-century politics. All of which prompts
us to ask the question, If Huysmans did not see the world as decaying forward, where did he think it was heading?

De-fragging the Self
Mystics, but especially ego-maniacs and filthy pseudo-realists,
are enemies to society of the direst kind. Society must unconditionally defend itself against them . . . . There is no place
among us for the lusting beast of prey; and if you dare return
to us, we will pitilessly beat you to death with clubs.
Nordau (557)

Decaying Forward

107

In separate letters to friends, Huysmans paints a couple of telling
self-portraits. The first, composed during a break from writing
A Rebours, reports, “[s]omething strange! Since we have been suffocating in this heat, the bit of old rag I have had in my pants these
months has picked itself up, and here I am, fornicating away furiously. It must be the beginning of general paralysis, what else can
it mean?” (Beaumont 49). Read on its own, this salacious confession
conveys that nervous energy preceding total collapse that is a millenarian motif. When combined with the second portrait, however,
it provides a conducting rod between decadence and the technological core of my topic: “Ah, such fine news: on the one hand I have a
stomach upset and on the other, neuralgia. How inferior this
human machine is, compared to man-made machines. They can be
de-coked, unscrewed, oiled and parts replaced. Decidedly, nature is
not a very wonderful thing” (Beaumont 76). Because Des Esseintes
is practically impotent, the narrative of A Rebours is thoroughly
post-coital. The only thing that excites his loins is hard artifice
(technology) or soft artifice (illusion and simulacra). Anticipating
the disorienting logic that would preoccupy much of Jean
Baudrillard’s work, Des Esseintes delights in the fact that any
waterfall “can be imitated by the proper application of hydraulics,
till there is no distinguishing the copy from the original” (22). This
continuum between hard and soft artifice—united in the concept of
techné—informs all libidinal millenarian practice.19
The logic of Nordau’s “organic wear and tear” leads Des
Esseintes to take his food via an enema: “his predilection for the
artificial had now, and that without any initiative on his part,
attained its supreme fulfillment! A man could hardly go farther;
nourishment thus absorbed was surely the last aberration from the
natural that could be committed” (9). The exhaustion of the body,
combined with the exhaustion of all perverse possibilities, heralds
a twofold apocalypse experienced as a personal crisis.
This Cartesian crisis—whereby the subject’s mind rebels
against the degeneration of his own body—climaxes in the teachings and behavior of the Heaven’s Gate cult. Whereas many religions attribute bodily urges to the “foreign influence” of the flesh
(as a kind of enemy within), Marshall Applewhite portrayed the
body as a vehicle, a biological computer. Because this “container”
had to be flushed out regularly in order to keep the mechanisms
working, every week he administered Des Esseintes-like enemas to
his followers: a combination of lemonade, cayenne pepper, and lowgrade maple syrup.
This practice was portrayed by the media as a barbaric and
pagan ritual. Yet to characterize it in this way is to obscure the fact
that the ideologically loaded behavior of Des Esseintes and

108

After the Orgy

Applewhite is a direct tributary of scientific worldviews.
Eighteenth and nineteenth-century western science had the dual
effect of “naturalizing” the body (we became highly evolved animals, not profane angels) while simultaneously “technologizing”
the mind/body equation so that the human organism came to be
seen as increasingly machinic. According to this model, the heart is
no more than a pump, and the brain an advanced computer.
Long before Arnold Schwarzenegger appeared in Terminator,
the human body was a cyborg, a techno-organic hybrid. This paved
the way for a complex flow of ideas between proto-Freudian models
of getting to “the root” of problems, and surgical metaphors suggesting that medicine is really just human mechanics. One implication is the possibility of disassembling the body in order to
cleanse it of base sexual urges, whether through castration (as was
the case with some Heaven’s Gate disciples) or Huysmans’s dream
of decoking the self.
Gasché discusses Des Esseintes’s painful dental experience in
such terms:
[S]ince the result of this operation is a joyful sensation of feeling
“ten years younger and taking an interest in the most insignificant things” . . . spiritualization may reveal itself to be a function of a violent extraction of the lower material substratum, here
a tooth, whose phallic symbolism is clearly stressed throughout
the novel. What this episode establishes is that idealization in fact
presupposes extraction, castration, or decapitation, in short, the
removal of everything material and sensual from the body. (200)

This sensation was shared by at least one Heaven’s Gate follower,
who expressed his feeling of liberation after being surgically castrated (Gegax 39).
Huysmans is thus an important hinge between Sade’s embrace
of sexual artifice and the neomystic impulse to sublimate the sexual, surgically or otherwise. The orgiastic ramparts of Castle Silling
are thus linked to the celibate workstations of Rancho Sante Fe.
The degenerate, as portrayed by Nordau, suffers from a pronounced
sexual orientation, labeled erotomania (169). This affliction is diagnosed as symptomatic of the “morbid exhaustion” (43) of the fin de
siècle, and is linked to the explosion (in both senses) of new technologies. The degenerate is depicted as a weak-minded mystic,
trapped in a vicious cycle of perverse self-projection. Consequently,
[h]e attains to a state of mind in which he divines mysterious relations among all possible objective phenomena, e.g., a railway
train, the title of his newspaper, a piano on the one hand, and

Decaying Forward

109

woman on the other; and feels emotions of an erotic nature at
sights, words, odours, which would produce no such impressions
on the mind of a sound person . . . . Hence it comes that in most
cases mysticism distinctly takes on a decidedly erotic colouring,
and the mystic, if he interprets his inchoate liminal presentations,
always tends to ascribe to them an erotic import. (61)

It is thus significant that Richard Wagner—one of Nordau’s
“higher degenerates”—inspired Nietzsche’s The Birth of Tragedy
(Through the Spirit of Music). In 1872 Nietzsche was captivated by
his compatriot’s compositions, which he believed displayed the synthetic powers of the great Greek dramatists. But when Nietzsche
became more positive and puritanical, his enthusiasm for the fragile condition of being “classically decadent” gave way to his promotion of progress over degeneration, and health over sickness.
Wagner’s vision of Art as the Sapphic ménage-à-trois of the Muses
(Nordau 180) was altogether too romantic for the middle-aged
Nietzsche, who detected in such metaphors the sentimental stench
of the corpse of Christianity.
Although Weir believes that Nietzsche provided a “complete
paradigm of antidecadence” (133), his writings nevertheless constitute the most comprehensive map for exploring decadence and its
relation to art and history. With characteristic immodesty,
Nietzsche claims to “have a subtler sense for signs of ascent and
decline than any man has ever had” (1979: 39). Weir thus aligns
himself with Camille Paglia in assuming that “decadent and
Dionysian art are contraries.” He goes on to state that
Nietzsche does not reject decadence even though he sets himself
against it. Rather, it is the decadent who rejects the Dionysian,
and a key element of Dionysian art is the quality of overfulness or
abundance that can include decline, decadence, negation . . . .
Again, the decadent and the Dionysian are opposed, but it is the
decadent who is “doing” the opposing because of his passive attitude of rejection and negation. (134-5)

Like Nietzsche, however, the French decadents appreciated the
transcendental impulse behind the Hellenic fusion of Dionysian
themes within Apollonian forms. This is why Huysmans and others
often looked to the pagans for answers to the death of God. They
also adapted Sade’s virulent nihilism to a far more lethargic epoch,
when the Enlightenment was beginning to dim. The decadents
were thus the most visible in a long line of “panic merchants” who,
by perpetuating the mythical powers of the god Pan, explicitly
linked the goat-god with an eroticized apocalypse.
To Nordau, Nietzsche was an ego-maniac, and therefore a

After the Orgy

110

degenerate like Huysmans and all the others. Recent scholarship,
however, places Nietzsche in direct opposition to such a lineage.
Huysmans was a latent Catholic. Obsessed with the superficial
transgressions of Satanism, he was thus trapped in the same (albeit
inverted) transcendental structure that Nietzsche despised. This
shows us that the “red thread” of my Dionysian genealogy inevitably
becomes tangled in the footsteps of historical interpretation, and that
distinctions between debauchery and refinement cannot account for
those antithetical affinities that lie dormant in such texts.
This debate, which is largely semantic, circles around interpretations of artifice, and around its role in either assisting or hindering the perceived flow of time. The key concepts—entropy,
degeneration, decadence, and eroticism—form a constellation
around the Sadean support of artifice. As a result, any discussion of
millenarian ideas are sucked into the dionysian density of such a
concept, and A Rebours’ attempt to consistently foil mother nature
leads to Des Esseintes’s apoplectic apocalypse.

Technologies of the Flesh
There is an affinity, or at least a synchrony, between a culture of boredom and an orgiastic one.
Jacques Derrida (1995: 35)
Sex is worth dying for.
Michel Foucault (1990: 156)

In her chapter on Huysmans, Paglia writes that “A Rebours (originally called Alone) is Romantically self-contained, its linguistic energy
invested in internal sexual differentiation. Its words are thronging
multiples, spores of competitive identity. The whole, subdividing into
fractious parts, makes love to itself” (436). In its onanistic multiplicity, the text performs a kind of linguistic orgy, enacted through the
medium of language. For Huysmans, as for Georges Bataille, eroticism ultimately emphasizes our alienation, solitude, and mortality. It
is thus to be used as a (self-)destructive weapon.
In contemplating a painting by Gustave Moreau, Des
Esseintes sees Salome, that “goddess of decadence” (Showalter
149), in her true colors:
[Salome] was now revealed in a sense as the symbolic incarnation

Decaying Forward

111

of world-old Vice, the goddess of immortal Hysteris, the Curse of
Beauty supreme above all other beauties by the cataleptic spasm
that stirs her flesh and steels her muscles,— a monstrous Beast of
the Apocalypse, indifferent, irresponsible, insensible, poisoning,
like Helen of Troy of the old Classic fables, all who come near her,
all who see her, all who touch her. (53)

Woman, and by association sexuality, represents the traditionally
apocalyptic consequences of eroticism. This is elaborated further in
the proto-Surrealist nightmare sequence, where Des Esseintes is
literally hounded by a woman with a bulldog face and vagina dentata. Here the duke’s hysterical symptoms spill out into his dreams
to confront him in horrific and vivid detail. Visions melt and merge
until he finds himself in a “hideous metallic landscape” (92), where
Salome’s sister-spirit, Syphilis, pursues him into a feverish awakening. A psychoanalytic reading could find a wealth of material
here to justify labeling Des Esseintes (and by extension Huysmans
himself) a neurotic and hysterical misogynist. I would point out,
however, that such a conclusion would depend upon a notional
“return of the repressed,” which has become far too convenient in
the post-Foucauldian theory-scape.
In the first volume of his History of Sexuality (1990), Foucault
debunks what he calls the “repressive hypothesis”: the dominant
notion that the Enlightenment centuries attempted to control sexuality through medical and judicial policies of silence, denial, evasion, surveillance, and punishment. As a revisionist historian,
Foucault sets out to demonstrate that the nineteenth century actually produced what we now call “sexuality”, and did so by means of
a centerless power structure that operates through horizontal
mobility rather than vertical pressure. Far from being silenced,
sexuality was compelled to speak, and in increasingly delineated
terms. This process, which Foucault calls “the deployment of sexuality” (106), was achieved via the institution of confession. The
effect of such “polymorphous techniques of power” (11) is to actually create the object of study, rather than reveal it. As a result, “sexuality” is not a secret essence to be prized from our closet, but something actively produced by such a search.
(I make this point not in order to repress the reality of repression, as it were, but merely to emphasize the discursive origins of
its undeniable power. In their different ways, post-Franco Spain,
contemporary Japan, and the Heaven’s Gate cult all provide compelling evidence for the power of released repression. This does not
weaken Foucault’s argument, however. Because the repressive
effect is a major element in the deployment of sexuality, it results
in a kind of self-fulfilling prophecy.)
In tracing the history of the “singular imperialism that compels

112

After the Orgy

everyone to transform their sexuality into a perpetual discourse”
(33), Foucault links the deployment of sexuality to the legacy of
Sade: “the most defenseless tenderness and the bloodiest of powers
have a similar need of confession. Western man has become a confessing animal” (59). From such a perspective, Des Esseintes’s
dream—not to mention Huysmans’s text—are not pressure valves
letting off repressed steam, but part of that “dense transfer point”
(103) between people, now known as “sexuality.”
The “disfunctionality” of decadent sexuality cannot be overemphasized, especially when viewed through Foucault’s framework.
Des Esseintes’s experiment, however, rejects that proto-Freudian
model that views sexuality as the skeleton key to physical and mental health. Instead, it is seen as the source of our degeneration,
through revulsion and disease. For William Blake the road of
excess led to the palace of wisdom, but for Des Esseintes it led to
his own House of Usher.
Huysmans’s nightmare vividly rejects the notion that transcendence is to be found in the climactic epiphany of orgasm.
Indeed, his waking hours are dedicated to avoiding sexuality and
its syphilitic effects. Nordau’s organic fatigue makes no exception
for the genitals, and Huysmans’s tale of libidinal entropy speaks of
an apocalypse that comes not with a bang, but a whimper. Death is
barely kept at bay in Fontenay, and Des Esseintes lives in those
agonizing moments after the orgy, but before the test results.
The Dionysian economy of expenditure is thus forced to keep
pace with a new emotional stock market, whereby erotic investments can inflate out of control or render us bankrupt. The legacy
of Des Esseintes’s experiment can thus be found in today’s apocalyptic discourses about the global drop in sperm-counts or the GenX game of HIV Russian Roulette. All this leads us back to Nordau,
and particularly to his critique of the decadents’ perspective on the
end of history: “They do not direct us to the future, but point backwards to times past. Their word is no ecstatic prophecy, but the
senseless stammering and babbling of deranged minds . . .
spasms of exhaustion” (43). And as happens with many deathbed
scenarios, repentance isn’t too far behind.
In his analysis of A Rebours, Stableford discusses the central character’s “climactic repentance” (1993: 28) at the end of the novel, which
(he believes) foreshadows Huysmans’ own conversion to Catholicism.
One of Huysmans’s contemporaries, Barbey d’Aurevilly, was quoted
as saying that “[a]fter such a book, it only remains for the author to
choose between the muzzle of a pistol or the foot of the cross”
(Huysmans xlix). Huysmans’s decision to take the less drastic option
resonates with Nietzsche’s belief that “one is not ‘converted’ to
Christianity—one has to be sick enough for it” (1982: 637).

Decaying Forward

113

On one level, the novel can certainly be read as celebrating the
impossibility of living a truly decadent lifestyle, and as thus, echoing
Baudelaire’s belief that those who seek artificial paradises end up
creating private hells (Stableford, 1993: 19). The power of A Rebours,
however, comes largely from the fact that—like J. G. Ballard’s Crash
(1975)—it is too ironic and ambiguous to be contained within such
moral prescriptions.
Perhaps projecting his knowledge of Huysmans’s subsequent
actions on to the character of Des Esseintes, Stableford seems to
mistake defeat for repentance—although there is no doubt that they
are closely akin. In the closing pages of A Rebours, Des Esseintes
deplores the filth and squalor of the fin de siècle in terms remarkably similar to those of his future critic, Nordau, although from an
ideologically different position. Forced to return to Paris under doctor’s orders, Des Esseintes contemplates his painful reinsertion into
the social body. Burdened with the weariness of hereditary hysteria,
the duke tries in vain to find solace in apocalyptic visions:
Could it be that to prove once and for all that He existed, the terrible God of Genesis and the pale Crucified of Golgotha were not
going to renew the cataclysms of an earlier day, to rekindle the rain
of fire that consumed the ancient homes of sin, the cities of the
Plain? Could it be that this foul flood was to go on spreading and
drowning in its pestilential morass this old world where now only
seeds of iniquity sprang up and harvests of shame flourished? (206)

In the final pages of Degeneration, Nordau also presents us with a
dystopian vision of the imminent twentieth century, as taken from
the fever-charts of the mal du siècle:
Sexual psychopathy of every nature has become so general and so
imperious that manners and laws have adapted themselves accordingly. They appear already in the fashion. Masochists or passivists,
who form the majority of men, clothe themselves in a costume
which recalls, by colour and cut, feminine apparel . . . . Sadists,
“bestials,” nosophiles, and necrophiles, etc., find legal opportunities
to gratify their inclinations. Modesty and restraint are dead superstitions of the past, and appear only as atavism and among the
inhabitants of remote villages . . . on the stage only representations of unveiled eroticism and bloody homicides, and to this, flock
voluntary victims from all the parts, who aspire to the voluptuousness of dying amid the plaudits of delirious spectators. (539)

Nordau’s prophecy is uncannily accurate. Many of his predictions
appear along the decadent trajectory I myself am tracing—from
Rimbaud to Rambo, Baudelaire to Baudrillard, J’accuse to Jacuzzi

114

After the Orgy

(in Todd Gitlin’s words), society to satiety, and seminality to senility.
All are inscribed with the legacy of libidinal millenarianism.
Unlike Huysmans, however, Nordau depicts an even more
degenerated future only in order to destroy it with the “scientific”
weight of his optimism. Nordau’s optimism rests on two beliefs:
first, that the feeble will perish and the strong will survive, and second, that posterity will develop some kind of remote control for coping with the speed of history. If letters were to be suppressed, railways scrapped, telephones banished, papers delayed, and fashioncycles slowed down, the nerves would have an opportunity to
rebuild. By the end of the twentieth century, we would probably see
[a] generation to whom it will not be injurous to read a dozen
square yards of newspapers daily, to be constantly called to the
telephone, to be thinking simultaneously of the five continents of
the world, to live half their time in a railway carriage or in a flying machine, and to satisfy the demands of a circle of ten thousand
acquaintances, associates, and friends. (541)

This generation is certainly with us today. The promised rest period, however, has not been forthcoming (and I don’t think that financial crashes are what Nordau had in mind). Although we have our
fingers on various buttons—the nuclear, the panic, the fast-forward
—no-one can locate the slowdown option.
In our own fin de siècle we encounter discourses of degeneration through a kind of “entropic acceleration.” This time, however,
they have an even deeper sense of cynicism. If Hillel Schwartz is
correct in noting that the last decade is to a century as the last century is to a millennium (xvii), then we can backdate this new phase
to the postcoital endism of Huysmans. Thus the industrial revolution, which preempted today’s much trumpeted “information revolution,” was itself preceded by the printing press and mercantile
circulation. These revolutions masked the emergence of yet another—the sexual revolution of the scientia sexualis. Such moments
are distinct, but not conveniently sequential. It is an old but
durable point that revolutions turn like wheels.
Foucault’s history of sexuality revolves around these historical
revolutions, tracing the “technologies of the flesh” in the nineteenth
century to the production of libido through language. Concurrent
fears about technological invasions of the body produced a sense of
exhaustion and depletion that had an abrasive effect on the soft
underbelly of Progress. Decadent subjectivity was thus a cynically
flirtatious negotiation between secular pessimism and religious
optimism, interpreted superficially as a decaying forward. As Des
Esseintes discovered, transgression no longer guaranteed a shortcut to transcendence. Nevertheless, sexuality was still seen as the

Decaying Forward

115

key to a future that many decadents faced with a combination of
boredom, anxiety, and impatience.
Foucault draws attention to the fact that “Today it is sex that
serves as a support for the ancient form—so familiar and important
in the West—of preaching” (1990: 7). Preaching, prophecy, confession, repression, revelation, and liberation, are thus terms that
cluster around “this millennial yoke.” When sex becomes inseparable from the problem of truth, all modes of uncovering and revelation become eroticized. As Paglia notes, “Western narrative is a
mystery story, a process of detection. But since what is detected is
unbearable, every revelation leads to another repression” (7). Is it
surprising, then, that when decadents gave up on the Second
Coming and the Revelation of God’s Truth, they looked for answers
in the lascivious dance of Salome and her seven veils? What they
didn’t realize is that both options issued from the same libidinal tissue.
The 1960s were similarly entranced by libidinal routes to the
promised land, and fell into similar traps of complicity, appropriation, and delusion. The “sexual revolution” was primarily a millenarian reading of history, which smuggled much older metaphysical modes into the heart of modernity. As Foucault notes, “[s]omething that smacks of revolt, of promised freedom, of the coming age
of a different law, slips easily into this discourse on sexual oppression. Some of the ancient functions of prophecy are reactivated
therein. Tomorrow sex will be good again” (1990: 7).
In the 1960s the psychology of belatedness began to give way
to a more urgent cultural agenda. The orgy was back.

This page intentionally left blank.

5

Cosmic Architects

Maybe it was sentimental, if not actually stupid, to romanticize
the sixties as an embryonic golden age. Certainly, this fetal age
of enlightenment was aborted. Nevertheless, the sixties were
special; not only did they differ from the twenties, the fifties,
the seventies etc. they were superior to them. Like the
Arthurian years at Camelot, the sixties constituted a breakthrough, a fleeting moment of glory, a time when a significant
little chunk of humanity briefly realized its moral potential and
flirted with its neurological destiny, a collective spiritual
awakening that flared brilliantly until the barbaric and
mediocre impulses of the species drew tight once more the
curtains of darkness.
Tom Robbins (248)

Several decades after the event, baby boomers continue to sit
behind “the curtains of darkness,” trying to shed some light on this
magical-mystical decade. This quote from Robbins’s Jitterbug
Perfume (1990) clearly displays the rhetorical double-movement
made by many survivors of the sixties counterculture; obliged to
dismiss or disown romanticized recollections, and yet, more often
than not, doing just that themselves later in the same paragraph.
This era (which was obsessed with traditional Western mythical
narratives) managed to found an industry dedicated to churning
out its own narcissistic myths of the sixties. Even the term the sixties functions today—after several nostalgic revivals—as an
omnipresent Rorschach blot on to which people project their own
meanings and/or memories.
As the steady trickle of memoirs continues into this new millennium, the task of “uncovering” the sixties—of scraping away the
sands of time and the misty myths of the media—becomes
increasingly archaeological. In Hippie Hippie Shake (1995),

117

118

After the Orgy

Richard Neville presents his book as a “warts and all” analysis, as if
most other veterans had forgotten to take off their rose-colored glasses along with their kaftans. To strip away the myth, however, does
not uncover some uncut truth or reality, for this is the elusive secret
ingredient that held everything together. As Todd Gitlin says in a
book simply entitled The Sixties (1987), “the outcome and meaning of
the movements of the sixties are not treasures to be unearthed with
an exultant Aha!, but sand paintings, something provisional, both
created and revised in historical time” (433). The sixties was always,
and continues to be, a self-conscious conversation with itself.
The mythical glue that was used to fashion that chaotic time
into a coherent narrative was reapplied in the 1990s by people as
ideologically opposed to one another as Germaine Greer, Camille
Paglia, Harold Bloom, Timothy Leary, and Richard Neville. The
Sixties has consequently become a shorthand term pointing to a
multiplicity of contested meanings and moments, and the revisions
of these over time. Many social and political battles have since been
pushed to the wayside in the artificial process of fitting history in
to clearly demarcated, and morally legible, decades. (Did the sixties
really end in 1970? Or begin in 1960?)
In this chapter I turn to some very specific texts and technologies
that have served as a rhetorical hinge between the decadence of the
1890s and the millenarianism of the 1990s. Some readers may believe
it is a little premature—or even ambitious—to be conducting an
archaeological expedition into the 1960s. Excavating the libidinal
traces of certain rhetorical strategies, however, is an important task
in relation to the discussion at hand. Significant figures and struggles
are necessarily absent in my selection of voices that speak of the
sexual and nuclear revolution, mainly because I seek to uncover a
particular stance toward these key moments that qualify as
dionysian. Through a recontextualization of Norman O. Brown and
Herbert Marcuse, among others, we can forge a greater understanding of the sixties’ influence on today’s millenarians. (Perhaps
it is no surprise then, that such narratives are launched, on the
whole, by the characteristic dionysian: male, embittered, American
or European, educated, and relatively economically privileged.) To
scrutinize the warts of the sixties—and indeed there were plenty—
is less important, however, than to understand a turbulent time
that spent as much energy on pinpointing a stable collective identity
as on trying to dissolve the rigid structures of society.
In terms of historical symmetry, the sixties came a generation too
early. As Angela Carter quipped, “the fin is coming a little early this
siècle” (Showalter 1). On the face of it, the sixties zeitgeist had more
in common with that of the late nineteenth century than our own.

Cosmic Architects

119

Certain parallels between the swinging sixties and the naughty
nineties have been identified by critics such as Terry Eagleton,
drawn to the fact that “[s]exual and political emancipation were
once more in the air, late-Victorian Simple Lifers returned in the
guise of hippies, the Aesthetes and Decadents were with us again
in the shape of consumer hedonism” (1990: 42).
The telescoping of two distinct historical periods is a common
journalistic tactic, and presumes the existence of an atemporal cast
of characters that move from one century to another like chesspieces. However, Eagleton goes on to highlight the differences
between these epochs, reminding us that we must also resist the
temptation to find transhistorical similarities. Because the world
changed more in the two or three generations that separate the
1890s from the 1960s than in any other seventy-year period in the
whole of human history, we should think carefully before pronouncing the resurrection of cultural “types.”
In the 1960s many young people certainly read Charles
Baudelaire and Arthur Rimbaud in rooms adorned by William Morris
and Aubrey Beardsley. Marcuse tells us that “the new boheme, the
beatniks and hipsters, the peace creeps—all these ‘decadents’ now
have become what decadence probably always was: poor refuge of
defamed humanity” (1973: 16). Just as the decadents and symbolists
had reacted against a hypocritical Victorian morality, so students in
the 1960s were challenging the stifling constraints of 1950’s prudery.
And in another parallel, this new “turn to the subject” was “caught
up, sometimes contradictorily, with the emergence of great collective
political movements” (Eagleton, 1990: 43).
Many seeds planted in France in the 1880s and 1890s blossomed
on the other side of the Channel and the Atlantic in the 1960s. The
Flowers of Evil so beloved by European decadents were aestheticized
by the flower children into a more traditional and accessible notion
of beauty. The torture-garden was weeded and tended until it became
a place appropriate for family picnics. The literary obsession with
deflowering (symbolized by Hades’ sexual attack on Persephone as
she gathered flowers) was replaced by a more general interest in
reflowering. The peace movement’s image of the young hippie woman
placing a floral tribute in the barrel of a soldier’s gun succinctly and
symbolically reversed the dominant Sadean fantasy, distorting it into
a form of antiphallic penetration. In this spirit, flower-power became
the pastoralist alternative to a mechanistic, materialistic and
militaristic worldview.
Thus, the language of the fin de siècle was appropriated and
adapted for new socio-political contexts. Since similar battles had
been waged before, it seemed more appropriate to borrow from a
well-established dissident vocabulary than to invent a totally

120

After the Orgy

new one. Nineteenth-century writers (most notably Karl Marx)
provided a general archive for sixties radicals. Although national
boundaries enclosed specific political genealogies, their lingua
franca was sexual activity and political activism.
Yet, just as some looked over their shoulders to draw inspiration from the past, others nurtured a millenarian appetite to
destroy all existing structures and start afresh, as this anarchosurrealist manifesto makes clear:
Long live the New Guinea tribe who, aware of the stupidity of
technological civilization, massacred the managers of a washingmachine factory, took over the building and converted it into a
temple for the marvellous but elusive Rabbit-god . . . . As liberated souls (and we are, for our quest cannot be stopped now) we
have necessarily an historically enviable role as cosmic architects
armed with hammers, electric guitars, and apocalyptic visions,
but more significantly, armed with the exhilarating knowledge
that we are able to crush systematically all obstacles placed in the
way of our desires and build a new EVERYTHING. (Nuttall 63-65)

This extract dramatizes the unresolved conflict of coexisting desires in
this period: the pastoral dream of returning to the garden, and the
utopian fantasy of starting afresh on some seductive new planet.
Some were in search of an Arcadian Utopia, others a Utopian Arcadia.
The dialectical pattern of the sixties was produced by traditional
tensions between the always-already and the never-before.
The most visible sign of these upheavals was the so-called sexual revolution. In a time as idiosyncratic and divided as the sixties,
it may seem misguided (or even a little Apollonian) to identify the
principal force that galvanized the various agendas of this decade.
According to the myth-makers, however, almost all political idealism
was refracted through sexual liberation. As a common graffiti of the
time phrased it, “Revolution is the orgasm of history” (Grant 172).

Immaculate Contraception
America’s political need is orgies in the parks, on Boston
Common and in the Public Gardens, with naked bacchantes
in our national forests . . . . I am not proposing idealistic
fancies, I am acknowledging what is already happening
among the young in fact and fantasy, and proposing official
blessing for these breakthroughs of community spirit . . . .
What satisfaction is now possible for the young? Only the
satisfaction of their Desire—love, the body, and orgy.
Allen Ginsberg (Nuttall 191-192)

Cosmic Architects

121

Have you walked down Haight Street at dawn and talked
with the survivors? The Street reeks of human agony,
despair and death, death, death.
From the Boston Avatar (Nuttall 194)

The end of the American sixties also signaled the end of The Orgy
in the Baudrillardian sense. It was a time when the carnal fused
with the carnivalesque to produce both the “sexual revolution”
and its more overtly political configurations. Women in particular
began experimenting with a new language that celebrated and
encouraged the unprecedented access to, and understanding of,
their bodies as specifically and politically sexual. Gay men also
began to find a collective voice in which to press for an identitybased sexual politics. From a certain post-AIDS perspective, however, the sexual revolution somehow “failed” to deliver its promise
of lasting social change. Enjoyable at the time, it did not succeed
in opening exits from sexually restrictive institutions like the
state, religion, capital, and family.
In the sixties, emancipatory narratives were still de rigueur,
although with the benefit of hindsight we can see that the concerts
and love-ins were more concerned about negation than affirmation.
They were against the war, against the church, against the politicians,
against repression and oppression, against the older generation, and
against normalizing moral systems. It followed that they were for
peace, for anarchy, for liberation, for youth, and for “whatever turns
you on.” To try to identify which came first—action or reaction—is not
another chicken-and-egg question. It enables us to understand how
the (positive) negation of fear and revolt hatched the (negative)
affirmation of the orgy.
The erotic common denominator of collectivity is the organizing
principle behind Michel Maffesoli’s study, The Shadow of Dionysus
(1993).20 “Orgy,” in his usage, includes carnivalesque manifestations
of the popular, and not just the prosaic permutations of group sex. It
denotes the presence of an “obscene constant”: a transhistorical
means of “stating the problem of sociality or alterity” (2). In tandem
with Georges Bataille, Maffesoli presents the orgy as the matrix of an
instinctive urge for fusion: “[it is] an ‘affective’ nebula, a tendency
toward the orgiastic or Dionysian. Orgiastic explosions, cults of
possession, and fusional situations have existed in all times. But
sometimes they take on an endemic allure and become preeminent
in the collective conscious. On whatever subjects may be, we vibrate
in unison” (xv).
The orgy is presented as a quasi-organic economy, a “red
thread” that not only bonds the individual to the community but
also ties the past to the present. Maffesoli thus develops Sigmund

122

After the Orgy

Freud’s point that the aim of Eros is making one out of many in the
drive toward ever larger unities. Like the American Indian potlatch—the sacrifice of a community’s wealth in a joyous ceremony—the orgy is a sacrifice of spiritual surplus, a burning of excess
libidinal energy. Indeed, “the group expression of desire, as a
metaphor for the discarding of privacy and possessiveness, has
never seemed more utopian to our acquisitive age” (Grant 129).
Maffesoli attempts to reconcile the individual experience of
sexual pleasure with a transcendent communality:
It is certain that the circulation of sexuality, the initiatory bursting of the self, orgiastic effervescence, and collective marriages all
refer to the ex-stasis, to going beyond the individual level onto a
larger ensemble. It is striking to find that the domestication of
mores, individualized culture, diverse socio-economic changes, as
well as scientific and technical developments, have in no way lessened this impulse to wander. (6)

In the sixties it certainly increased the instinct to ramble. Rock
concerts and love-ins are two obvious examples of the return of the
orgiastic. Others include the student activist who, when asked
what it was like to be behind the barricades in Paris, May ’68,
replied, “I fucked 15 girls!” (Neville, 1971: 62). To these instances
we could add Jeff Nuttall’s interpretation of the Elvis Presley riots
as a “revengeful rediscovery of the Dionysian ceremony. He was
the idol in a literal sense, a deity incarnate on the old primitive
pattern, the catalyst of a rediscovered appetite for community in
its fundamental form, orgastic [sic] ritual” (30).
Such eruptions represent Maffesoli’s “passional logic” which,
“like a subterranean switchboard, defracts into a multiplicity of
effects that inform daily life” (1). This logic points toward “a confusional order,” an orgiastic injunction which, instead of challenging or
subverting the Apollonian structures of the social, completely ignores
them. But this confusional order, which Bataille found so disorienting, has an almost transcendent potential for Maffesoli:
In the orgy continuity cannot be laid hold of; individuals lose
themselves at the climax, but in mingled confusion. The orgy is
necessarily disappointing. Theoretically it is the complete negation of the individual quality. It presupposes, it even demands
equality among the participants. Not only is individuality itself
submerged in the tumult of the orgy, but each participant denies
the individuality of the others. All limits are completely done away
with, or so it seems, but it is impossible for nothing to remain of
the differences between individuals and the sexual attraction connected with those differences. (129)

Cosmic Architects

123

Perhaps psychedelic drugs aided the sense of confusion in the sixties,
a time now characterized as a concerted (not to mention conceited)
groping toward Maffesoli’s vision. This orgy should not be considered
an atavistic reaction to (post)modernity, but something developing
alongside it—society’s “shadow part.” This new modulation of the
Dionysian would understand that “the technological innovation of
the future will put itself at the service of the body” (11).
There is no “after the orgy” for Maffesoli because society
always displays a fusional impulse. Before sex, drugs, and rock ’n’
roll there was wine, women, and song (just as today there is intercourse, Internet, and industrial music). As Maffesoli is at pains to
point out, the orgiastic is not a rational fantasy of reducing the
Many to the One. Instead, it “allows to be the different passions
that animate everyday life in all their diversity” (1993: 86).
Viewed historically, Maffesoli’s study is a sophisticated
attempt to transplant the sixties’ sexual rhetoric of Brown, James
Hillman, Wilhelm Reich, and others, into the more labyrinthine
environment of poststructuralist theory. In one sense it is a throwback; in another it illustrates the extent to which the present is still
overshadowed by Dionysus. The enemy can no longer be identified
as the monolithic targets of Capital or Repression, just as the subject
can no longer be considered a stable political agent. The basically
Manichaean-repressive model of sixties’ sexuality gives way to
Michael Foucault’s less coherent libidinal landscape, in which all the
obvious power-sources and reference-points have been disguised or
dismantled. Sexuality continues to nurture subversive potential, but
not on the macrocosmic scale it once promised. Instead, “libidinal
activism [is now] . . . a practice of jouissance defining a microsphere
of resistance and action allowing societies to perdure” (xxiv).
But what prompted this Dionysian eruption of sexuality into the
public sphere? To identify it as the inevitable return of the
repressed does not answer the question of why the repressed chose
to return at that particular moment. Any historical contextualization of the extended Summer of Love must take into account two
global technologies: the atomic bomb and the oral contraceptive
pill. The baby boomers were the first generation who could expect
not only to be obliterated in a nuclear holocaust but also to have sex
without risk of pregnancy (something former contraceptive methods
could not guarantee with such confidence). While it is certainly true
that nuclear anxiety characterized much of the late 1940s and 1950s,
it is the combination of these technologies that becomes decisive in the
1960s. Armageddon was now a military option, always on the brink
(outside Japan and colonial test-sites) of spilling out of apocalyptic
imagination and into reality. The profound existential fear of a

124

After the Orgy

nuclear holocaust coincided with an unprecedented amount of sexual
freedom to spawn a unique moment in history, while simultaneously
mirroring the liminal excess of other millennial moments.
The promiscuity of this time was predicated on a multiplicity of
possible Ends, especially the end of the world and the end of sex as a
biological imperative. There was a sense that this could indeed be
Apocalypse Now. The bacchic behavior that has come to symbolize
the sixties evokes the popular etymology of “carnival” as carne-vale
(farewell to flesh). Consequently, libidinal millenarianism celebrates
the finitude of life, and the miracle of mortality. As Nuttall remarks,
rampaging teenagers indulged in “temple ceremonials of the futureless” (30). Whatever route to extinction they took, many boomers
decided to live up to their name and go out with a bang.
In the modern era, writes Foucault, “sex became a crucial target
of a power organized around the management of life rather than the
menace of death” (1990: 147). Both nuclearism and fertility research
have been conducted under the sign of scientific advancement, and
have quarantined their activities from medieval notions of death.
Foucault again makes the salient point: “If genocide is indeed the
dream of modern powers, this is not because of a recent return of the
ancient right to kill; it is because power is situated and exercised at
the level of life, the species, the race, and the large-scale phenomena
of population” (ibid.: 137). In other words, the emergence of scientific technologies for prolonging and improving human life created ideal
conditions for mass death and even extinction.
Both the Bomb and the Pill were revolutionary devices, conceived by science in order to negate life for some, and enhance it for
others. They were technologies invented in a race against both time
and the Other. In Peter Jordan’s film, The Sleep of Reason (1994),
the Los Alamos of the 1940s is presented as a “utopian community,”
led by Oppenheimer in a crusade to save the (civilized) world.
Similarly, Sanger and Pincus believed that their work had the
potential to save the West from a devastating population explosion,
also located east of the United States.

Sexless Hydrogen: The Frisson of Fission
[T]here appears in many cities a kind of helplessness once they
begin to realize that they are objects marked for destruction.
The Mayor of Milwaukee (1950) (Boyer, 1985: 282)

Nuttall’s book Bomb Culture (1972) is a fascinating textual artifact
of that decade. It documents the antibomb movement in England,

Cosmic Architects

125

and its intellectual and artistic allies and influences. Nuttall’s
genealogy is very similar to my own, following that chaotic trail of
ideas from Sade through Friedrich Nietzsche to the Surrealists and
Situationists. He argues that there was a Copernican shift after
Hiroshima, and that the Bomb terrified the young into a kind of
frenzied nihilism, which left them incapable of conceiving that life
had a future:
The question then was practical. How best could one go about the
business of waiting in humiliation for the end of man? One could,
to begin with, become more passive . . . . Another thing we could
do was live for sensation . . . live for sex rather than love, for
speed rather than safety, for kicks. It is my experience that a large
number of teenagers became then, and remain, incapable of thinking more than half an hour ahead. (105-106)

Nuttall identifies this as part of an “anti-gestalt,” the “instinct to
leave nothing complete” (ibid.).
The young—or at least those wealthy enough to engage in such
apathetic posturing—were thus straddling a pendulum that swung
between a panicked energy and what Paul Boyer labels an “ominous
terminal lassitude” (1985: 263). Nuttall’s assertion that the generation gap was opened up by bomb-culture undermines those “boomer
vs generation x” or “hippie vs punk” clichés that continue to circulate in the media. Johnny Rotten’s catch-cry, “No future,” speaks of
an anxious continuity across the decades. Popular readings of the
alleged generation gap contrast today’s solipsism and apathy with
the sixties’ energetic engagement with the world. But these tend to
forget that “the pale face of Juliette [Greco], without make-up
except around the eyes, with whited lips, has been the mask for
female middle-class rebels ever since. The style, with its necrophiliac
overtones, constitutes another device for living with the possibility of
death. Boredom was a mode” (Nuttall 37).
Nuttall’s description still applies, conjuring up the ubiquitous
image of the goth in the 1980s and 1990s. Here too, boredom and
the possibility of death fuse into a subcultural identity. The cultural
climate of the sixties, however, was unprecedented. For the first
time, a man-made secular dread permeated the social fabric with
quasi-religious consequences. For Paul Virilio, consciousness of
nuclear danger is stimulated less by the risk that nuclear weaponry
will be deployed then by the fact that “it exists and is imploding in
our minds” (1986: 150).
This ominous Eschaton also became the basis of that kind of
inverted liberation that Andrew Milner calls “apocalyptic hedonism”
(36). In a Sadean aftershock, influential writers such as J. G.
Ballard produced near-futuristic fables predicated on the belief that

126

After the Orgy

“the hydrogen bomb was a symbol of absolute freedom. I feel it’s
given me the right—the obligation even—to do anything I want”
(Pringle 133). Norman Mailer’s advice for the atomic age is just as
relevant now as it was then, when he said that “the only life-giving
answer is to accept the terms of death, to live with death as
immediate danger, to divorce oneself from society, to exist without roots, to set out on that uncharted journey into the rebellious
imperatives of the self” (Nuttall 17). So much, then, for the claim
that the sixties rejuvenated the idea of idealistic community.
Nuttall believes that “the mass of young people would probably
not have registered their insecurity so thoroughly, would not have
divided themselves off so completely as a cultural group, had they
been conscious of the origins and content of their unease” (11). The
origin was Hiroshima, and the content was irrational mass death.
To consciously focus on this “unease,” whether politically or personally, proved too much for this and subsequent generations to
bear.
In the early 1970s, Neville maintained that people don’t care
about dying if everybody else is going to die too: “Duffle coats and
CND [Campaign for Nuclear Disarmament] badges symbolized a
new generational identity. For the young, being sad about the
Bomb was fun” (1971: 26). Although directed against people like
Nuttall, such remarks do nothing to weaken the argument of
Bomb Culture. The loaded word here is fun, for Neville seems to
believe that terror and fun are mutually exclusive. Yet both can
coexist in the one psyche (or subculture), each shaping the other
in a complementary conflict.
Nuttall’s narrative vibrates with the tension between a desire
for macrocosmic political change and a belief that salvation is to be
found in hedonistic excess—between what Neville dubbed the
“hard-line lefty” and the “hard-on hippy” positions (ibid.: 224).
Kerouac provides us with a typical example:
It’s the great molecular comedown. Of course that’s only my whimsical name for it at the moment. It’s really an atomic disease, you
see. . . . It’s death, finally reclaiming life, the scurvy of the soul at
last, a kind of universal cancer. It’s got a real medieval ghastliness, like the plague, only this time it will ruin everything, don’t
you see? Everybody is going to fall apart, disintegrate, all character structures based on tradition and uprightness and so-called
morality will slowly rot away, people will get the hives right on
their hearts, great crabs will cling to their brains . . . their lungs
will crumble. But now we have only the symptoms, the disease
isn’t really underway yet—virus X. (Nuttall 113)

This “disease” is certainly with us now, whether we call it “AIDS”,

Cosmic Architects

127

“market correction”, “the digital divide”, “postmodernism” or whatever. These doomsday images were as much Oppenheimer’s creation as
Kerouac’s. It is clear from the tone of his conclusion that Kerouac does
not write out of resignation and fear. “Whatever it is, I’m all for it,” he
says. “It may be a carnival of horror at first—but something strange
will come of it, I’m convinced” (ibid.). In the sixties, the Grim Reaper
of immanent extinction said “check” to the collective life force of the
libido; the young, instead of pondering the strategic options on offer,
did the equivalent of tipping over the chess-table. The Bomb and the
Pill seemed to be sitting on either side of a giant seesaw, with the
world watching on.
Herbert Marcuse has noted that “the mere anticipation of the
inevitable end, present in every instant, introduces a repressive
element into all libidinal relations and renders pleasure itself
painful” (1973: 162). Jonathan Swift also understood that such a
debauched reaction to imminent destruction was inevitable.
Imagining the reaction of Londoners to the arrival of a doomsday
comet, Swift wrote: “They drank, they whored, they swore, they lied,
they cheated, they quarrelled, they murdered. In short, the world
went on in the old channel” (Boyer, 1985: 240).
Boyer shares Nuttall’s conviction that the Bomb had an
unprecedented and underrated impact on the psychocultural landscape in the second half of the twentieth century. In his study of
early reactions to the dawning of the nuclear age, By the Bomb’s
Early Light (1985), Boyer writes, “It is as though the Bomb has
become one of those categories of Being, like Space and Time, that,
according to Kant, are built into the very structure of our minds,
giving shape and meaning to all our perceptions” (xviii).
In the late 1940s America was terrified by the Frankensteinian
power it had unleashed on its enemies, and believed it was only a
matter of time before a new enemy would inflict it on them. The billboard promise of a safe and clean nuclear-fueled suburban utopia
barely veiled the anxieties provoked by this scientific revolution.
Repentant atomic scientists seized on this fear and manipulated it
politically in a strategic campaign to return the Horror to its
Pandora’s Box; for as Boyer notes, “the politicization of terror was a
decisive factor in shaping the post-Hiroshima cultural climate” (66).
These scientists toured the nation to alert people to the sinister subtext of the government’s assurances that nuclear power would “set
man on the road to the new millennium” (126). They were criticized
for pushing the nation “toward a state of near panic” in the attempt
to realize their objective. In 1946 the historian Erich Kahler
delivered this warning to the atomic scientists:
The general fear, on which so many people count as a restraining

128

After the Orgy
influence, is a questionable defence. Between fear and its object
there exists a menacing and magic interaction which tends to
gradual intensification, and eventually to a panic merging of the
two. In a crisis, help has never come from fear, but only from calm
and careful consideration. (73—my emphasis)

The political mobilization of fear by scientific activists created a
powerful legacy that had a major impact on the (counter) culture of
the sixties. This “panic merging” was realized in an orgiastic fusion
of the young with an imagined apocalypse. Living in the shadow of
not only Dionysus but also of instant destruction, they experienced
the “orgy” in Maffesoli’s sense, namely, as “death collectively lived.”
Right from the beginning, commentators contextualized the atomic
bomb in long established apocalyptic narratives. Certain biblical
phrases—such as “the heavens shall pass away with a great noise,
and the elements shall melt with fervent heat, the earth also and
the works therein shall be burned up” (2 Pe. 3:10)—suddenly
seemed chillingly significant. After combing the world’s literature
for similar prophecies, the Manhattan Project seemed to be merely
fulfilling something that had been foretold many centuries before.
As far back as 1681, Thomas Burnet had predicted in his Sacred
Theory of the Earth, that “Seeds of Fire” were sealed within atoms
in the center of the earth, and that on the last day God would
release the “Chains” holding these fires in check (Boyer, 1985: 240).
Bataille framed his own reaction in similar terms: “Truman would
appear to be blindly fulfilling the prerequisites for the final—and
secret—apotheosis. It will be said that only a madman could perceive such things in the Marshall and Truman plans. I am that
madman” (Brown 1991: 181). But many others were equally “mad.”
Put simply, panic was the initial reaction to this situation. The
herd-instinct to flee was very powerful, according to Boyer, in the days
following the destruction of Hiroshima and Nagasaki. The sixties
were seeded not only by the resonant headlines of the times, but also
by the rash of science-fiction novels that followed this unprecedented
event. Stories such as Ward Moore’s Greener than You Think (1947)
became allegories for a civilization that first greeted imminent
destruction with hedonistic hysteria and then lapsed into numbing
apathy—a move that in many ways maps the trajectory from the
1960s to the present: “Panicky survivors scavenge in supermarkets,
copulate randomly, drink themselves into a stupor, or go quietly
insane” (Boyer, 1985: 262). Pan was back in town after a lengthy
absence, and inciting the riotous against the righteous. Even Cornell
University scientists who were testing for “human susceptibility to
crack-up and panic” (ibid.: 323) conducted their experiments on “psychoneurotic goats” placed near the Marshall islands nuclear test site.

Cosmic Architects

129

Nearly two decades later, those children who had crouched
under their desks during nuclear drills began pooling the precarious
flame of life which flickered within them. This was now a culture in
which a fourteen-year-old schoolboy could write; “The hydrogen
bomb reeks with death. Death, death to thousands. A burning, searing death, a death that is horrible, lasting death. The most horrible
death man has invented; the destroying annihilating death of atomic energy. The poisoning, killing, destroying death. Death of the
ages, of man, the lasting death” (ibid.: 350). Registered in this paragraph is not the timeless, universal, and profoundly mortal fear of
death, but hysteria caused by the possibility of mass extinction.
Such kids began to realize Lewis Mumford’s fear that in its attempt
to escape or deny Armageddon, society would turn toward “fantasy
. . . purposeless sexual promiscuity [and] narcotic indulgence”
(ibid.: 287).
Significantly in terms of my study, Michel Foucault situated
himself in this nuclear genealogy, which created the psychosocial
conditions for what has since been swept under the carpet of “the
Sixties.” He admitted having
very early memories of an absolutely threatening world, which
could crush us. To have lived as an adolescent in a situation that
had to end, that had to lead to another world, for better of worse,
was to have the impression of spending one’s entire childhood in
the night, waiting for dawn. That prospect of another world
marked the people of my generation, and we have carried with us,
perhaps to excess, a dream of Apocalypse. (Beachy 27)

During the Cuban Missile Crisis of 1963, Bob Dylan wrote “A Hard
Rain’s a Gonna Fall”, and explained that his convoluted lyrics were
really a collection of first lines for songs that may not have the opportunity to be written. In contrast to Michael André Bernstein’s belief
that apocalyptic fantasy affords pleasure in “direct proportion to its
improbability” (1992: 39), the forty years of cold war nuclear anxiety
ensured that a period of artistic potlatch was at hand; a public burning of emotional and psychological baggage. Contributing to this notso-improbable end-pleasure, Brown strove for a “fiery consummation”
in metaphoric rather than nuclear terms, noting that “the Loins [are]
the place of the Last Judgement” (1990: 178).
These various responses to the Bomb all question Ginsberg’s
famous description of Hydrogen as sexless. If Ginsberg used the
term to mean nonspecific gender, then he did so against the grain
of a contemporary feminizing and masculinizing of the Bomb by
different parties for different purposes. When we split the hydrogen
atom, are we creating yet another discontinuity that Mother Nature
cannot abide, and will consequently punish with a holocaustal howl?

After the Orgy

130

Will they rush to reunify, like Plato’s divided beings? Brown warns us
that “in the twentieth century, in this age of fission, we can split the
individual even as we can split the atom” (ibid.: 82).

Dionysus in ‘69

As all the living forms of life are the lineal descendents of
those which lived long before the Silurian epoch, we may feel
certain that the ordinary succession by generation has never
once been broken, and that no cataclysm has desolated the
whole world. Hence we may look with some confidence to a
secure future of equally inappreciable length.
Charles Darwin (489)

Since Apollo is often described as an artificer, it is not impossible to
think of technology as inspired by Apollo and infused with Apollonian
values. “Nature,” on the other hand, is the realm of Dionysus, and
never the twain shall meet. We would indeed be living in a drastically different world if the first men to walk on the moon had got there
in the rocket ship Dionysus. This begs the question of whether there
is such a thing as Dionysian artifice. Is this term oxymoronic? I
have already argued that cybersex is an example of this fragile
fusion, and at this point I offer the Pill as another possibility.
In her study of libidinal millenarianism, Sexing the Millennium
(1993), Linda Grant provides evidence in support of the oral contraceptive pill as an Apollonian artifact. As an instant relic of both “the
god of all plastic powers” (Nietzsche, 1956: 97), the Pill was designed
to help solve what was perceived (and indeed still is) as one of the
greatest challenges facing humanity: overpopulation. While some saw
nuclear bombs as a solution to the problem, the majority believed in
less drastic alternatives. Technology, however, can be put to uses other
than those intended by its inventors. The Pill would turn out to be yet
another Frankenstein’s monster in that strange utopian community
that crystallized around Katherine Dexter McCormick, Margaret
Sanger, and Gregory Pincus only four or five years after its introduction into the United States in 1960.
This Apollonian artifice was invented in the interests of controlling the population explosion in the Third World. In addition to the
racist implications inevitably harbored by such a project, it had
unforeseen Dionysian effects at home. As with the atom bomb, the Pill

Cosmic Architects

131

was developed in a climate of passionate optimism, when science was
allegedly poised to solve all social and economic problems. In both
cases, a technology devised to keep the “yellow peril” at bay came back
to haunt the West, this time in the milder form of a moral apocalypse:
“The Pill was to become one of the most potent symbols of the sixties’
faith in progress, an iconic representation like the inner-city tower
block of the failure of technology to fulfill our dreams” (Grant 59).
It is ironic, then, that this product of a belief in scientific
progress would fuel the fire already started by those who were
working against the rational, the imperialistic, and the teleological.
Nuttall acknowledges the pervasiveness of new technologies in the
counterculture, and like Grant, he remembers the sexual revolution
as a collage of “zippers, leathers, boots, PVC, see-through plastics,
male make-up, a thousand overtones of sexual deviation, particularly sadism, and everywhere, mixed in with amphetamines, was the
birth pill” (34).
Grant sees the prophecies of the hippies as echoing various
millenarian movements such as the seventeenth-century Ranters,
who preached a doctrine of sexual freedom, and thus linked erotic
emancipation with demands for social and political changes. For
Grant, sexuality is a highly significant site of contestation which
consistently resurfaces in turbulent times. She quotes an anonymous “witness”:
In the sixties you almost had to fuck for the good of the human race.
It was your moral duty to keep this thing going like a transcendental chain letter, in order to improve our lot and save the planet.
There was a general idea that people who controlled the world and
created all the evil, did so because they couldn’t fuck . . . . It was
loosely, sloppily but definitely messianic and programmatic. (130)

Here sexuality is seen as a healing and benevolent force, without
the darker connotations conferred upon it by Bataille or Sade. But
if it was a messianic programme, who was the messiah? Was it,
like the Free Spirit, that god within which exiled sin?
(Considering this context, it is significant that Norman Cohn’s
classic study, The Pursuit of the Millennium [1957], was itself a
cult book at the time.)
The most visible Dionysian cult of the sixties in Europe and
America included those hordes of young people who worshiped at
the technologically enhanced altar of rock ’n’ roll. Messianic figures
such as Jim Morrison and Mick Jagger spun apocalyptic tales of
terror and transcendence, while tabs of LSD dissolved on pious
tongues like communion wafers. If wandering bands of flagellants
excited millenarian fever in the eleventh and thirteenth centuries,
then traveling bands of rock musicians were the most prominent

132

After the Orgy

prophets in the 1960s, enciting carnivalesque confusion. Whereas
literature had been the main site for angst and ennui in the nineteenth century, rock ’n’ roll became the dominant form of expression
for transgressive impulses in the time of the pill.
“Human culture is human sacrifice,” Brown reminds us, and we
must therefore come to terms with “that heroical frenzy which was
the life of . . . Jimi Hendrix” (1991: 197). A popular explanation of
the deaths of Jimi, Janis, and Jim, is that the “battered Gods of the
old order” still needed sacrifices to placate them. The music and
lyrics of the time compose an extensive archive of fin de siècle decadence. But as Gitlin points out, “music couldn’t stay at millennial
pitch any more than politics” (428).
Music has enjoyed an undisputed status as the younger generation’s most popular medium of Dionysian expression. In the sixties,
however, live dramatic performance was one of the most intense
and subversive art forms. At this time, alternative theatre peddled
an explosive concoction of anarchistic ideas imported from Antonin
Artaud, Alfred Jarry, and Bertolt Brecht, as well as from surrealists and situationists. The German wing of the Mexican PANic
group mounted chaotic guerrilla performances to spread their
absurdist orgiastic gospel, as did collectives such as the Vienna
Institute of Direct Art and the Japanese Zero Dimension Group
(Nuttall 119, 178).
In 1968 the innocuously named Performance Group—which
was later to become Julian Beck’s Living Theater—produced its
own mythology of the sexual revolution by reinterpreting
Euripides’ Bacchae as a hip exploration of the erotic apocalypse,
called (and the pun was undoubtably intended) Dionysus in ’69. In
his review, Stefan Brecht describes “[t]he women on top, standing
separate and self-contained in ecstasy. The men on the floor are
undulating, a wave-motion in masturbatory or coital flexions, the
women above them in the pelvic thrusts of coitus or orgasm” (156).
The unintentional pathos of this performance provoked Brecht to
question why, in a late capitalist environment, the orgy is
inevitably pornographic, and whether its political and aesthetic
impact is diluted under the auspices of art: “The choreography of
these anonymous couplings suggests the impersonality of street
prostitution. Their intensity, duration, realism . . . make the play
a sex show: a play of unsentimental enthusiasm; unbridled, glandular” (163). This reincarnation of Nietzsche’s beloved art minimizes Apollonian order and structure: scripts were rarely followed,
and spontaneity and unpredictability were encouraged by audience
participation: “we are shown individuation as incidental to humanity, humanity as a block of self-procreating spasmic meat. The message seems to be: let us not deny within us or within others this ori-

Cosmic Architects

133

gin, our true identity—flesh out of flesh, issue of sperm, orgasm,
spasm” (ibid.: 157).
Brecht’s evocation of Dionysus in ’69 serves to remind us once
again that Eros and Thanatos are inseparable. He writes that this
play swings between “jejune hedonism and panic,” creating “a
theatre of fear disguised . . . a universe of joylessly egoist obsession acted out in endless repetition in an atmosphere of dread”
(166, 168). Because it takes place in the nuclear climate, “[i]ts
kinetics intimate the apprehension of combat missions and the
orgiastic mise-en-scène submerges the fable-nexus between death
and orgiastic ecstasy” (165).
Dionysus in ’69 was a sign of the times, in that it proposed
screwing as a political alternative to war. In a curiously puritan
twist, however, it was not presented in a joyous fashion. For if we
can trust Brecht to speak for the audience as a whole, the general
effect was a “stunned introspection, the sadness, the desperation of
taking stock of oneself. The attitude promoted . . . is frantic lust
for lust” (164). Here we find the seeds of Baudrillard’s simulated
and postalienated narcissism; the sense that the orgy was over
before it had begun.
If the orgy was so traumatic in 1969—that allegedly utopian
window of light—was it ever the vital communion that we have
been led to believe? If Ginsberg’s nymphomaniac portrait is indeed
just an idealist fancy, then perhaps we cannot discount the fact that
every era since the Fall has come “after the orgy.” Perhaps we
should refigure the sixties, like the premillennial nineties, as
simultaneously before, during, and after the Orgy. As an ideal, the
orgiastic thus becomes a caricature, a carrot which—in typical cartbefore-the-horse fashion—we dangle behind us rather than in front.
It makes me wonder whether the cults of the Free Spirit, Ranters,
Adamites, and the Taborites—romanticized in the sixties as Edenic
fuck-fests—were also held inside the Grim Reaper’s brothel.
Other narratives from the 1960s are certainly not so explicitly
morbid. Bliss Apocalypse, a play written by Daniel Moore for the
Floating Lotus Magic Opera Company, was also performed in 1969.
Its eschatological perspective is more mystical, in emphasizing the
rebirth inherent in death. This Lawrentian fascination with the
Phoenix reflects the millennial sixties in a more optimistic mood:
Our thirst for the primordial kept us from using electricity to
amplify any of the instruments or actors. The whole vision was
designed to be performed outside in the raw air of IT, on a hillside
after civilization blow all their plugs and still the Spirit dancing
and approachable and manifestable within us! Haunted by feelings of cultural hopelessness, we created out of cardboard and
cloth the rippings of eternal music, flute-flashes in the smoldering

134

After the Orgy
dark! To approach men with mouths abruptly open, to let sincerities flow in this marketplace of violent madmen kicking over the
vegetables! (53)

The sacredness of sexuality is replaced by the sexuality of sacredness, for nothing overtly libidinal takes place in Bliss Apocalypse.
Rapture is achieved via a direct connection with IT—God, Life,
Love, and the Eschaton . . . whatever you want to call it. The End
is normalized and domesticated in the concept of rebirth and its
accompanying ecstatic state:
The Dead are hopelessly confused
The Dead do not know they are dead . . . .
They believe they still live in Bodies
But their bodies are heaped like papers
Their spirits float like leaves!
Oh this is Transformation of Death Consciousness
Through Underworld Tunnels to Sunrise
We descend to the Place of Shades
To Transform Death-Wish Falcons into Light! (65)

These Death-Wish Falcons could be seen circling the Trinity
Nuclear Test site in the Alamogordo desert in 1945. One witness of
the first atomic explosion coped with the enormity of its impact by
returning to familiar notions of rebirth: “[o]n that moment hung
eternity. Time stood still, space contracted to a pinpoint. It was as
though the earth had split . . . . The big boom came seconds after
the great flash—the first cry of a newborn world” (Sleep of Reason).
William Laurence, having witnessed the same explosion, appropriated the erotic climax of Molly Bloom’s narrative for his own purposes: “The hills said yes and the mountains chimed in yes. It was
as if the earth had spoken and the suddenly iridescent clouds and
sky had joined in one affirmative answer. Atomic energy—yes”
(Boyer, 1985: 250). By transgressing the laws of nature we had
transcended ourselves.
The cold war context of Bliss Apocalypse is unmistakable, its
response being more concerned with sublimation than subversion.
It refuses to engage with various problems, one of which is that the
existence of nuclear weapons automatically negates any concept of
rebirth that includes the human: hence its retreat into mysticism.
This ageless story of a plea for supernatural assistance depoliticizes
apocalypse by recycling it as myth. But I guess a happy ending is
necessary for a play that invites “communes . . . to do comic versions of Bliss Apocalypse with children” (70).

Cosmic Architects

135

Echoing the quote from Tom Robbins at the beginning of this chapter, Grant notes that “for twenty years, between the invention of
the Pill and the beginning of the AIDS epidemic, there was a
moment which had never occurred in history before, when sex was
free from the threats of both pregnancy and disease. What, if anything, were the lasting effects of that window into the light?” (20).
Once again the sixties are portrayed as one last moment of illumination before the dark curtains of the late twentieth century are
drawn. Unfortunately, this “window of light” metaphor obscures the
more gruesome aspects of the period. AIDS was the final nail in the
coffin of an already ailing sexual revolution. Grant documents the
“almost cosmic sense that there is a conspiracy against sex at work
in the world,” for every time we seek to quench the thirst of Eros,
“something keeps poisoning the well” (132).
Jean Baudrillard dates the rise of AIDS with the demise of sexual liberation, although he doesn’t see it as simply a case of the
virus gate-crashing the orgy. He regards AIDS as a paradoxical
result of “the very success of prophylaxis and medicine” (1993b: 64).
The extermination of humanity, he argues, begins with the extermination of humanity’s germs, for “under the reign of the virus you
are destroyed by your own antibodies. This is the leukaemia of an
organism devouring its own defences, precisely because all threat,
all adversity, has disappeared” (ibid.).
In a politically dangerous balancing act, Jean Baudrillard
views AIDS as neither divine punishment nor a CIA plot. Instead,
it is an internal mechanism that prevents the system from plunging us “into the void” (ibid.: 69), a total circulation that leads to dispersion. Thus, in a typically Baudrillardian twist, AIDS does not so
mucy destroy sex as preserve it. AIDS is a form of resistance: it
saves us from the “even worse eventuality” of a “total promiscuity,”
in which “sex itself would self-destruct in the resulting asexual
flood” (ibid.: 68). This is not a moral argument, although it is highly susceptible to interpretation as such: “[a]t present we live according to at least two principles: that of sexual liberation and that of
communication and information. And everything suggests that the
species itself, via the threat of AIDS, is generating an antidote to its
principle of sexual liberation” (ibid.: 66).
But in 1969 the deadly side of sex was still only metaphoric,
falling as it did between syphilis and AIDS. In that same year
Germaine Greer, Jean Shrimpton, and Heathcote Williams started a
magazine entitled Suck, which attempted to create an alternative and
liberating pornography free from the banal and sexist trappings of
England’s Soho. Even at the time, Greer had to admit that much of it
“derived from the fantasy machines developed by commercial pornography to reinforce the sexual status quo” (Grant 212). Long before sex

136

After the Orgy

became fatal, the material was still “heavy with hatred and cruelty
and [the] desire of death” (ibid.), reinforcing Julian Pefanis’s point that
“[p]ornography ultimately is more about death than it is sex; Thanatos
surpasses Eros [in] an ‘erotics of agony’” (137). The opaque plastic
wrappers of porn magazines merely masked the creeping suspicion
that the sexual revolution would leave only a market in its wake.
In the 1964 film Dr Strangelove: Or How I Stopped Worrying and
Learned to Love the Bomb, Stanley Kubrick explicitly identifies the
fear of sexuality as the possible trigger of a nuclear attack. General
Ripper—who has clearly let his cold war paranoia get the better of
him – explains his theories on fluoridation:
General Ripper: “It’s incredibly obvious isn’t it? A foreign substance is introduced into our precious bodily fluids without the
knowledge of the individual, certainly without any choice. That’s
the way your hardcore commie works.”
Mandrake: “Tell me, when did you first become . . . develop this
theory?”
General Ripper: “Well, I . . . ah, I . . . I first became aware of
it, Mandrake, during the physical act of love. Yes a profound sense
of fatigue, a feeling of emptiness followed. Luckily I was able to
interpret these feelings correctly: loss of essence. I can assure you
it has not reoccurred, Mandrake. Women sense my power and they
seek the life essence. I do not avoid women, Mandrake, but I do
deny them my essence.”

General Ripper translates the external, political “threat” of
communism into a model of contagion bearing directly on the body.
The irony, of course, is that his life-essence is the libidinous energy
that unleashes mass death and destruction on the world. The climax that he has been stoically denying himself in his relations with
women explodes in a momentous “wargasm,” a “pornography of violence” (Ruthven 38). It is indeed a telling indicator of the sixties
zeitgeist that Dr. Strangelove ends with a full-scale nuclear war
instead of a more optimistic Hollywood compromise.
Libidinal links between sex and the legacy of the Manhattan
Project are not restricted to fiction, however. In his monograph on
Nuclear Criticism (1993), Ken Ruthven cites a few examples of how
the Bomb was eroticized in the mid-1940s. The actress Linda
Christians was described as “Hollywood’s Anatomic Bomb” in a
necrophiliac publicity shot, just as Rita Hayworth was stenciled on
one of the “devices” dropped on the Marshall islands in 1946. The
bikini—which has become the quintessential symbol of female sexuality—was invented by the French engineer Louis Reard, and

Cosmic Architects

137

named after the Bikini Atoll testing zone. Ruthven also wonders
what gang-rape fantasies lurk behind the title of W. C. Anderson’s
book on these tests: 12000 Men and One Bikini (63). (A phallic trope
that has since been appropriated by the cartoon character Tank
Girl, who sports a bikini actually made out of missiles.)
Dr. Strangelove and Bomb Culture point to the undercurrent of
pessimism in the sexual revolution. My point in drawing attention
to them is not to deny the utopian and hedonistic aspects of the sixties, but to observe that these festive spectacles were predicated on
—and inextricably bound to—a profound fear of apocalypse. Both
the cold war and the Vietnam War are often portrayed as external
conflicts that significantly influenced domestic affairs in the United
States. But in fact the hippies made love not as an alternative to
war, but as an extension of it: they fucked with the taste of death in
their mouths.
Such matters run counter to media clichés of the sixties
through images of frolicking nymphs and satyrs at Woodstock.
Although that festival began as a model of utopian possibility, by
the third day it had deteriorated into a nightmare of hunger, bad
trips, disorientation, and exhaustion: Pan-ism turned into panic.
The Rolling Stones’ concert at Altamont was an inevitable inrush of
oxygen in the utopian vacuum of 1969. As Stefan Brecht notes, “the
flower child and the Hell’s Angel are two sides of a coin,” and the
“loving hip” is apt to turn into the “vicious hip” (161).
Interpretations of Woodstock as a utopia degenerating into chaos
and confusion—seen as symbolic of the sixties themselves—fail to
take into account the horror and panic that encouraged the “free
love” in the first place.

The Politics of Play

The politics of play: international, equi-sexual, inter-racial
survival strategy for the future, the laughing gas to counteract tomorrow’s Mace. Onward to the eighties, Motherfuckers!
Neville (1971: 228)
Is there life before death?
Virilio (1983: 140)

In the 1940s and 1950s, the eccentric philosopher Wilhelm Reich

138

After the Orgy

believed that the woes of civilization could be remedied by
“unleashing” Eros in the form of Orgone energy. By the 1960s, however, Reich’s “cult of the orgasm,” was rejected by the popular front
of the sexual revolution: “Out goes Reich’s fuddy duddy orgone box,”
writes Neville; “in comes happy, hippy playful sex” (1971: 224-225).
Brown also saw little prospect of redemption in the orgasm, mainly because he believed it to be a strategic effect of “genital tyranny”
(an observation more recently refined in the breathtaking writings
of Leo Bersani). Brown exposed Reich’s pseudo-subversive solution
as an ally of that “exaggerated concentration on one of the many
erotic potentialities” upon which Apollonian culture depends
(Brown, 1970: 27).
For Brown, the issue must always be framed by eschatology.
“The question is: What shall man do to be saved?” (57). Taking a tip
from detective novels, he seeks the answer to this question where
you would least expect to find it; in the death-drive:
Freud was right: our real desires are unconscious. It also begins to
be apparent that mankind, unconscious of its real desires and
therefore unable to obtain satisfaction is hostile to life and ready
to destroy life itself. Freud was right then in positing a death
instinct, and the development of weapons of destruction makes
our present dilemma plain: we either come to terms with our
unconscious instincts and drives—with life and with death—or
else we surely die. (x)

According to Brown, this knowledge leads to a condition we all suffer from: “death-in-life,” a direct result of civilization’s artificial separation of being and not-being. Such an existential split, he argues,
prompted an immense withdrawal of libido from life. “Whereas in
previous ages life had been a mixture of Eros and Thanatos,” writes
Brown, “in the Protestant era life becomes a pure culture of the
death instinct” (ibid.).
Brown believes that our anxiety about death has been constructed historically, and is not (as we are led to believe) instinctual or metaphysical. As a consequence, life and death are united on
the organic level, but split on the psychic level, and this cultural
fracture is discernible in everything we do, say, or think. Brown disagrees with prophets of doom such as Arthur Schopenhauer
because they “spuriously” affirm death over life, as if the two could
ever be judged separately. As Rainer Maria Rilke says, “Whoever
rightly understands and celebrates death, at the same time magnifies life” (ibid.: 108).
In staring death in the face, Brown aligns himself more with
decadent than romantic strains of thought. “Romanticism is infantilism,” he argues, “because it ignores the demands of the reality-

Cosmic Architects

139

principle” (39), and therefore offers no solution. The natural process
of death must not be excluded from the ego, but incorporated within it, so that discontinuous being (to use one of Bataille’s terms) can
be integrated with existence.
It soon becomes clear that Brown’s embrace of Thanatos
follows the biblical trajectory towards revelation and millenarian
transcendence:
For the therapist and humanitarian, a philosophy of history has to
take the form of an eschatology, declaring the conditions under
which redemption from the human neurosis is possible . . . . The
reunification of life and death . . . can be envisioned only as the
end of the historical process . . . history, as neurosis, press[es]
restlessly and unconsciously toward the abolition of history and
the attainment of a state of rest which is also a reunification with
nature (1970: 86, 91).

Brown thus manipulates Hegel’s belief that “history is what man
does with death” (102), namely, repress it. According to such a
scheme, humans are neurotic animals trapped within time. But if
we were able to reconcile and reunify those instinctual opposites,
life and death, then history itself would end, for it is that conflict
that produces “time” in the first place. We would then be free, for
“only repressed life is in time and unrepressed life would be timeless or in eternity” (93). Brown thus sees repression as generating
not only culture but also its vessel, namely, historical time. By seeking salvation in the timeless id, psychoanalysis therefore harbors
age-old religious aspirations for a Sabbath of Eternity.
This is all very well as a messianic program for the sixties.
But how are we go about the enormous task of reunifying the
instinctual opposites of life and death? For Brown, the solution to
this all-pervading Apollonian denial is, quite simply, a return to
Dionysus. Insisting on the bodily foundation of all human endeavor, Brown’s psychoanalytic prophecy foresees the evolution of a
Dionysian “consciousness”:
The human ego must face the Dionysian reality, and therefore a
great work of self-transformation lies ahead of it . . . . As long
as the structure of the ego is Apollonian, Dionysian experience can
only be bought at the price of ego-dissolution. Nor can the issue be
resolved by a “synthesis” of the Apollonian and the Dionysian; the
problem is the construction of a Dionysian ego. (175)

While Brown admits the immensity of such a project, he detects
signs of its emergence not only in “the sexology of de Sade and
the politics of Hitler” but also in “the romantic reaction” (176).

140

After the Orgy

Neither provides an inspiring model for the new man. But
Brown’s point (supported by thinkers such as Marcuse) is that
such “monsters” are spawned by the “sleep of reason,” and would
not have assumed such horrific forms in a more directly
Dionysian culture. The Dionysian exuberance proposed here is
more than just a safety-valve for preventing such organized
atrocities as the death camps and hydrogen bombs. It is the very
basis of communal experience.
Brown’s unrepressed subject would be someone strong enough
to live, and therefore strong enough to die. He (and there is no
doubt that this subject is gendered masculine) would be “what no
man has ever been, an individual” (291). Because the Dionysian
consciousness would neither observe the limit, nor “not negate anymore” (308), it shares certain qualities with Nietzsche’s Overman
(Übermensch). Both are comfortable with the idea that “what has
become perfect, all that is ripe—wants to die” (292). Brown’s overman thus takes his place in that gallery of “new subjects” or
“posthumans” described by everyone from Plato to Donna Haraway,
D. H. Lawrence to Stelarc, and Timothy Leary to Terrence
McKenna.
Whether the hippies of the sixties were consciously trying to
subvert the whole of history, or just trying to get their rocks off, is
a moot point. No doubt both the cold war and the Vietnam War
helped Brown’s words to resonate more widely than in a less fearful period. With the benefit of hindsight it is easy to see Brown, and
indeed Marcuse, as nuclear theorists responding to R. D. Laing’s
dictum that insanity is the only sane response to an insane world.
Modernity’s more general obsession with apocalyptic and orgasmic
closure became intensified in the writings of those who recognized
the libidinal aspect of this millenarian climate, exacerbated by the
Pill and the Bomb. It wasn’t long before several historical developments, including the elevation of Governor Reagan to president,
and the concurrent AIDS moral panic, combined in the 1980s to
stretch and disfigure the dionysian themes of the 1960s—and set
the scene for the thanatic ’90s.

6

Playing at Catastrophe

Prêt-à-Mort: Necrophilia and Death Fashion

A human race has to invent sacrifices equal to the natural
cataclysmic order that surrounds it.
Jean Baudrillard (1989: 3)
You know that feeling you get when you’re leaning back on a
chair and you feel that you’re just about to fall and then you
catch yourself? . . . . I feel like that all the time.
Steven Wright

In the final years of the twentieth century a new “look” emerged
from the eternally recurring spectacle of the fashion world.
Mimicking the corpse, it was referred to as “death fashion” or
“heroin chic.” Beautiful young models are arranged in mortified
postures, and a fabricated autopsy report listed alongside the label
and price (“black chiffon dress, internal trauma arising from
severe beating”).
This phenomenon represents an ironic response to an earlier
and more naive epoch, the 1950s, when advertisements exploited
the fear of nuclear attack by offering fashion tips for the apocalypse: “Men should wear wide-brimmed hats, women stockings and
long sleeved dresses” (Boyer, 1985: 310). Illustrating what Frederic
Jameson calls “one of those extraordinary postmodern mutations
where the apocalyptic suddenly turns into the decorative” (1991:
xvii), such images are saturated with both the black humor of hindsight and the anxiety of anticipation.

141

142

After the Orgy

Death fashion is certainly a last-ditch attempt to whip up controversy (i.e., profitable attention) in an unshockable age. But it is
also the inevitable end point of the necrophilic logic behind “panic
sex,” whereby “sexual activity is coded by the logic of exterminism”
(Kroker & Kroker 14). In the “late” AIDS-era, death fashion recuperates the escapist impulse of heroin use, before fusing it with the
Russian roulette mentality of “postorgy” sex. It depicts the aftermath of the devastating plague, “that common millennial trope now
rendered sexual” (Kingwell 200). Hence the Krokers’ claim that
“[w]e have reached a fateful turning point in contemporary culture
when human sexuality is a killing-zone, when desire is fascinating
only as a sign of its own negation, and when the pleasure of catastrophe is what drives ultramodern culture onwards in its free fall
through a panic scene of loss, cancellation and exterminism” (13).
Centuries of romantic poetry have eroticized the corpse, and in this
sense death fashion is merely a development of the gothic and decadent fascination with decomposition. “Fashion has become our contemporary mode of being in the world,” writes Gail Faurschou, “and
our contemporary ‘mode’ of death” (82).
The brief controversy provoked by death fashion pictorials suggests that many people viewed this trend as an abhorrent perversity, but this does not mean that it was automatically “transgressive”
or even “dionysian.” Heroin chic may well appear transgressive, by
aestheticizing the logic of libidinal millenarianism, however it is far
too implicated in the machinations of capitalism to be labeled as
such. As Baudrillard reminds us, “the desire for death is itself recycled within fashion, emptying it of every subversive phantasm and
involving it, along with everything else, in fashion’s innocuous revolutions” (1993: 88). Mark Kingwell similarly believes that when
“stage-managed with great care, transgression functions paradoxically to reaffirm the value of the norms it would transcend” (185).
Although the possibilities for transgression multiply in an increasingly taboo-laden culture, they are short-circuited by the commodification of narcissism. (Indeed, as I write, the Australian government is considering plans to place general health warnings on
advertising images that feature skeletal models [Warning: Death
Can Be Fatal]. Certain sectors of the fashion industry may soon
find themselves stigmatized in the same way as tobacco magnates.)
Such images do not evoke the specters of the already dead, who
are banished from contemporary consciousness. Instead they
denote Norman O. Brown’s “death-in-life.” They are more a parody
of our cosmetic notions of death and decay, rather than a symbolic
acknowledgment of our mortality. As such, death fashion represents an epoch whose commercial products include “Lyf-Lyk” funeral makeup and Trans Time Inc. Cryogenics (Chidester 278, 287).

Playing at Catastrophe

143

Death fashion’s fusion of banality, disgust, violence and eroticism simulates the sacrificial gesture of Bataille’s millennium. The
secret of its particular eschatology lies once again in an ambivalent
artifice. For these are not snuff pictures. The models are not dead;
they merely simulate death. Such images are generated for profit,
not loss. If “death fashion” is a sacrifice, then the models have been
slain for gain on the altar of the dollar (which is not to privilege a
pure realm reserved for works of “art”).
The advertising campaign by Bennetton, which included journalistic photos of soldiers crushed by tanks, marks the limits of this
logic. By splicing their brand-name into horrific newsreel footage,
this company transcended questions of the “immorality” of advertising, and became amoral precisely through its “transgression” of
decency. Its flagship magazine, Colors, shows how Benetton has
digested postmodern media theory and excreted a campaign based
on mute realism. Paradoxically, this has resulted in yet another
level of hyperreality in Baudrillard’s Inferno. Indeed, Nike showed
admirable restraint in not adding its name to photographs of those
Heaven’s Gate suicides who wore its shoes. Perhaps they were even
more canny than Benetton in not drawing attention to the free
advertising they were receiving through the news media.
Death fashion is merely the latest manifestation of the tumultuous relationship between Eros and Thanatos. As long ago as
1824, Giacomo Leopardi recognized this kinship by depicting them
as sisters in his moral tale, “The Dialogue of Fashion and Death.”
“You from the very start went for people and blood,” Fashion tells
Death,
while I content myself for the most part with beards, hairstyles,
clothes, furniture, fine houses and the like. But in fact I have not
failed . . . to play a few tricks that could compared [sic] with
yours, as for instance to pierce ears, lips and noses, and to rip them
with the knickknacks I hang in the holes; to scorch the flesh of men
with the red-hot irons I make them brand themselves with for
beauty’s sake; to deform the heads of infants with bandages and
other contraptions, making it a rule that everyone in a certain
country has to have the same shape of head . . . to cripple people
with narrow boots; to choke their breath and make their eyeballs
pop with the use of tight corsets. . . . I persuade and force all civilized people to put up every day with a thousand difficulties and a
thousand discomforts, and often with pain and agony, and some
even to die gloriously for the love they bear me. (Faurschou 58)

The conceptual tentacles of this phenomenon originate in the writings
of the Marquis de Sade, Friedrich Nietzsche and Bataille, and then filter through Marshall McLuhan, Guy Debord and—most rigorously—

144

After the Orgy

Baudrillard. In order to understand what “necro-spectacles” such as
death fashion contribute to our neodecadent moment, it is necessary
to sift through some of the entrails of our sacrificial culture.
As we have seen, Baudrillard reduces the dilemma of a sexually saturated society to one question, “What are we to do after the
orgy?” He may, however, be jumping the gun. The mechanical (i.e.,
Sadean) logic of the industrial revolution continues to define both
sexual monotony and erotic excess up to and including the electronic era. In this case, the orgy will continue indefinitely; only the
participants will change or die. Like the cogs of a machine, orgiastic participants are expendable by being replaceable. This is merely another version of what Gilles Deleuze calls “machinic desire.”
Even in the age of computers, each part can be replaced, upgraded
or rerouted through the system. It may thus be time to rephrase
Baudrillard’s question to, “How do we stop the orgy?” Will it grind
to a halt and explode with its own frictional heat, or will it succumb
to its own viruses? Or must the softer surfaces of the flesh endure
the legacy of the Luddites?
Those glossy fashion spreads that depict young men and
women—traditionally considered to be in the prime of life—strangled
in baths or bleeding from bullet holes on escalators, capture the static horror of the Marquis de Baudrillard’s fatal orgy. Like the copulating shadows on the walls of Castle Silling, or the seared portraits of
the Hiroshima streets, they delineate holographic afterimages of the
event. We become hypnotized by the absence that simulation entails.
Charles Levin, who believes that the theory of postmodernism may
best be described as “a social theory of the after image, a theory of collective life as an aftermath,” thinks that “postmodernism is really a
kind of ‘postmortemism’” (1988: 104). To realize that we are living not
only after the orgy, but also after an insidious apocalypse, induces
rigor mortis of the spirit. Suddenly we are all potential mannequins
for a death fashion shoot.

Close Encounters of the Third Kind: the Joachite Structure
of Baudrillard’s Philosophy
It would be stupid to prophesy an apocalypse in the literal
sense of the term. My idea is that the catastrophe has
already happened, it’s here already. What interests me is
precisely beyond the catastrophe, what I would call its
hypertelia . . . . I would prefer not to play the role of the
lugubrious, thoroughly useless prophet.

Playing at Catastrophe

145

Baudrillard (Gane, 1993: 43, 99)

Although Baudrillard continues to deny that he is a doomsayer, he
can do little to alter the fact that this is how he is consistently
framed (and the pun is intended). The rhetorical power of his convictions, the poetic momentum of his prose, and the eschatological
targets of his intellect, all combine to create an oeuvre whose
“truth-effect” places him in the position of a postmodern Nietzsche.
Brian Rotman is certainly swimming with the current when he
describes Baudrillard as the “prophet of apocalypse, hysterical lyricist of panic” (ibid.: 7). In one of those metaphoric feedback loops he
is so fond of, Baudrillard’s philosophy has permeated popular culture to such an extent that he is perceived and represented as both
a prophet and symptom of the apocalypse—the man who narrates
the end so eloquently as to bring it about, or at least accelerate its
arrival: In the end was the word, and the word was Baudrillard.
The more sensational aspects of his writing have been emphasized by the media and not discouraged by Baudrillard’s own roleplaying as provocateur. This has resulted in a heady mixture of
hostility, indifference, mild amusement, and even embarrassment
within the academy and other intellectual institutions.
Functioning as a kind of demonized trickster figure, Baudrillard is
often ruthlessly simplified or foolishly taken at face value.
Consequently he is frequently dismissed as a charlatan, which is
akin to accusing politicians of hypocrisy or prostitutes of insincerity. Those who discount Baudrillard’s more recent work have not
usually read Symbolic Exchange and Death (1993), which in
effect—as his most rigorous, erudite and original work—forms a
durable safety net for his later and more audacious intellectual
acrobatics. This is not to deny that Baudrillard can be infuriatingly oblique, mind-numbingly repetitive, morally reprehensible, and
plainly inconsistent. The trouble is that such accusations are
beginning to eclipse his valuable insights.
Baudrillard’s name is associated also with a mid-1980s
American appropriation of French “postmodern” theory, which
leaves him vulnerable to the charge of being an anachronism. This
is somewhat ironic, considering that it was Baudrillard who suggested “that we go directly from 1989 to 2000” for there is no good
reason “to languish for another decade in this hellish atmosphere”
(1993a: 93). Baudrillard thus not only provides the title of this
book, but the postcoital historical model which has inspired my own
exploration of a specifically libidinal millenarianism.
As a veteran of both the sexual revolution and May ‘68,
Baudrillard is well-qualified to speak of living “after the orgy.” Such

146

After the Orgy

formative experiences inject a faint but continuous note of nostalgia into his rigorously antisentimental agenda. Like Tom Robbins,
Linda Grant and Camille Paglia, Baudrillard speaks of the 1960s
as a period that “opened a gap” (Gane, 1991: 159) in the sociocultural curtain. “Sometimes,” he admits, “I find myself longing for that
lightness of spirit we had in the sixties, when people had more zest
for collective interventions and group action” (1993: 190).
Baudrillard would regard such a biographical reading of his work
as theoretical violence of the worst kind. Yet his reference to
“mourning” the sixties (ibid.: 20) needs to be kept in mind by anybody attempting to connect sexuality with the thanatopraxis
(Baudrillard’s own term) of millenarian ideologies. It is surely significant that, in the watershed year of 1968, Baudrillard translated W. E. Mühlmann’s Messianismes Revolutionnaires, indicating an
empathy with end-of-the-world heretics.
Accused of passive nihilism, Baudrillard responds with a nutshell account of his personal approach to eschatology:
To look ahead in this way requires a somewhat metaphysical and
a somewhat transcendental curiosity. People have spoken so often
about the end of things that I’d like to be able to see what goes on
the other side of the end, in a sort of hyperspace and transfinity.
And even if things are not really at their end, well! Let’s act as if
they were. It’s a game, a provocation. Not in order to put a full stop
to everything but, on the contrary, to make everything begin
again. So you see, I’m far from being a pessimist. (ibid.: 133)

Indeed, when asked by Le Journal des Psychologues whether one
should speak evil and think negatively in order to avoid catastrophe, Baudrillard answered, “Yes, that seems to be the only
recourse, at least in terms of immunity” (ibid.: 175). Such a strategy sustains not only many of those disillusioned with the outcome
of the 1960s, but also that younger demographic once labeled
Generation X. A brief recontextualizing of his thought, therefore,
will help us to map the politics of exhaustion into the present.
The figurehead of Baudrillard’s philosophy is his theory of simulation, which, “out of some obscure need to classify” (1993a: 5), forms
the third stage in his historical development of the sign. Loosely
speaking, the first stage of the sign involves a direct reference to
some kind of “meaning,” the second stage to a masking or mimicry
of this meaning, and the third stage to an usurpation and evacuation of meaning. In this last scenario, the sign breaks loose from its
referent, no longer anchored to anything in “reality,” and becomes a
hyperreal satellite orbiting a world without any coherent connections. This is the postmodern stage, where mass-reproduction

Playing at Catastrophe

147

results in a world full of copies without an original. Organized chaos
reigns. Baudrillard captured the attention of a spectacle-saturated
United States by theorizing the vertigo of this simulated situation,
of which the North American media is the prime example. According
to his model, then, this third stage heralds a virtual apocalypse.
At this point it is worth remembering that the stock-in-trade of
(pre)millennial prophets is to map historical epochs on to an apocalyptic time line. Norman Cohn has amply demonstrated that the
most influential historical schema during the Middle Ages and the
Renaissance was the tripartite model of the great prophet Joachim
of Fiore (1145–1202). From this point on, no apocalyptic history was
taken seriously unless divided into three stages, confirming the old
saying that “bad things comes in threes.” Frank Kermode detects
Joachim’s structural powers at work in the modern era, and
believes it “may well have contributed more than a little to the
thought and feeling of the late-nineteenth-century ‘Decadence’”
(1995: 256). Elsewhere he notes that “the Third Reich” is itself a
Joachite expression (1975: 13).
Cohn credits Joachim with being the first to break with a primarily moral or religious concept of chronology by inventing a
method of specifically historical interpretation. This enabled the
development of a new prophetic system, “which was to be the most
influential one known to Europe until Marxism.” Cohn argues, “it
is unmistakably the Joachite phantasy of the three ages that reappeared in, for instance, the theories of historical evolution expounded by the German Idealist philosophers Lessing, Schelling, Fichte
and to some extent Hegel” (1993: 109). Even Marx did not dispense
with this tripartite structure, in so far as his three successive
epochs (primitive communism, class society, and utopian communism) mirror Joachim’s sequence of fear, faith, and freedom.21
Indeed, the dynamic properties of the number three appear
irresistible to those who try to map the meaning of time. Prophets
seem drawn to the historical angles of the triad. It is thus more
than likely that Baudrillard’s obscure need to classify (which itself
issued from a Marxist orientation) reflects this deeply entrenched
proleptic pattern. The conceptual grids of Western metaphysics
thus form the limits of Baudrillard’s thought, no matter how contemptuous he is of philosophies that take the human subject as the
subject of history.
One major difference between Baudrillard and Joachim is that
the former feels no compulsion to adhere to his own models or formulas. To rigidly follow one chronological scheme seems a quaint notion
to Baudrillard, for he sees no contradiction in presenting a three-stage
time line on one hand, and a fractal-pattern on the other. Happily, his
dionysian intellectual heritage allows such anti-Apollonian logic.

148

After the Orgy

In his most programmatic attempt to explain his philosophy,
Symbolic Exchange and Death, Baudrillard identifies the closest
thing to an absolute term in his thinking:
Everywhere, in every domain, a single form predominates:
reversibility, cyclical reversal and annulment put an end to the linearity of time, language, economic exchange, accumulation and
power. Hence the reversibility of the gift in the counter-gift, the
reversibility of exchange in the sacrifice, the reversibility of time in
the cycle, the reversibility of production in destruction, [and] the
reversibility of life in death . . . . In every domain it assumes the
form of extermination and death, for it is the form of the symbolic
itself. Neither mystical nor structural, the symbolic is inevitable. (2)22

Power is seen as an objective force that follows the rules of
reversibility, and can therefore be regained or reduced through acts
of symbolic violence. Examples include both the irreverent absurdity of pataphysics (the “science of imaginary solutions”) and the systematic cruelty of terrorism. Both recognize the power of the symbolic as a means of reclaiming our own death in defiance of the
state monopoly on mortality (and indeed, immortality).
For Baudrillard, as for generations of medieval monks, the
meaning of existence comes down to cracking “the code” that then
reveals the secret of the End. Social control in this current “neocapitalist cybernetic order” (ibid.) thus becomes a secular form of
apocalyptic prognosis based on the proliferation of signs. (Think, for
example, of market analysts.) These replace those traditionally
prophetic modes associated with symbolic ends. Consequently,
sacred prediction yields to secular forecast.
Baudrillard’s reading of history thus anticipates the findings of
“chaos theory,” whereby random elements begin to follow their own
inscribed patterns. Our overs(t)imulated society begins to fall for
its own media-made decoys. The question becomes; What does it
mean to look for a sign when the world is plagued by them? Even
the apocalypse itself can lose its symbolic power through its excessive use as an omen of the end by those who ignore the rule of
reversibility. “What we must fear,” remarks Baudrillard in an
interview, “is not the term date of the year 2000 (which is itself a
symbolic end); it is that this term date even has been rendered
impossible or useless, like all other symbolic term dates . . . .
That would really be the end of the end (Gane, 1993: 164).
In discussing King Lear and Macbeth, Kermode refers to the
history of “researches into death in an age too late for apocalypse,
too critical for prophecy” (1975: 88). He believes Shakespeare’s
world exhibits “all the symptoms of decay and change, all the terrors of an approaching end, but when the end comes it is not an end,

Playing at Catastrophe

149

and both suffering and the need for patience are perpetual” (ibid.:
82). Libidinal millenarianism connects directly to this endlessness
of the end. Baudrillard’s apocalyptic asymptote differs from
Shakespeare’s, however, because it is rooted in a very different
epoch. Obsessed with the unprecedented nature of our age,
Baudrillard ignores the fact that the “end of the end” has been considered before the era of simulation.
In fact, Baudrillard’s philosophies of ideological exhaustion
develop from a kind of antirevelation. Our postalienated situation
leads to what he calls “horizontal immortality,” an impoverished
state not unlike Brown’s death-in-life or Marcuse’s one-dimensional man. All exemplify libidinal entropy. Yet Baudrillard rejects transcendence as a solution, since he blames the Christian monopoly
over verticality as the root of the problem in the first place. When
human history hit “escape velocity,” it left us adrift in a symbolic
antigravitational field. Social relations started to drift free of any
reference point, moral, legal or otherwise. A reading of Elias
Canetti’s Human Province persuades Baudrillard that at
a precise moment in time the human race . . . dropped out of history. Without even being conscious of the change, we suddenly left
reality behind. What we have to do now . . . [is] find that critical
point, that blind spot in time. Otherwise, we just continue on with
our self-destructive ways. This hypothesis appeals to me because
Canetti doesn’t envisage an end, but rather what I would call an
“ecstasy,” in the primal sense of the word—a passage at the same
time into the dissolution and the transcendence of a form. (ibid.: 99)

Baudrillard exercises considerable latitude in dating this ironic
rapture, which roughly accompanied the Apollo moon landings. It
occurred at the close of the Second World War or alternatively at
“some point in the 1980s” (1994: 10). Canetti’s metaphor prompts
Baudrillard’s own variation on the “end of history” theme, an apocalyptic motif recently popularized by Frances Fukuyama (1992).
According to Fukuyama, (upper-case) History ended with the
fall of the Berlin Wall, culminating in the ultimate “victory” of liberal democracy. Baudrillard’s account is less humanistic. Although
at some point we “dropped out of history,” history continues unabated, and we follow in its wake like a sonic boom that will never have
the opportunity to be heard. In J. K. Huysmans’s A Rebours, this
state of affairs is only a latent possibility, but Baudrillard completes the idea by stretching it across the twentieth century:
The end is, in fact, only conceivable in a logical order of causality
and continuity. Now, it is events themselves which, by their artificial production, their programmed occurrence or the anticipation of

150

After the Orgy
their effects—not to mention their transfiguration in the media —
are suppressing the cause-effect relation and hence all historical
continuity . . . . We may perhaps even see this as an adventure,
since the disappearance of the end is in itself an original situation.
It seems to be characteristic of our culture and our history, which
cannot even manage to come to an end, and are, as a result,
assured of an indefinite recurrence, a backhanded immortality. Up
to now, immortality has been mainly that of the beyond, an immortality yet to come, but we are today inventing another kind in the
here and now, an immortality of endings receding to infinity. (1994:
115)

This “immortality of endings receding to infinity” brings forward
Nietzsche’s eternal return into the cybernetic era, and crystallizes
it within Sade’s or Huysmans’ definition of artifice. Baudrillard
believes computer-networks are “the particle accelerator which has
smashed the referential [read “natural”] orbit of things once and for
all” (ibid.: 2). As such, postmodernity is witness to “the most degenerated, most artificial, and most eclectic phase” (Gane, 1991: 158).
Traumatized by a century of unprecedented technological progress
and political violence, our epoch breaks its neck trying to follow the
Doppler effect of history.
Our response to this general disorientation is to renovate the
ruins of the past, both literally and metaphorically. We are thus,
according to Baudrillard, in the midst of effacing all the ideological
signs and political accomplishments of the modern era. This “enthusiastic work of mourning” whitewashes every significant event of the
century, including revolutions, wars, colonialism, and nuclearism.
Through a ritual of remembrance we are in fact rewinding the tape
in order to erase it; lest we really remember. Everybody is now undoing history with the same enthusiasm that went into making it (ibid.:
32)—a process seen by Baudrillard as both sinister and comic.
Many proponents of the postmodern condition have been excited by such a notion, mistaking it as the premise for a new beginning. They argue that postmodernity is actually the galaxy of alternative histories resulting from the big bang of an infinitely dense
History. But the melancholic Baudrillard sees no cause for celebration. To Baudrillard’s Gallic nose, the present state of affairs reeks
of the millenarian reflex to repent. Indeed, repentance is symptomatic of postmodernity, and discernible in “the recycling of past
forms, the exalting of residues, rehabilitation by bricolage, eclectic
sentimentality” (ibid.: 35). Whereas bands of blood-spattered selfflagellators roamed the land in the Middle Ages, today we burn
with “archive fever” (Derrida) and the mania to mummify the past.
Given such a cultural climate, our symbol of the apocalypse
ought not to have been the Four Horsemen, but Pee-wee Hermann,

Playing at Catastrophe

151

that ironically infantile comedian whose career was ruined when
found masturbating to a flickering porno screen. The late twentieth
century was consumed by a Kleenex-ideology, sopping up the effluvia
of previous decades to prepare for the corrosive stains of the second
coming. Baudrillard writes;
We used to ask what might come after the orgy—mourning or
melancholia? Doubtless neither, but an interminable clean-up of
all the vicissitudes of modern history and its processes of liberation (of peoples, sex, dreams, art and the unconscious—in short, of
all that makes up the orgy of our times), in an atmosphere dominated by the apocalyptic presentiment that all this is coming to an
end. Rather than pressing forward and taking flight into the
future, we prefer the retrospective apocalypse, and a blanket revisionism . . . . Celebration and commemoration are themselves
merely the soft form of necrophagous cannibalism, the homeopathic form of murder by easy stages. This is the work of the heirs,
whose ressentiment towards the deceased is boundless. Museums,
jubilees, festivals, complete works, the publication of the tiniest of
unpublished fragments—all this shows that we are entering an
active age of ressentiment and repentance. (ibid.: 22)

These undoubtably neo-Nietzschean words resonate loudly within the
echochamber of popular culture, informing death fashion, modern
primitives, techno-pagans, and the cyberians of the new millennium.
“Maybe after all the year 2000 will never occur,” Baudrillard
concludes, for the simple reason that we cannot escape this “fatal
asymptote which causes us . . . to rewind modernity like a tape?”
(1994: 11). In such a metaphor we can detect not only the geometry
of the orgy and the “red thread” of Dionysus, but also the “thanatic
asymptote” on which my notion of libidinal millenarianism
depends. Bataille’s interpretation of eroticism—plunging towards
extinction, yet cleaving to life in order not to extinguish the experience—is thus paralleled by our constant deferral of global suicide.
Speaking specifically of nuclear annihilation, Baudrillard entertains the possibility that “there is no strategic guarantee in deterrence, nor, furthermore, any survival instinct of the species” (1990:
186). What protects us from a nuclear holocaust, he argues, is not the
balance of terror, but the possibility that we will miss out on the media
spectacle of Armageddon. That the apocalypse will not be televised.
“That is why it won’t happen . . . the drive to spectacle is more
powerful than the survival instinct, we can count on that” (ibid.).
Such an assertion extends Walter Benjamin’s statement that
humanity can now “experience its own destruction as an aesthetic
pleasure of the first order” (1992: 235). In the twenty-first century
we have become aware of a fundamental tension between the urge

152

After the Orgy

to destroy ourselves in the “ultimate spectacular,” and the knowledge that this is impossible, that we will be consumed by it. This is
yet another version of the thanatic asymptote, this time on a macrocosmic scale. We yearn for the aesthetic thrill of Apocalypse, and
yet we cling to life, for we can’t satisfy our voyeuristic desire if we
are in fact dead. The one balances the other in a metaphysical parody of the nuclear deterrence theory, and with the same profound
consequences. Our only option appears to be homeopathic: we consume the mini-apocalypses hurled at us each day through the
media as if each were the Big One.
The younger generation’s penchant for black is a sign of the
frustrated mourning that this situation demands, the recognition
that the body is merely a “corpse full of cravings” (Kermode, 1975:
117). It is analogous to the drag queen’s strategy of denial through
exaggeration or overcompensation. The nirvana-principle—uncannily enacted by grunge-icon Kurt Cobain—is thus sifted through
the street-languages of subcultural style. Kingwell observes that
[w]hereas the flagellants of other end-times tied their public suffering to religious purification, and met the uncertainty of the Second
Coming with self-abasement and violent denial, the young extremists of our own day link body decoration to a purification of social
expectations, and meet the uncertainty of their own futures with a
refusal to invest that future with expectation or meaning. (184)

The heart of darkness becomes refigured through popular culture,
so that Kurt’s, “yeah, whatever nevermind,” supplants Kurtz’s,
“The horror! The horror!”
The most recent fin de siècle thus merely extended the bomb
culture of the 1950s and 1960s. Eyes skyward and bowels empty in
anticipation, we witnessed that fatal asymptote dangling over our
heads like Pynchon’s apocalyptic rainbow. Exhausted and underpaid, the erotic gravity of the situation forced us to become frozen
in an obscene, pornographic parody, waiting with open mouths for
that orgasmic impact (which itself parodies the nebulous desire of
a sign-saturated society). “Panic in slow-motion,” Baudrillard calls
it; or in Steve Wright’s image, feeling like you’re constantly falling
backward but never actually hitting the floor. This is the gutwrenching moment of panic: to be caught in the headlights of history as it speeds toward oblivion.

“A Biocybernetic Self-Fulfilling Prophecy World Orgy I”:

Playing at Catastrophe

153

Or Surviving the Necropolis

For all we might strive to forget the problem of the end, then,
or circumvent it by artificial technical solutions, the end does
not forget us.
Baudrillard (1994: 91)
Prophecies are ragged and dirty.
Vaughan in David Cronenberg’s Crash (1996)

Having long meditated on the shortcomings of the so-called sexual
revolution, Baudrillard concludes that it did not so much fail as
succeed only too well. Developing the insights of Brown and
Marcuse, Baudrillard exposes this particular orgy as an ally of the
same antisymbolic forces it claimed to oppose. The 1960s’ embrace
of Eros accompanied a general denial of Thanatos, producing an
unbalanced state of affairs. Consequently, sex could never be truly
“subversive” or “transgressive,” for it acted like a Trojan horse for
smuggling in the ideologies of immortality, that secret weapon of
the church, the economy and the state. As Baudrillard notes, “all
‘historical’ societies are arranged so as to dissociate sex and death
in every possible way, and play the liberation of one off against the
other—which is a way of neutralizing them both” (1993: 184).
Viewed from such a perspective, Wilhelm Reich’s orgone energy becomes a conservative force, giving the orgasm a function, and
coercing it to align with productivity, utility, and other identitybased agendas. This is why Baudrillard believes that the “slogan of
sexuality is in solidarity with political economy,” because both aim
“at abolishing death.” Those who opt for sex “have only exchanged
prohibitions” (ibid.: 184-185).
Here Baudrillard fails to acknowledge that “sexuality” should
not be isolated as a theoretical construct, principally because it cuts
across many other grids of experience—metaphysical, cultural, linguistic, economic, and so on. Consequently, sex (like death) is both
everywhere and nowhere, a transparent membrane covering everything like clingwrap, and stretched to a breaking point. This does
not mean, however, that we can no longer talk about it; rather, it
must find a conducting medium in order to make sense. A proper
context must be found before “sexuality” can trace the shape of its
own disappearance. In other words, we cannot discuss sex as a discrete mode or structure because the word sex is meaningless until
it hooks onto some other valency. It is for this reason that
Baudrillard is drawn to the orgiastic conjunction of sexuality with

154

After the Orgy

some other millenarian seduction, for instance death or technology.
Dionysus thus morphs into the Grim Reaper as the symbolic
other. Since death is no longer experienced as a collective social
phenomenon, it fascinates only in its sacrificial artifice:
All passion then takes refuge in violent death, which is the sole
manifestation of something like the sacrifice, that is to say, like a
real transmutation through the will of the group. And in this
sense, it matters little whether death is accidental, criminal or
catastrophic: from the moment it escapes “natural” reason, and
becomes a challenge to nature, it once again becomes the business
of the group, demanding a collective and symbolic response; in a
word, it arouses the passion for the artificial, which is at the same
time sacrificial passion. (Baudrillard, 1993: 165)

“Sacrificial passion” was illustrated vividly in the weeks following
the “artificial” death of Princess Diana. Paradoxically, “natural”
death is interpreted as an artificial invention of western science, its
“objective and punctual character” being the collective projection of
a linear, apocalyptic culture. As the Situationist Raoul Vaneigem
states, “We do not die because we must, we die because it is a habit,
to which one day, not so long ago, our thoughts became bound”
(ibid.: 144).
It may seem willfully contradictory of Baudrillard to discuss
the modern metropolis as a “culture of death” after lamenting society’s denial of its very existence. But this is just another example of
his dionysian fondness for the reversible. “The cemetery no longer
exists because modern cities have entirely taken over their function: they are ghost towns, cities of death” (ibid.: 127).
Subsequently, death is everywhere for the simple reason it has been
swept under the carpet. Like the pervasiveness of “crime” in a culture obsessed with eradicating it, death lurks around every corner,
so that in our unprecedented age, “death is a delinquency” (ibid.:
126).
From Baudrillard’s self-confessed necrospective, all sexuality
is necrophilic, because we refuse to acknowledge our symbolic debt
to the dead: “Death is ultimately nothing more than the social line
of demarcation separating the ‘dead’ from the ‘living’: therefore, it
affects both equally” (ibid.: 127). Life is thus merely a surplus value
(a survival) according to which we measure the profits/prophets of
our spiritual bankruptcy. Life becomes a matter of economic management, of how we spend our time. Existence is seen increasingly
in terms of accumulation, for which death is due payment.
Baudrillard’s crucial realization is that “the emergence of survival
can therefore be analyzed as the fundamental operation in the birth

Playing at Catastrophe

155

of power” (ibid.: 129).
The concept of immortality thus emerges simultaneously with
the symbolic apartheid of the dead. Modern millenarians must
therefore take advice from medieval heretics, and take life back
into their own hands. Rather than be blackmailed by the immortality of the soul (Christianity), or seduced by the Darwinian imperative to survive (the Michigan Militia and other renegade para-military organizations), they must commune with the dead while living in the symbolic space-time continuum of this “divided space.”
Raoul Vaneigem also believes that the ethical imperative to survive
is the most powerful tool of the modern state. His historical polemic,
The Movement of the Free Spirit (1994), complements Baudrillard’s
thoughts on the symbolic power of commandeering one’s own fate.
Beginning with the premise that “the Middle Ages were no more
Christian than the late Eastern Bloc was communist” (10),
Vaneigem documents the trials of medieval heretics from the perspective of the present, and seeks to demonstrate the now familiar
dionysian assertion that “the economy is everywhere that life is not”
(17). Sounding remarkably like Baudrillard, Vaneigem states that
[t]he apocalypse has been announced so many times that it cannot
occur. And even if it did it would be hard to distinguish it from the
everyday fate already reserved for individual and community
alike. Is it hard to imagine a more sinister dance of death than
war, torture, tyranny, disaster, sickness, boredom, guilty pleasures, and the kind of gratification that prefers self-torture to selfenlightenment? Is not survival cut from the very same cloth of
apocalypse? (19–20)

Vaneigem realigns Ingmar Bergman’s chessboard, so that death
and life both oppose survival. This theoretical move is informed less
by Baudrillard’s cool and ironic postalienation than by his own
political passion, which continues to voice the genuinely transgressive demands of adversary culture:
The millenarian incitement to produce one’s own unhappiness has
so thoroughly impregnated the world of the imagination that
everything from art to daydreaming consists of negative scenarios,
doomed love affairs, inevitable failures, inevitable obsolescence,
bitter victories or bliss in ignorance. The only way to remedy the
lassitude brought on by survival is through a treatment, focusing
on negativity, that uses alchemy to rid life of the effects of survival, radically remaking the human from what is most human:
namely the search for pleasure. (248)

156

After the Orgy

The most profound response to the supremacy of a deferred eternity is thus to appropriate the afterlife libidinally in the present.
Vaneigem’s project rests on his belief that “[t]he end of the world,
with or without renewal, is profitable only in its anticipation. The
economy prophesies the apocalyptic horror of the world’s disappearance only on the condition of the horror of an already ruined life” (88).
The answer, according to Vaneigem, is certainly not vulgar
hedonism, which inevitably results in the aftertaste of death (a result
of failing to address the libidinal atrophy of the market). Nor is it
Bataille’s vision of nostalgic continuity, but rather in a spiritual
“alchemy” that inhabits the space between transgression and transcendence. Such a vision, however, is far too esoteric, oblique, and
romantic (read “sixties-ish”) to be adopted by those he expects to live
it out, namely the Maffesolian neotribes of the urban centers.
Nevertheless, Vaneigem insists that “nothing can stop [him] from
searching out that strange crowd of people who inhabit the shadows
of the scaffolds, the darkness of prisons and factories, the secret
places of the city . . . [for] . . . . It is they who have lived and are
still trying to live by forsaking the imperatives of survival” (257).
Today’s “strange crowd” consists of those “idlers of the
Apocalypse” (Virilio, 1986: 69) who seem to instinctively appreciate
the symbolic power of controlling their own bodies (and by extension, their own death) in the interests of “living truly.” By cutting
and piercing their flesh, these neopagans oppose the alienated spectacle of death fashion, as well as the survivalist mentality of cosmetic surgery. The ideas of Baudrillard, Vaneigem and Michel
Maffesoli are inscribed in the bloodletting and branding of these
(perhaps only slightly) less mediated bodies. Indeed, the “self as
counterdiscourse” (John Walker) seems to be an ironic return to
decadent notions of art and artifice.
Baudrillard likewise sees something subversive in this postmodern tendency to equate adornment with transcendent pain.
Observing an almost organic empathy between graffiti-scrawled
trains and tattooed flesh, Baudrillard comments that “[s]omething
about the city has become tribal . . . before writing, with these powerful emblems stripped of meaning. An incision into the flesh of
empty signs that do not signify personal identity, but group initiation and affiliation: ‘A biocybernetic self-fulfilling prophecy world
orgy I’” (1993: 82).
The contemporary obsession with survival is, for Baudrillard,
“the most worrying sign of the degradation of the species” (1989: 43).
It represents the flip side not only of the decadent’s meticulous selfabuse, but also of the heroin-fueled “thanatoids” of our own time. Yet
Baudrillard, as always, jolts us out of such Apollonian earnestness by
reminding us that “[e]verywhere survival has become a burning

Playing at Catastrophe

157

issue, perhaps by some weariness of life or a collective desire for
catastrophe.” Nevertheless, “we should not take all this too seriously,” because it is “also a playing at catastrophe” (ibid.: 42).

Temporary Autonomous Zones and the Archaic Revival
. . . the mass of people oughtn’t even to try to think—because
they can’t. They should be alive and frisky, and acknowledge
the great god Pan. He’s the only god for the masses, forever.
The few can go in for higher cults if they like. But let the
mass be forever pagan.
Oliver Mellors, Lady Chatterley’s Lover
(Lawrence, 1994: 300)
The twentieth century does not make sense whatsoever
unless it ends in a complete transformation of the species.
And the nuclear death and the life-affirming factors are so
inextricably intertwined that it will remain a horse race
right up until the last moment.
Terence McKenna (20)
When are a few lumps going to appear in this smooth time?
Hard to believe in the return of Carnival, of Saturnalia.
Perhaps time has stopped here in the Pleroma, here in the
Gnostic dreamworld where our bodies are rotting but our
“minds” are downloaded into eternity. We know so much—
how can we not know the answer to this most vexing of questions?
Hakim Bey (1994)

Baudrillard not only believes that utopia exists, but that it lies conveniently across the Atlantic ocean. In his travel book, America
(1989), he squints into the “mirror of our decadence” in a Swiftian
journey of surreal discovery and philosophical reflection. While “we”
Europeans (and colonial mimics) philosophize on the end of anything
and everything, in America things are actually coming to an end.
(In fact, Baudrillard and Fukuyama are merely the most
recent intellectuals to perceive historical stagnation in the United
States. Julian Pefanis reminds us that, for Alexandre Kojève, “the
American way of life prefigures a life at the end of history” [1991:
13]; similarly Huysmans’s A Rebours was written “[o]ut of disgust
with [the] American lifestyle” [in Beaumont 44]. Indeed, this

158

After the Orgy

nation’s violent inception was explained by Christopher Columbus
in millennial terms: “God made me the messenger of the new heaven and the new earth of which he spoke in the Apocalypse of St.
John after having spoken of it through the mouth of Isaiah; and he
showed me the spot where to find it” [in Boyer, 1992: 225].)
The model citizens of this modern utopia are joggers, who,
according to Baudrillard at least
are the true Latter Day Saints and the protagonists of an easydoes-it Apocalypse. Nothing evokes the end of the world more
than a man running straight ahead on a beach, swathed in the
sounds of his walkman, cocooned in the solitary sacrifice of his
energy, indifferent even to catastrophes since he expects
destruction to come only as the fruit of his own efforts, from
exhausting the energy of a body that has in his own eyes become
useless. (1989: 91)

Of course the irony that propels Baudrillard’s narrative is the realization that this utopia is simultaneously a nightmare. The old
Chinese proverb—“May you get what you want”—has come true.
Affluent liberation has produced a kitsch prison.
The pragmatic difficulty of sustaining and maintaining the
utopian state is that it always threatens to flip into dystopia. As
most communes discovered in the 1960s, utopia is “no-place” on
account of its tendency to fall apart, given the elusiveness of perfection (at least since the Fall). Not everyone will agree with
Baudrillard’s provocative assertion that the American experience is
“the crisis of an achieved utopia.” But we can certainly appreciate
the hypothetical dilemma of America having to confront “the problem of its duration and permanence” (ibid.: 92).
In Western eschatology the millennium is often a synonym for
utopia. (Thomas More’s Utopia was subtitled Millennium in some
editions.) This equation was reinforced by the biblical anticipation
of Christ’s thousand-year reign, and its attendent spiritual perks.
Armageddon, the Second Coming, and the last days leading to
Judgment Day, convey a powerful sense of imminence while, simultaneously locating it in the “no-place” of the future. In this scenario,
tomorrow never comes. Situating utopia within the hyperreal coordinates of American commodity culture, Baudrillard claims that,
“[u]topia is no longer the domain of transcendence, it is the domain
of simulation” (ibid.: 27).
From More and Jonathan Swift to H. G. Wells and Baudrillard,
speculative literature has tended to equate social utopias with
entropy, stagnation, banality, decadence, and other forms of “panicin-slow-motion.” In such moral fables, utopia represents an end-ofthe-rainbow scenario. The elusive qualities of utopia have inspired

Playing at Catastrophe

159

a latter-day Situationist and self-described “poetic terrorist,” Bey,
to formulate his concept of the Temporary Autonomous Zone or
TAZ. The point of doing so is to acknowledge that “paradise” is a
highly mobile concept which, in order to flourish in its authentic
and “unmediated” state, must resist pressures to stabilize it.
Bey defines the TAZ as
an uprising which does not engage directly with the State, a guerilla operation which liberates an area (of land, of time, of imagination) and then dissolves itself to re-form elsewhere/elsewhen, before
the State can crush it . . . . The TAZ is thus a perfect tactic for an
era in which the State is omnipresent and all-powerful and yet
simultaneously riddled with cracks and vacancies. (1991: 101)

As a heterotopic eruption into the political mediascape, Bey’s utopia
is explicitly dionysian. Some of its most celebrated moments
include the Paris Commune, D’Annunzio’s outlaw state of Fiume,
pirate utopias, 1960s’ be-ins, and—more recently—non-commercial
dance parties or “raves.” (Neither John of Leyden’s New Jerusalem,
David Koresh’s Waco Compound, nor the Bible Belt’s “freedom
zones” qualifies as a TAZ on account of the violence and/or coercion
that underpins them. Those, however, who have seen William
Gozecki’s astonishing film, Waco: The Rules of Engagement
[1997]—which documents the American government’s brutal
response to the Branch Davidians—may feel that this was indeed a
TAZ, and one so successful that it could not be tolerated by the
authorities.)23
In many respects Bey’s prescription for an “eros of the social”
emerges from a more romantic (though highly qualified and politically engaged) Baudrillardian perspective; perhaps closer to
Vaneigem. “Disappearance” is acknowledged to be a valid strategy,
provided it is not complicit with that “silence of an ironic hyperconformity” that Bey sees as the inevitable end point of the
Frenchman’s philosophy. “TAZ-theory tries to concern itself with
existing or emerging situations rather than with pure utopianism,”
he writes. “All over the world people are leaving or ‘disappearing’
themselves from the Grid of Alienation and seeking ways to restore
human contact” (1995):
As I read it, disappearance seems to be a very logical radical option
for our time, not at all a disaster or death for the radical project.
Unlike morbid deathfreak nihilistic interpretation of Theory, mine
intends to mine it for useful strategies in the always-ongoing “revolution of everyday life”: the struggle that cannot cease even with
the last failure of political or social revolution because nothing
except the end of the world can bring an end to everyday life, nor

160

After the Orgy
to our aspirations for the good things, for the Marvelous. And as
Nietzsche said, if the world could come to an end, logically it would
have done so; it has not, so it does not. And so, as one of the Sufis
said, no matter how many draughts of forbidden wine we drink, we
will carry this raging thirst into eternity. (ibid.)

However, as Mark Dery succinctly pointed out to me during an
interview, because “the TAZ is temporary” and “autonomous,” it
cannot claim to be politically effective. “The obvious problem with a
psychopolitics whose challenges to the status quo are a return to
Dionysian excess and abandon,” he insists elsewhere, “is that consumer culture eats such challenges for breakfast” (38). Like the
allegedly “transgressive” carnival, the TAZ can be viewed as just
another liminal space in which to reactivate the prohibition and
reinforce the social order.
Bey tries to address this criticism in his article-cum-footnote
entitled “Permanent TAZs” (1995). While his writing abounds with
concrete examples of immediatism or TAZs, he offers no practical
advice on extending the utopian use-by date. What we get instead
are abstract calls to arms, as when he states that the Permanent
Autonomous Zone is constituted by “the long-drawn-out intensification of the joys—and risks—of the TAZ,” and that “the intensification of the PAZ will be . . . . Utopia Now” (ibid.). Here we see
how the ghost of Baudrillard’s America hovers over all attempts to
envisage a non-naive and post-Edenic utopia. The question becomes
politically vital; Can we separate “permanence” from its seemingly
intrinsic alliance with the status quo? Is the duration of time inherently oppressive?
Bey tries to reconcile political activism with Epicurean sensualism—a conflict that provided enough sparks to power the counterculture of the 1960s. He has a sharp eye and an even sharper
tongue, which is quick to denounce the pseudotransgressions of the
millennial spectacle. Sporting his Situationist affiliations, Bey
equates the machinations of capital with those digital circuses that
it both produces and consumes in a grotesque model of perpetual
motion. Agreeing with Baudrillard that “in every spectacle there is
the immanence of the catastrophe” (1993: 186), he encourages us to
shun its attempts at seduction. He believes we have fallen into the
habit of interpreting mere antisocial behavior as subversive radicalism, mistaking reactionary self-loathing for some kind of
“authentic” creativity. It seems fair to say that Bey would have little patience with Paglia’s theory that “paganism has survived in the
thousand forms of sex, art, and now the modern media” (25), for he
would seek its legacy in far less visible spaces.
There is a powerfully libidinal component to Bey’s TAZ, mainly
because unmediated human contact is its raison d’être. Here again

Playing at Catastrophe

161

we can detect a grudging affiliation with Baudrillard, who also maintains that “anything that bypasses mediation is a source of pleasure”
(1993a: 70). In this respect, the TAZ resembles Sir Richard Burton’s
“Sotadic Zone,” that transgressive imaginary space “in which androgyny, pederasty, and perversion held sway” (Showalter 81). It thus
forms another dionysian blindspot where Pan can cavort for a while
before Apollo once more slams on the cuffs and reads him his rights.
(Like all such discourses, the TAZ is complicated by ethics, law, and
other liberal notions protecting the rights of the individual.)
Bey’s insistence on “immediatism” forces him to use his agile
intellect in dealing with the technophilia of many contemporary
subcultures, including those ravers, techno-pagans and anarchohackers who, significantly, make up the bulk of his readership.
Cyberians often claim the Internet, virtual realities, multi-user
dimensions, and other fiber-optic paraspaces as the TAZ incarnate.
Bey, however, is more cautious in handling the double-edged sword
of communications technologies:
The TAZ agrees with the hackers because it wants to come into
being—in part—through the Net, even through the mediation of
the Net. But it also agrees with the greens because it retains
intense awareness of itself as body and feels only revulsion for
CyberGnosis, the attempt to transcend the body through instantaneity and simulation. The TAZ tends to view the Tech/anti-Tech
dichotomy as misleading, like most dichotomies, in which apparent opposites turn out to be falsifications or even hallucinations
caused by semantics . . . . [The TAZ] will use the computer
because the computer exists, but it will also use powers which are
so completely unrelated to alienation or simulation that they
guarantee a certain psychic paleolithism to the TAZ, a primordialshamanic spirit which will “infect” even the Net itself (the true
meaning of Cyberpunk as I read it). (1991: 110-112)

Bey harmonizes the conflict by resurrecting the old Situationist
strategy of détournement, which involves turning the detritus of the
system back on itself. Encouraged to become thieving magpies—the
“hunter/gatherers of the world of CommTech” (109)—we are
reminded of William Gibson’s oft-quoted maxim, “The street finds
its own uses for things,” including, of course, electronic hardware.
Neither Bey’s pagan affection for the bucolic, nor his neo-Victorian
weakness for the simple pleasures of quilt making leads him to
ignore the technologically informed agenda of today’s subcultures.
According to Bey, then, we need to return not just to a material but to a “psychic technology.” In this conjunction between the
mystical and the mathematical we find another guru of dionysian
revivalism, McKenna, and his cyberian disciples from the “trench-

After the Orgy

162
es of hyperspace.”

Civilization and Its Discotheques
Panic doesn’t have to be unhappy. I see it as ecstasy. It’s just a
mode of propagation by contiguity, like contagion, only
faster—the ancient principle of metamorphosis, going from
one form to another without passing through a system of
meaning.
Baudrillard (Gane, 1993: 104)

All discussions of technology rely—to varying degrees—on metaphysical metaphors, especially when referring to its unprecedented
acceleration and obscure destiny. While this is a strong theme in
the relatively sober writings of Heidegger, McLuhan, and Virilio, it
is also the staple of drug-casualties from the 1960s. While I myself
have suggested that Pan is the goat in the machine, some writers
display an unwavering faith in the new divinity of technology, seeing human salvation as courtesy of the machina ex machina.
According to a Californian mathematician, Ralph Abraham, a
“brief kiss” between starched mathematicians and patchoulied hippies in the late 1960s constituted “a fractal event, marking a point
in human history from which the underlying shape or order of existence . . . could be inferred” (Rushkoff 24). He goes on to argue that
the cyberian interest in the pagan, psychedelic, spiritual, and
tribal is not in the least contradictory to the advances in computer technology and mathematics. Historically . . . renaissance
periods have always involved a resurgence of archaic elements
along with the invention of new technologies and mathematical
systems. (ibid.: 25—paraphrased by Rushkoff)

For the Pop-anthropologist, Douglas Rushkoff, the cyberians of the
1990s marked the point where the “sixties bell curve finally touches down” (ibid.: 85). Abraham and others become part of his project,
which is dionysian in so far as it seeks to take the “logic” out of the
technological. He diligently documents anecdotal evidence for the
dawning of an age which, although slightly less waterlogged than
Aquarius, operates with the same utopian promise.
The Nietzschean promotion of pagan values against the corrupt dogma of Christianity has become a legacy for today’s young
misfits. In Rushkoff ’s analysis, the 1990s become a reprise of the
1960s, marked by a resurgence of dionysian excess. Both the orgias-

Playing at Catastrophe

163

tic carnival of the Burning Man festival in Nevada (where a giant
wicker man is symbolically torched in a modern-day potlatch) and
the mindless catharsis of a Rave in Yourtown, USA, are symptoms
of a global neopaganism that treads the razor’s edge between commercial appropriation and a grassroots celebration.
Like Bey, McKenna agrees that we are playing clumsily with a
new “psychic technology”—just as the apes do at the beginning of
2001: a Space Odyssey (1968). In a sense, then, we are awaiting
that symbolic jump cut that will connect our ancient past with our
glorious future. “What is happening,” McKenna informs us,
is an overall transformation of humanity into an entirely different
kind of creature. The monkey is being shed. And the thing that is
made of language and of image and imagination, that has resided in
the monkeys for so long, is now superseding biological evolution and,
through culture, taking over the reins of its own form and destiny.
And the chaos of our age, which is so troubling to us all, is nothing
unusual at all. It is the normal situation when a species prepares to
leave the planet. This is the chaos at the end of history. (32)

How McKenna knows what is “normal” when a species prepares to leave a planet is anyone’s guess. The giveaway is to be
found in one of the epigraphs to this chapter, where he states that
the twentieth century “does not make any sense” unless it results
in a “complete transformation of the species.” This hunger for
meaning exposes the latent fascist logic in his transcendental theory of humanity, which he shares with extropians, performance
artists, engineers, UFO cultists and other proponents of bodyloathing “CyberGnosis.” Understandably, this is the point at which
he parts company with the more “authentic” dionysian, Bey.
McKenna is thus the latest in that long line of people who view
history as a unified, coherent, and harmonious plot, whose gross
tragedies and infinite subtleties coalesce into a pseudo-Proustian tale
of redemption and salvation. He aims to make “people . . . say, ‘Now
I understand! Now I understand why the pyramids, why the fall of
Rome, why Auschwitz, why the H-bomb” (18). Each becomes a nodal
point on the path foreshadowed by a religious and scientific urge to
see larger forces at work—to see Heidegger’s “destining” in action.
Nevertheless, McKenna tries to talk in dionysian terms when
affirming states of intoxication and the libidinal influence of Pan.
But he often slips into a strange kind of elitism—and an eighteenth-century spirit of evolutionism—when suggesting that drugs
should be taken only by town planners, architects, and other
visionaries of the future. The most reactionary aspect of his
thought, however, is located in the structure of millenarian
prophecy itself, and especially in his resonant definition of history

164

After the Orgy

as “the shock wave of eschatology” (41):
Something is at the end of time and it is casting an enormous shadow over human history, drawing all human becoming toward it. All
wars, the philosophies, the rapes, the pillaging, the migrations, the
cities, the civilizations—all of this is occupying a microsecond of
geological, planetary, and galactic time as the monkeys react to the
symbiote, which is in the environment and which is feeding information to humanity about the larger picture. (ibid.)

This “something” at the end of time is the Eschaton, a necessarily
ambiguous transcendental object at the end of history. Like the millennium itself, the Eschaton is a floating symbol, equally as seductive and opaque as Arthur C. Clarke’s monolith in 2001. According
to McKenna, the means to reach it is as vivid and psychedelic as
Stanley Kubrick’s famous climactic sequence at the end of the film;
in fact, it is much more so, thanks to the magic mushroom and
other potent hallucinogens. The details of his own experimental
epiphanies—which involve “self-transforming machinic elves”—are
recorded in a volume of essays and interviews entitled The Archaic
Revival (1991). Its mantralike message is firmly within the premillennial tradition of utopianism, although it displays some specifically Californian idiosyncrasies.
McKenna thinks that a general historical acceleration will
cause enough cultural friction to make the human kernel “pop” suddenly and miraculously into a fluffy white angelic creature.
Although this popcorn theory exists on the fringes of accepted philosophy, it is central to New-Age ideology. In combining elements of
both Aldous Huxley and Timothy Leary, McKenna provides an
example of that retrospective tampering with the meaning of history that Michael André Bernstein calls “foreshadowing.” Such a
rhetorical strategy tries to “explain” suffering and injustice as
“inevitable” or “preordained.”
McKenna insists that
[t]he Aeon, eternity, and the millennium are accomplished facts,
not an anticipation. Hence the mushroom stands at the end of history. It stands for an object that pulls all history toward itself. It’s
a causal force that operates upon us backward through time. It is
why things happen the way they do; because everything is being
pulled forward toward a nexus of transformation. (70)

Indeed, McKenna sees it “as a necessary chaos that will lead to a
new and more attractive order” (160). This is not Bey’s ever-present, creative chaos: it is a storm-before-the-calm, to be weathered in
the sheltered workshop of a contemplative mind. A fascination with

Playing at Catastrophe

165

colored lights in the psyche morphs into the familiar dilution of
dionysian concerns and the political apathy which accompanies it.
It is easy to dismiss McKenna on the grounds that his own
drug-induced revelations are exactly that: the frazzled ravings of a
sixties’ refugee. But because his sermonizing has been picked up by
the global network of cyberians—and most notably ravers—these
ideas are filtering into the melting pot of allegedly anti-Apollonian
philosophies. McKenna’s sophisticated prodrug message, together
with his perceptive observation that culture itself is the original
“virtual reality,” function as a Trojan horse for his more insidiously
Darwinian narrative, which acknowledges National Socialism as
its “negative” incarnation (205). McKenna thus concludes that “it’s
true that the earth is the cradle of mankind, but one cannot remain
in the cradle forever” (66). Sci-fi fantasies of physical transcendence
not only render the very material basis of human existence expendable, but continue the legacy of colonization into the virgin territories of the galaxy.
As in the cases of the Heaven’s Gate and Aum Shinrikyo cults,
millenarian ideas that filter through popular science-fiction can
seduce people into a thanatic rapture, and lead them to direct their
murderous impulses either toward the self or the other. (Shoko
Asahara and his advisors used Isaac Asimov’s Foundation series as
a blueprint for their own sinister New World Order [Kaplan and
Marshall, 29-30].) Some young people—and not so young—weaned
on a steady diet of Dr. Who, Star Trek, Star Wars, The X-Files and
many other apocalyptically tinged science-fiction shows, display an
aesthetic affection for such inter-galactic trappings. Science-fiction
is a convenient host for parasitical discourses associated with neoimperialism, paranoia, alien-nation and world domination.
How else are we to explain the fact that McKenna’s followers
consist mostly of environmentally conscious and politically active
techno-fans? Why do these subcultures empathize with the sinister
subtext of McKenna’s evolutionist agenda? It seems that his fusion
of the futuristic and the archaic acts as a smoke screen to smuggle
in his notion of the Transcendental Fungus. Perhaps I am overstating the significance of McKenna’s peripheral gospel, however, his
arguments demonstrate the internal contradictions—and seemingly
eternal dynamic—between prophecy and immediatism, utopia and
temporary autonomous zones, and transgression and transcendence.
According to McKenna, the revelation and panic of the UFO signals
the eruption of Pan, “bursting through from the underworld” (60).
Indeed, he even refers to Huysmans, describing A Rebours as

166

After the Orgy
an amazing novel about a man who is so sensitized to perception
that he can’t leave his apartments. He has his walls covered in felt
and keeps the lights very low. He collects the [French Symbolist
painter] Redon when nobody had ever heard of Redon. He buys
turtles and has jewels affixed to their backs. Then he sits in a halflit room and smokes hashish and watches the turtles crawl around
on his Persian rugs. Let’s all go home and do this. (77)

Yet Huysmans’s pessimistic decadence lies on the far side of the spectrum to McKenna’s spaced-out fantasies of a posthuman superrace.
The Archaic Revival invokes the unifying notion of the Overmind. It
thus continues the tradition of anticipating quantum leaps in human
existence, and gestures mutely towards Ralph Waldo Emerson’s
Oversoul and Friedrich Nietzsche’s Overman. McKenna’s ascendant
agenda is not so much a climb up Jacob’s ladder as a tour through the
magic faraway tree; the perfect scenario for a rave.
Because McKenna champions the shamanic “ecstasy” of
drugs, his project is appropriated by technopagans, who either
overlook or ignore his contempt for large-scale, bacchanalian gatherings. There is no doubt that McKenna’s writings encourage this
enormous “global tribe,” which he insists is superior to the 1960s
counterculture in all respects, not least in its organizational skills
and longevity. But because he defines ecstasy as “the contemplation of wholeness” (13), he sees no point in using “ecstasy” and
other synthetic drugs purely for fun. Instead of a TAZ, he seeks a
durable launchpad for the soul.
“Ecstasy” literally means “a standing forth”—of the soul from
the body, in the Christian tradition. Ravers often speak (although
usually not in these terms) of the almost Bataillean continuity
experienced at a successful dance party. Indeed, Bataille’s ghost
haunts many of these gatherings, reminding us that the morbid flavor of much “gen-x” pop-culture has infiltrated the rave. “We can
only reach a state of ecstasy,” writes Bataille, “when we are conscious of death or annihilation, even remotely” (1986: 267).
The cultural critic Simon Reynolds argues that certain postmodern notions are “tailor-made for rave culture”:
The concept of the “desiring machine,” for example, describes the
way that the sound system, DJ and audience combine to form a
single mechanism generating euphoria without pretext or context.
The Deleuzian notion of the “body without organs”—a notion sufficiently opaque to defy any ready textual summary—might be
best explained through the polymorphously perverse rapture
enjoyed by the raver on ecstasy, a sensuous but sexless bliss without climax. (35)

Playing at Catastrophe

167

Anybody who has experienced the aphrodisiac, even orgiastic,
effects of the drug ecstasy would question Reynolds’s use of the
word sexless, which certainly does not describe that female technopagan’s testimony to the disturbing sexual power of the rave, which
I quoted in my introduction. Nevertheless, his observation that the
mode of the rave is generally “bliss without climax” is accurate.
Unlike the traditional rock-concert, it often emphasizes a mantralike “monotony,” devoid of peak hit-singles or a pyrotechnic finale.
All the fireworks explode in the head while the body is left bouncing like a marionette.
The many different types of rave are organized according to
techno-music’s various subcategories and aesthetic allegiances.
An urban drum ’n’ bass party in a disused factory is a completely
different experience from the trance party held by neopagans in
the forests of northern Australia or on the coast of India. Urban
raves tend to be more streetwise, focusing on the production and
distribution of the music and its related visual paraphernalia. At
least in my experience, rural raves are usually held by technopagans, or by more spiritually inclined people, who follow a hotchpotch of holistic philosophies, including Zen Buddhism, Gaia and
the Goddess, benign satanism, green politics, and New Age transcendentalism. However, in their overtly carnivalesque aspect, all
raves, no matter how “sophisticated,” leave themselves open to
charges of a postmodern bacchanalia.
At one point, Rushkoff ’s book introduces the concept of “morphogenetic fields.” These are accumulations of mystico-psychic
traces or empathetic vibrations that influence cultural phenomenoa. London’s morphogenetic field, he tells us, is more powerful
than America’s:
London’s pagan cultures have endured centuries of repression and
distillation. Their phase-locking was probably achieved somewhere in the twelfth century. Symbols and even personalities from
ancient pagan times still live in London house [music] . . . .
While the English rave has a quality of medievalism, tribal energy, and Old World paganism, the American cyber disco is the most
modern mutation of bliss induction, and uses whatever means
necessary to bring people into the fractal pattern. (120-121, 125)

Australian technopagans claim that a hundred thousand years of
spiritual connections between dancing Aborigines and their land have
created morphogenetic fields that account for the special quality of
Antipodean raves. Without going into the complicated politics of postcolonial corroborees, we can appreciate how this subculture, in constructing its own dubious dynamic between past and future, provides
sociological evidence for the Maffesolis of this world, who believe in

168

After the Orgy

the power of the orgy and in the explosion of new tribal formations.
New Age travelers were among the most visible and victimized
critics of Margaret Thatcher’s Britain, which introduced Draconian
laws (including one banning “loud, monotonous booming sounds”)
to eradicate musical gatherings. These TAZs became even more
temporary when riot police were sent in to stamp out such
dionysian frivolity. But while in England it became a game of
“thump the mole” between state and rave, commercialism was also
waiting to feed off the carcass.
It is a countercultural truism that Pepsi can destroy any transgressive impulse or “authentic celebration” faster than any police
force. Nevertheless, Pan continues to dance in invisible spaces, one
step ahead of his Apollonian nemesis. No less than the Pill or the
Bomb, the amplifier (and especially the sampler/sequencer/turntable)
has been a political catalyst in stirring D. H. Lawrence’s “pagan mass”
into a frenzied fusion, which the authorities perceived as a threat.
Nietzsche’s Birth of Tragedy (1872) valorized the dionysian
properties of music. In the rave, mosh, Burning Man, and other
youth-oriented carnivalesque eruptions we see other philosophical
seeds beginning to grow. What they will grow into, and whether
they will be genetically engineered into something else, is a question worth considering.

After the Orgy (But Before the Test Results)
We seem to be in some sort of temporal flux.
Star Trek Generations
[T]here is no closure at the end of the twentieth century—
sooner a “closure-effect.”
Geoff Waite (1)

The tension that exists between orgasm-as-sacrifice (petite mort)
and orgasm-as-insemination (reproduction, immortality) always
depends upon the panic dynamic. Accordingly, those three zeros
contained in the year 2000 began to acquire a pornographic gloss.
In the phallic economy of apocalypse, each zero becomes either an
orifice used in the game of political withdrawal, or a womb to return
to in a mass movement of redemptive regression.
The end as such, at least according to Baudrillard, is an illusion; perhaps the fundamental illusion in a world structured on

Playing at Catastrophe

169

such mirages. Hence the dionysian embrace of such uncertainty
principles as the imaginary, dreams, intoxication, trances, the
unconscious, pataphysics, and chaos theory. Perhaps this also
explains the immense cultural impact of cyberspace—Gibson’s
“conceptual hallucination”—a new social space that was a hypothetical playground before it became a corporate battleground.
Information technologies have become the millennial terrain of
erotic-thanatic interactions. This historical juncture is as intense
as the final level of a video game played throughout the centuries,
an enigmatic virtual challenge on which all previous achievements
are staked. Do we save the game now, and continue later? Quit
while we’re ahead? Or is it already too late? Such a trite metaphor
at least captures the Western perception of history as a linear
process of accumulation.
The scientific rapture of the intellect reveals and uncovers
what is not yet known, and this knowledge follows an apocalyptic
momentum. The word Doomsday recalls the Domesday Book,
William the Conqueror’s first attempt in 1085 to catalog the populace. According to a popular rumor of the time, the completion of this
task would herald the end of the world, a recognition of the bureaucratic affinity between this census and the Holy book of Judgment
Day. Perhaps the very act of recording names could lead to salvation.
In this sense, the Last Days will be characterized not by the victory
of anarchy over civilization but rather by the triumph of the Western
quest to pierce and record the secrets of the universe.
Arthur C. Clarke’s canonical short story, “The Nine Billion
Names of God” (1967), is a parable of how the Enlightenment project
will be completed in the information age. A powerful new computer
program is commissioned by a group of Tibetan monks who wish to
identify the true name of God. Those who do not believe that IBM
software could possibly complete such a sacred task begin to descend
by night from the mountain monastery, only to see the stars wink out
one by one. The power of this image stems not only from our deep
connection to scientific narratives of completion and exhaustion, but
from Deleuze’s insight that “[w]e are made up of fatigues as much as
of contemplations” (77). (See chapter 1 of Difference and Repetition
for his unique perspective on the orgiastic.)
Apocalypse is thus a grand label for completion and closure: the
mystery simultaneously answered and gone. Groaning under the
weight of accumulated knowledge, our episteme secretly desires a
clean slate and a fresh start. “The accumulation of time imposes the
idea of progress,” Baudrillard notes, “as the accumulation of science
imposes the ideas of truth: in each case, what is accumulated is no
longer symbolically exchanged, but becomes an objective dimension”
(1993: 146). In other words, science traps its self-manufactured

170

After the Orgy

truth within dead objects, amputated from the general economy of
existence. It therefore mistakenly relies on surplus time and knowledge, which are as useless as those enormous silos of “emergency”
grain, which rots in the United States while much of the world
starves. Baudrillard thinks “we cannot hope for a . . . revolution
at the end of this process of spiralling hoarding” (ibid.: 147).
The postmodern vision of apocalypse is thus not a battle
between demons and harlots, but a conference of bespectacled computer programmers with identical pocket-protectors. As the enigma
of Armageddon morphs into the spreadsheets of Silicon Valley,
Truth is revealed not in a thunderclap, but in Bill Gates’s monotonal whine. As Krishan Kumar puts it, “[c]atastrophe will be
expressed in lines on a graph rather than in the imagery of the
Book of Revelation” (211). Such is the “debased millenarianism”
(ibid.: 212) of our own epoch, where seduction and fate yield to
rationality and causality.
“Our Apocalypse is not real,” Baudrillard declares, “it is virtual”
(1994: 119). Unlike Neil Armstrong, history itself is “taking a fantastic step backwards by building the ruins of the future” (ibid.: 79). The
end of the space-race heralds the end of the most impoverished, the
most materialistic, and the most imperialistic form of transcendence
that our scientific society could provide. Even “the end” has become
a sort of satellite, like transcendence, orbiting the earth without
being able to hit the escape velocity needed for release. Should any of
these grand values—history, apocalypse, and transcendence—ever
return to us, it will do so only in the manner of a battered Mir-like
satellite, spiraling back to earth in a spectacular crash.

7

Conclusion:
The Revelation Will not be Televised

Y2Care: Debugging the Millennium

It all follows, so why seek complexity where there is none?
Dolmance (Sade 96)
Eroticism’s too heavy a burden for human strength. The torment of orgies is inseparable from the agony of war as Jünger
pictured it: in the morning you wake up under the table with
the litter of the previous evening around you. This is a given
for orgies, a condition without which they wouldn’t exist.
Georges Bataille (Davenport-Hines 329)

New Year’s Eves are notoriously anti-climactic. This is because we
insist that they hold the symbolic weight of a temporally significant
transitional moment, a weight the actual experience of time passing
cannot hold. Despite the conviction of the prophets of apocalypse,
there is always a morning after. We are always already after the orgy.
The urge for fusion through confusion, and continuity over discontinuity—no matter how primal, infantile, or mystical its origin—is a dionysian theme now being remobilized by the media, who
anxiously await a spectacle worthy of the occasion. (The pop-singer
Jennifer Lopez provided a perfect example of this orgasmic anticipation in her video clip for “Waiting for Tonight,” which lovingly
depicted a group of millennial party-goers being drenched in the
Derridean spume of giant champagne-bottles-cum-fire-hydrants.)
All the media hype surrounding New Years’ Eve 2000 helped create
the anticlimactic wave that swept the globe with the millennial

171

172

Conclusion

dawn, compounded and aggravated by centuries of this discursive
foreplay. “Ultimate detachment is not the same as freedom” Walter
Kirn had already warned, before noting that “escape is no substitute for liberation and rapture isn’t happiness. The sound-and-light
show at the end of time . . . seems bound to disappoint” (Dery 49).
Every cliché in history was forced to jump through the mesmerizing hoops of those three zeros in the year 2000. Computer scientists
and corporate executives awaited the date with dread because they
had a self-made apocalypse on their hands, known as the “millennium bug” or the Y2K problem. As if believing unconsciously in the
Christian Millennium, computer programmers put only two digits in
each silicon chip, making ’69 stand for 1969 without anticipating the
problems this could bring in the twenty-first century. Possible scenarios offered by self-styled experts included everything from minor
inconvenience to total system breakdown, including nuclear dysfunction. One newspaper reported that “[t]he failure to program even
vastly powerful mainframe computers to cope with a trivial change
of date may be the biggest, most costly and absurd mistake in the history of the industrialized world” (Reeve et al. 53). We were told to
brace for the Infocalypse, which would begin in New Zealand and
sweep west across the globe with the dawning of the millennium. The
Y2K problem was thus a perfect fable of modern myopia, a prosaic
twist on the Frankenstein myth that our technology will destroy us.
Suddenly the corporate demand for “Y2K compliance” became a
warning to us all—upgrade or freeze.
The year 2000 (or more specifically 2001) was more than a
date. It represented a future that was never supposed to come, or
at least not so soon. Currently taking the first tentative steps into
the third millennium, we find ourselves in the position of someone
who has lusted after a sex object for so long that consummation
seems undesirable because it will be inevitably disappointing. Not
being able to resist, however, we try to postpone an awkward awakening: “after the national orgasm a sort of collective melancholy”
(Baudrillard, 1989: 58). Or even worse, feeling a sharp twinge in
our loins—the location of the Last Judgement (Brown, 1990: 49)—
we realize we have all caught the millennium bug, a virus with the
potential to seize the entire system.
And yet the Y2K prophecy—like all others before it—turned
out to be a hoax, just another in a long line of anticlimaxes. “The
worst of it all,” predicted Jean Baudrillard, “is precisely that there
will be no end to anything, and all these things will continue to
unfold slowly, tediously, recurrently, in that hysterisis of everything
which, like nails and hair, continue to grow after death” (1994: 116).
Barely a year into the twenty-first century, and it becomes
increasingly clear that Jacques Derrida was correct in declaring

The Revelation Will not be Televised

173

that “all language on apocalypse is also apocalyptic and cannot be
excluded from its object” (1984b: 30). With the sound of the clock
still ticking loudly in our ears, we nurse this historical hangover
and prepare for the next; patiently enduring the cultural equivalent of being too tired to sleep. What can we expect from such
hyper-ennui? What, indeed, are we doing after the orgy?
Anybody more obsessed with origins would be driven to distraction
in trying to determine whether the ur-myth of apocalypse stems
from the sexual act, or history itself. I have tried to demonstrate
that not only is it impossible to decide, but that it is misleading to
separate the two. Although Camille Paglia thinks that “the sex act
cruelly mimics history’s decline and fall” (20), we could easily provide evidence for the contrary. For as Marshall McLuhan remarks,
“[i]nstead of asking which came first, the chicken or the egg,” we
could entertain the idea that “a chicken was an egg’s idea for getting more eggs” (1974: 20).
As a conceptual model, the orgasm mimics and invokes the
anticipated millennium, being in equal parts both apocalyptic horror and divine bliss. As contingent constructions, both “sexuality”
and “history” seem to require a climax. To promote a “nonorgasmic”
and “antiphallic” model of history barely counters the fact that the
drive for transcendence dictates much of what we call “culture.” In
the last couple of centuries, tales of salvation, redemption, revelation, transcendence and transfiguration have been incubated in
sexual metaphors. Consequently, they are now saturated in the
libidinal economy of our age, so that apocalyptic tension has become
both terminable and interminable. In such a situation there seems
little evidence to counter Baudrillard’s claim that political solutions
are helpless against the symbolic.
Like Michel Maffesoli, I resist the “tyranny of the ought to be,”
but have nevertheless felt compelled to identify those currents that
sometimes hinder, and sometimes foster, the most pragmatic of
utopian impulses. To live after the orgy is not to mistake the End of
the World for that right-wing phobia, the End of Civilization as We
Know It. Rather, it is to fully appreciate the paradoxical desire to
be saved from salvation itself.
Antiapocalypticians like Donna Haraway, Lee Quinby, and
Michael André Bernstein maintain that the power of self-fulfilling
prophecies is evident in the myopic politics of everyday life,
whether conducted in Congress, the library, or at home. The more
we “foreshadow” the future in apocalyptic terms, the more we create the conditions for its arrival. If we are continuously portrayed
as waiting for the thanatic asymptote to cross the line and land on
our heads (like the nuclear witnesses waiting at the end of Thomas

174

Conclusion

Pynchon’s nuclear rainbow, or the masses gazing up at the Genitron
clock) then the chances of its actually occurring, sooner or later,
increase. The apocalypse thus becomes apocryphal, spread around
like an urban legend that then becomes “true.” As Steven Shaviro
remarks, “[o]ur incessant waiting for catastrophe to happen itself
enfolds or embodies the catastrophic event” (1997).
This point is crucial, for who can be sure of the extent to
which tales of fire-and-brimstone justice informs the vengeful
policies of the current president of the United States? (Especially
in the wake of the spectacular terrorist attacks on the twin towers of the World Trade Center; which themselves certainly count
as “apocalyptic”.)24 Yet those who write off the apocalyptic mode as
intrinsically fundamentalist and dangerous unwittingly confuse
“the truth of the revelation” with “the revealed truth” (Derrida,
1984: 28). This point is equally crucial, for antiapocalyptic
philosophies fail to take account of the imaginary politics
inscribed in many end-time scenarios.
A glib example occurs in the movie Ghostbusters (1984), when
the city of New York is under attack from thousands of poltergeists.
Dr. Peter Venkman (Bill Murray) describes the ensuing chaos as
“cats and dogs living together—mass hysteria!” Old antagonisms
are dissolved in that moment of panic when we confront the possibility of Armageddon. A more apposite example is found in Alan
Lightman’s Einstein’s Dreams (1994), a literary meditation on
alternative time-space continuums. One chapter depicts the town of
Berne, which has recently learned that the world will end in one
month’s time on September 26, 1907:
One month before the end, businesses close. The Bundeshaus
halts its proceedings. The federal telegraph building on
Speichergasse falls silent. Likewise the watch factory on
Laupenstrasse, the mill past the Nydegg Bridge. What need is
there for commerce and industry with so little time left? . . .
A barrister and a postal clerk who have never before met walk arm
in arm through the Botanischer Garten, smile at the cyclamens
and asters, discuss art and colour. What do their past stations
matter? . . . (56, 58)

In this utopian apocalypse, “a world with one month is a world of
equality.” The point of saying so, however, is not to bring such a situation into being, but to remind modern amnesiacs that different
attitudes to time call for different definitions of community. Such
stories counter the limiting determinism of people like McLuhan,
who believes that “[w]e look at the present through a rear-view mirror,” and “march backwards into the future” (1967: 74-75).

The Revelation Will not be Televised

175

Those who see the End in negative and absolutist terms may
find themselves awkwardly aligned with the religio-scientific logic
of capital, in which life is replaced by survival. Take for instance,
Ishmael Reed’s “psychic epidemic” Jes Grew, in his novel Mumbo
Jumbo (1996). This “antiplague” (which grips the vitals of its
ecstatic victims, and is linked directly to “a young comer named
Dionysus” [165]) threatens Civilization as We Know It: no bad
thing, given the miserable history of the term and its violent implementation throughout the world. In other words, it is not a matter
of being “for or against” the apocalypse, mainly because only a
handful of humans have any real influence over the matter, anyway. Instead it involves exploiting the ironic aspects of millennial
exhaustion in such a way as to incorporate Dionysian insights,
while avoiding the joyless trajectory of their conclusions (and here
I’m thinking particularly of Baudrillard, and also of “fascoid”
residues in sadistic neo-Nietzschean schools of thought).25
Quinby castigates Baudrillard for his “ironic apocalypticism,”
which she believes provides the breeding ground for an irresponsible apathy (xxii). In contrast, Richard Dellamora offers the “ironizing of apocalypse” as a discursive strategy against destructive logic,
particularly by gay activists, who have a direct investment in the
postorgy politics of libidinal millenarianism. Antiapocalypticians,
therefore, remain oblivious to the irritating grain of truth in
Baudrillard’s observation that oppositional tactics become obsolete
if based on the political rather than on the symbolic economy. While
I admire their attacks on the ideological subtext of doom-mongering, I believe these people fail to acknowledge the inescapable fact
that apocalypse has become the only postrevolutionary model of
radical change for an entire generation. Although this is in itself
unfortunate, the unstable properties of millenarianism allow for a
theoretical space in which to address the future as a crooked continuum rather than as a final culmination. In short, libidinal millenarianism is both the product of, and antidote to, cultural fatigue.
The apocalypse, deconstruction, postmodernity, millennium,
Eschaton—call it what you will—is motivated by the desire for a
progressive future, a making new. These ideas often represent a
utopia that is more pragmatic than programmatic, implicitly recognizing the fact that an exhausted epoch may not have the imaginative energy or inclination to resuscitate discredited utopian models.
Such chronotopic figures are susceptible, of course, to market-oriented manipulation, but they are also open to the seduction of dissent. The apocalyptic tone cuts both ways because it is capable of
being manipulated in the interests of opposing prophetic agendas.
As Richard Dellamora puts it, “[o]racular utterance needs to retain
‘enough apocalyptic desire’ to motivate both the pursuit of social

176

Conclusion

renovation and the continuing critique of ‘the apocalyptic discourse
itself ’” (1994: 26).
Bernstein believes that “the literary excitement of imagining an
apocalyptic breakdown of all social restraints is usually thrilling in
direct proportion to its improbability” (1992: 39). While it may be
true that media moguls, safe in their mansions, get some perverse
thrill from reading Edgar Allen Poe’s The Fall of House of Usher or
watching Bruce Willis in Armageddon, others less fortunate may
genuinely relish the social leveling-potential of apocalypse.
Millenarian fantasies have always nourished those with the least to
lose and the most to gain: the poor, the disenfranchised, the marginalized and the exploited. For every Heaven’s Gate there is a
Public Enemy, using the End for their own means (see their 1988
album “It Takes a Nation of Millions to Hold Us Back”). Bernstein’s
formula thus ignores the proliferation of nuclear movies and novels
that emerged in the cold world era, not to mention the rash of fictional viral scenarios since the hysteria surrounding HIV AIDS and
Ebola. Indeed, Hollywood’s response to the terrorist attacks on
Manhattan are yet to be fully gauged, but it would be an historical
anomaly if the production studious did not channel the subsequent
panic into mass forms of entertainment. Genuinely apocalyptic
moments have been accompanied by apocalyptic stories that are no
less “exciting” for being more likely. Indeed, they swell the profits of
doom.
Antiapocalypticians therefore choose to ignore or devalue
Derrida’s insight that “[n]othing is less conservative than the apocalyptic genre” (1984: 29). Indeed, “apocalyptic thinking can open up
spaces for the enunciation or utterance of hitherto silenced and
marginalized voices” (Dickinson 230). We must therefore remember
that the radical indeterminacy of time is not only the source of
metaphysical anguish, but also the political site of potential tomorrows. It represents the refusal to limit future directions through
prophetic or utopian foreclosures.
Perhaps, to defer to Derrida once again, we can glimpse the
hither side of this modern conundrum in his notion of the “messianic without messianism,” or rather, a “future-to-come” that
avoids the temptation to totalize; to approach tomorrow “without
concluding in advance” (1994: 37). Rather than disposing of the
prophetic tone altogether, Derrida believes that it is possible to
sever the eschatological from the teleological, and therefore recuperate and reroute the various passages of time. Such a strategy
“strips the messianic hope of all biblical forms, and even all determinable figures of the wait or expectation; it thus denudes itself in
view of responding to that which must be absolute hospitality, the
‘yes’ to the arrivant(e), the ‘come’ to the future that cannot be antic-

The Revelation Will not be Televised

177

ipated—which must not be the ‘anything whatsoever’ . . .” (168).
Thus, the “messianic is general” is, according to Derrida (and in
contrast to someone like Quinby) something that “we cannot and
ought not to do without” (ibid.).
The asymptotic approach of the arrivant(e) is also reflected in
the subtitle of this study: “toward a politics of exhaustion.” Such a
proposition usually implies a desired destination or a predetermined telos. I would hesitate, however, in making such a suggestion
when dealing with libidinal millenarianism. The future-to-come
never really arrives, and yet in order to make some kind of cultural sense out of the present we must behave as if these proleptic
traces are leading us to some expedient state. The question therefore becomes, What is this politics of exhaustion? Have I merely
been documenting the exhaustion of a certain kind of postEnlightenment politics? Or “politics” itself? Or is it that political
responses are constantly reborn from the compost of previous victory banquets? From the ashes of extinguished enthusiasms? Or
even from the emotional residues of fleeting affiliations?
Clues to the answers of such questions can be found in the
work of the Italian theorist, Giorgio Agamben, who has adopted the
prophetic power of Derrida’s “to-come” in relation to his particular
vision of a “coming community,” based on an “inessential commonality” (1993). Agamben states that the “coming being” represents a
particular ontic mode whose power lies is in its pure possibility:
humanity “has to exist as potentiality” (ibid.: 1, 44). “To come” represents that which has not yet been brought into being: a “region
that is beyond perdition and salvation” (ibid.: 6).
The coming community is, therefore, an ideal place to begin
looking for a politics of exhaustion on the other side of the twentieth century (so long as we realize that the search is more important
than the object it seeks). The coming community also represents a
collective expression of its own sophisticated millenarian subtexts,
not least in its linguistic gesture towards eternity (ibid.: 101-103).
In evading essentialist notions of identity, affiliation, and other representable conditions of belonging, Agamben’s strategy attempts to
defy the all-inclusive meta-discourse of the nation-state. (The task
at hand is to further unpack Agamben’s metadionysian model into
the current media-globalist climate.) Such strategic evasions have
the power to defuse those apocalyptic scenarios that reinforce the
social bond through a rejuvenation of State power and presence (as
witnessed in the painfully obviously Benetton-dénouement [outcome] of Roland Emmerich’s Independence Day).
The coming community, along with the libidinal economy
through which it circulates, is a promise that can’t be kept, according to its inherent condition. Once we have come, we are “spent”

178

Conclusion

(and all exchange is temporarily suspended). Thus, even Agamben’s
postutopian vision stems from a sense of anticipation: something
glimpsed within the slippage between coming and going. (Imagine
if lovers announced their own climax with the phrase “I’m going.”)
Again it becomes clear that millennial time discursively dwells in
the eternally liminal space between an always after orgy, and an
always almost apocalypse.
As Agamben notes, “At this point there is salvation—but not
for us” (ibid.: 102).

The Owl of Minerva Versus the Millennium Falcon

The idea that to-morrow morning at half-past seven o’clock a
monstrous, unsuspected event will suddenly take place; that
on Thursday next a complete revolution will be accomplished
at a single blow, that a revelation, a redemption, the advent
of a new age, is imminent—this is frequently observed
among the insane; it is a mystic delirium.
Max Nordau (544)
The more things change, the less they stay the same.
Spinal Tap interview

From Rock-a-bye Baby to Revelation, apocalypse and redemption
form part of the most enduring and pervasive dynamic in
Western history. From the everyday apocalypse of our refrigerator’s use-by dates, to the more profound nuclear and viral fears,
the urge for some kind of spiritual or emotional salvation from
the brink has led to what Mark Dery has called a “theology of the
ejector seat” (8).
The influential philosophies of the Marquis de Sade, Bataille,
and Nietzsche were all fabricated in times of perceived crisis or
ending: the Terror, the Holocaust, the fin de siècle, and thus echo
nightmarishly in our own ears. By returning to dionysian ideas
from a jaded millennial perspective, we better understand how
the thanatic asymptote attaches itself like a tapeworm to our
most cherished myths, especially the myth of progress. As
Haraway reminds us, “there have been practical inheritances,
which have undergone many reconfigurations, but which remain
potent” (1997: 33). Incorporating everything from Aum

The Revelation Will not be Televised

179

Shinrikyo’s telepathic helmets through F. T. Marinetti’s machinic
madness to Neal Stephenson’s cyborgs, this inheritance adapts to
each unique cultural splicing.
The erotic apocalypse is so fundamental to Western eschatology that “libidinal millenarianism” is not one specific form of millenarianism, but its fundamental structure and function. Moreover,
it is the persistent link between the liminal and the libidinal that
creates the conditions for its transmission between people, generations, and cultures. For just as liminal spaces (e.g., trains, hotels,
and nightclubs) encourage the libido, so too do liminal moments
(e.g., weddings, carnivals, and the apocalypse).
Libidinal millenarianism is thus the ideological wreckage created by the redemptive, goal-seeking conception of history after its
violent collision with a more ancient, cyclic perspective on the passage of time. By belonging to or issuing from “nature,” Pan stands
outside history, and as such he plays an ambiguous and ambivalent
role in narratives of the End. “Transgression itself is organized,”
Bataille notes. “Eroticism as a whole is an organized activity, and
this is why it changes over the years” (1986: 108). To reclaim or
reinvent a diversity of political futures (which themselves refuse
the politically dubious premise of vigorous health and boundless
energy) is thus an imaginative and existential challenge.
As Shaviro observes, the “sense of urgency and impending
doom,” displayed in postmodern culture, “is always being ironized,
stylized, and indefinitely deferred” (1997). Herein lies the difference between our own millennium and those heretical eruptions
that preceded modernity: our self-conscious and almost embarrassed sense of still being here against all odds and sense of decorum. The stubborn persistence of the human race in spelling
Armageddon for everything—from other species to obsolete technologies, languages, and worldviews—is tantamount to hubris.
Although every lunatic in an end-is-nigh sandwich board has been
wrong so far, he or she represents a kind of twisted truth. As
Walter Benjamin’s angel of history foretold, the end is always nigh,
and progress is always catastrophic.
I have been arguing that dionysian rhetoric, which traditionally
has been viewed as apocalyptic, smuggles in certain ideas antagonistic to historical closure, whether presented as Armageddon or
utopia (which are two sides of the same bad penny). As the Earl of
Shaftesbury cannily observed, “[i]t was never surely the business of
Poets in those days to call Revelation in to question, when it evidently made so well for their art” (7). The same could be said for our
scientists, journalists, and other cultural engineers.
“I love not knowing the future,” said Nietzsche (Bey, 1994). The

Conclusion

180

same cannot be said of weather forecasters, investment bankers,
stockbrokers, corporate-affiliated psychics, and other commercial
prognosticators. The future, as Andrew Ross remarks,
has been heavily populated by traditionally anti-progressivist
interests. It has become the natural habitat of technocratic elites;
a lucrative haven for financial speculators; an indispensable tool
in the politics of crisis management; a professional training
ground for militarists; the next frontier for free-marketeers; and
the locus for “thinking the unthinkable,” to use Herman Kahn’s
notorious phrase for describing the logistics of post-nuclear survivalism. (172)

The urge to “colonize the future” (ibid.: 181) is a mandate of apollonian political economics, explaining the dionysian wish to escape
the hypnotic power of a simulation society. It also explains the
desire to break that Saturnalian curse—the obligation to lead timebound lives—in order to experience what Bey has termed the clockless nowever (1991: 4).
For the dionysian, Nietzsche reminds us, “[t]he ‘kingdom of
God’ is nothing that one expects; it has no yesterday and no day
after tomorrow, it will not come in ‘a thousand years’—it is an experience of the heart; it is everywhere, it is nowhere” (1982: 608).
Libidinal millenarianism thus gives a negative answer to the question, “Has anyone anywhere in the history of the world ever genuinely believed in the reality of life after death?” (Lanchester 93).
Eroticism can therefore be construed as an ongoing charivari
against the worst serial killer in history: the grim reaper himself.

Means to an End

It’s been a prevalent notion . . . . someday, somehow,
before the end, a gathering back to home. A messenger from
the Kingdom, arriving at the last moment. But I tell you
there is no such message, no such home—only the millions
of last moments . . . no more. Our history is an aggregate
of last moments.
Pynchon (148-49)

My final image was given to me by a woman who spent one New
Year’s Eve in a hotel room in Jakarta, Indonesia, watching the celebrations on television. At five minutes to midnight, the camera closed

The Revelation Will not be Televised

181

in on one of those analogue clocks found in countless institutions
such as schools and banks. Apart from some muffled cheers from off
camera, nothing happened at the stroke of twelve. The lens remained
on the clock-face until someone remembered, ten minutes later, to cut
to a different show.
In addition to providing a humorous pathos at this “technological lag” between different nations and economies, the face of that
analogue clock reflects our thoughts and actions. As Frank Kermode
puts it, what we hear as the “tick-tock” of a clock enacts “a tiny genesis and a tiny apocalypse,” from the first tick to the final tock (1995:
250). Analogue clocks are diachronic: they show us where we have
been and where we are going. But the digital clocks —of which the
Genitron is the quintessential example—are synchronic. Each
moment is severed from the previous one and the next.
Baudrillard reminds us that the twentieth century could
do nothing more than count the seconds separating it from its end
without either being able, or really wanting, to measure up to that
end—the digital clock on the Beaubourg Centre showing the
countdown in millions of seconds is the perfect symbol. It illustrates the reversal of the whole of our modernity’s relation to time.
Time is no longer counted progressively, by addition, starting from
an origin, but by subtraction, starting from the end. This is what
happens with rocket launches or time bombs. And that end is no
longer the symbolic endpoint of a history, but the mark of a zero
sum, of a potential exhaustion. (1997)

The whole of the twentieth century can therefore be viewed as
fundamentally millenarian in its outlook, defying the received
wisdom that “life on the brink of the millennium is psychologically and politically impossible to sustain” (Rowland 55). Indeed, as
I have endeavored to show, the modern era (at least from the
Marquis de Sade onward) has witnessed a mode of organizing and
absorbing eschatological exhaustion, defusing it and deploying it
in equal measure. Life goes on despite the end being nigh; and
these two clichés coexist in their own asymptotic relation, constantly canceling out each other without ever colliding. “We ‘live
from the end,’” writes Kermode, “even if the world should be endless” (1975: 58).
Postmillennial events have conspired so that we find ourselves
at a red-light district performance of Waiting for Godot, in which we
await a transcendent but belated climax. To bring forward the end
by pulling God(ot) onstage, to expose the ideological pulleys and
levers that held the world of Oz in suspense, is a triumphant rejection of the apollonian order. It is the empowering, and ultimately
political, recognition that “[a]ll the agencies of repression and con-

182

Conclusion

trol are installed in this divided space, in the suspense between a
life and its proper end, that is, in the production of a literally fantastic and artificial temporality” (Baudrillard 1993: 130).
To defer the orgasm via genderless foreplay is merely to mimic
the capitalistic Christian strategy of “tomorrow never comes.” The
historical subject suffers the risks and frustrations of a millennialong coitus interruptus, a method discouraged by most health professionals on account of its unreliability. It therefore becomes paramount that we abandon the equation between progress and evolution, anticipation and salvation, and sexuality and satisfaction. In
J. G. Ballard’s terms, we need to invent a myth of the future which
does not preempt, foreclose, or dictate its unfolding. We need a “predictive mythology” that is not a blue-print for the engineering of
tomorrow, but “an operating formula by which we can deal with our
passage through consciousness” (Revell 42).
If we are to change the apocalyptic graph we shall have to
recode the thanatic asymptote. The orgy is over; long live the orgy.
The desire for peak-experiences should not be conflated with the
death-wish desire for transcendence. A palpable cultural wish for
“something” to happen can occur within the space of the climax only
if we deepen our understanding of libidinal millenarianism and its
dionysian heritage. Erotic peak-experiences are followed by negativity only when we use them to distract ourselves from certain
pressing realities. When the climax is simultaneously an anticlimax —as it was in the year 2000—we forget that it could be otherwise. For when the future is completely inscribed by the present,
we are already history.

Notes

1. The Eschaton is an enigmatic name applied to a transcendental
object which lies at the end of history. It is the last of the Last Things.
2. See also Aaron Lynch’s Thought Contagion: How Belief Spreads
Through Society (New York: Basic Books, 1996), and Mark Dery’s warning
against the Darwinian subtext of memes in The Pyrotechnic Insanitarium:
American Culture on the Brink (1999), p.48-9.
3. Throughout this book I distinguish the upper-case “Dionysian” from
the lower-case “dionysian.” The former refers to discourses directly concerning the god Dionysus (as with Nietzsche), and the latter its generalization in more recent usage. The difference should not be overstated, however, given the inevitable overlap between these. The same is true of my
distinction between “Apollonian” and “apollonian.”
4. For the full behind-the-scenes pathos of this publicity stunt, see
Gough Lewis’ independent documentary film, Sex: The Annabel Chong
Story (1999).
5. Traditionally, prophecy itself has been coded as feminine.
Consequently, Derrida can refer to Hegel’s disgust at “mystagogic metaphysicians” behaving like “musclemen,” who “lately preach with enthusiasm a wisdom that costs them nothing, since they claim they have caught
this goddess by the end of her robe and thus have made themselves her
masters and lords . . .” (1984: 17).
6. Traditionally associated with the pastoral, Dionysus has ancient
links with the technological. One of the earliest documented automatons is
believed to have been built in the first century AD by Hero of Alexandria,
a Greek engineer who is said to have designed a mannequin theatre “in
which the god Bacchus sprayed wine from his staff while bacchantes
danced” (in Dery 114).
7. Unless otherwise stated, all Maffesoli quotes in this section are from
the 1996 edition of The Time of the Tribes (1988).

183

184

Notes

8. A good deal of present-day scholarship which celebrates the antagonistic strategies of subcultures and marginalized peoples conflates the
transgressive and the subversive, thereby failing to appreciate the fact
that, “transgression does not seek to oppose one thing to another”
(Foucault, 1977: 35). See also Stallybrass and White’s The Politics and
Poetics of Transgression (Ithaca: Cornell University Press, 1986), particularly pp.17-8 and 201-2.
9. I employ the upper case when I am specifically referring to the reified and deified construct of “nature.”
10. This should not be confused with masochism (which traditionally
has been interpreted as merely an inversion of Sadism), for Bataille’s selfdestruction is based on a totally different, and less Manichean, paradigm.
See Gilles Deleuze’s “Coldness and Cruelty” in Masochism (1989), and also
Leo Bersani’s The Freudian Body: Psychoanalysis and Art (New York:
Columbia University Press, 1986).
11. For the sake of consistency I use the contemporary spelling of
“Dionysus” throughout this book; however, when quoting Nietzsche directly I use his spelling, “Dionysos.”
12. Unless otherwise stated, all quotes in this section are from
Wolfgang Schivelbusch’s comprehensive study, The Railway Journey
(1980).
13. Baudrillard, once again, feels the need to divide the history of the
accident into three distinct stages: the “natural-unforeseeable” catastrophe
of the pre-modern era, the “manufactured-foreseeable” catastrophe of the
modern era, and the “pre-programmed-deliberate” catastrophe of the postmodern era (1994: 71). This chapter covers the transition from the second
to the third stage of Baudrillard’s model.
14. Coincidentally, 1996 marked the 100th anniversary of the world’s
first fatal car accident. On 17 August, Bridget Driscoll (aged 44) was hit on
her way to a folk dance in South London. Witnesses described the offending vehicle as “coming at a great rate – as fast as a bicycle”. The coroner was
quoted as saying that such a death “must never happen again” (Watkins).
15. The narrator of Crash is provocatively named James Ballard. In
order to avoid unnecessary confusion, I shall refer to this character as
“James Ballard,” and to his authorial persona as “J.G. Ballard” or simply
“Ballard.”
16. A far more benign virus, namely the “Jes Grew” anti-plague of
Ishmael Reed’s Mumbo Jumbo also transmits itself through technology
and glossolalia, resulting in dancing rather than death: “Some plagues
arise from decomposing animals, but Jes Grew is electric as life and is
characterized by ebullience and ecstasy. Terrible plagues were due to the
wrath of God; but Jes Grew is the delight of the gods” (6).

Notes

185

17. In Aldous Huxley’s Brave New World (first published in 1932), the
term of admiration reserved for women is “pneumatic.” This cyborgian
image must date from the invention of inflatable tyres for cars. Its textual
precursor is T.S. Eliot’s Grishkin, whose “friendly bust/Gives promise of
pneumatic bliss” (“Whispers of Immortality,” first published 1920).
18. In Decadence and the Making of Modernism (1995), David Weir
draws attention to the ideological baggage which Darwin’s work has been
asked to carry: “The scientific neutrality of Darwin’s ‘descent with modification’ was misinterpreted as progressive ‘evolution’ by the optimists, and
as literal descent or decline by the pessimists” (xiii).
19. This continuum is acknowledged in a 1997 advertising campaign
by Sony, which employs Izaak Walton’s The Compleat Angler (1653) as a
hinge between “artifice” and “hi-tech.” Fish hurl themselves at a floating
television monitor which plays a video of insects. The narration is lifted
straight from Walton: “Is it not an art to deceive a trout with an artificial
fly?”
20. All quotes from Maffesoli in this section are from this text.
21. For a more detailed account of Joachim’s historical system, see
Cohn, 1993: 108-9.
22. Unless otherwise stated, all Baudrillard quotes in this section are
from the 1993 edition of Symbolic Exchange and Death (1976).
23. For more information on D’Annunzio’s occupation of the italian
town of Fiume, see John Robert Woodhouse’s Gabriele D’Annunzio: Defiant
Archangel (Oxford: Clarendon Press, 1998). For more on historical temporary autonomous zones, see Peter L. Wilson’s book Pirate Utopias: Moorish
Corsairs and European Renegades (New York: Autonomedia, 1995). For
more on John of Leyden’s New Jerusalem see Greil Marcus’s Lipstick
Traces: A Secret History of the Twentieth Century (London: Secker &
Warburg, 1993). Bible Belt “freedom zones” refer to those fuzzy areas mainly dotted throughout the American South and mid-West, claimed by antiGovernment para-military organizations as autonomous territory outside
the jurisdiction of the State.
24. In an article entitled “Welcome to the Desert of the Real,” circulated by email immediately after the attacks on Manhattan and Washington,
Slavoj Zizek writes: “Now, in the days immediately following the bombings,
it is as if we dwell in the unique time between a traumatic event and its
symbolic impact, like in those brief moment after we are deeply cut, and
before the full extent of the pain strikes us - it is open how the events will
be symbolized, what their symbolic efficiency will be, what acts they will be
evoked to justify.” My claim, however, is that we have been dwelling in just
this “unique time” since Sade, and most certainly since the bloodshot dawn
of the twentieth century. This is the real meaning of the last pages of
Pynchon’s Gravity’s Rainbow.

186

Notes

25. In their book Empire, Michael Hardt and Antonio Negri promote
just such potential in the emergent formations of the “global multitude,”
which they believe “conceives the future only as a totality of possibilities
that branch out in every direction” (Cambridge and London: Harvard
University Press, 2000, 380).

Works Cited

Adler, Jerry. ‘Far From Home.’ Newsweek (7 April, 1997), 37-9.
Agamben, Giorgio. The Coming Community. Translated by Michael Hardt.
Minneapolis & London: University of Minnesota Press, 1993.
_____. Remnants of Auschwitz: The Witness and the Archive. Translated by
Daniel Heller-Roazen. New York: Zone, 1999.
Airaksinen, Timo. Of Glamor, Sex and De Sade. Wakefield: Longwood
Academic, 1991.
Ballard, J.G. Crash, Herts: Panther, 1975. First published 1973.
_____. ‘Ballard Responds.’ Science Fiction Studies. 18, 1991. 329.
_____. ‘The Car, The Future.’ User’s Guide to the Millennium. London:
HarperCollins, 1996. First published in 1971.
Barthes, Roland. A Lover’s Discourse: Fragments. New York: Hill and
Wang, 1978.
Bataille, Georges. Erotism: Death and Sensuality. San Francisco: City
Lights, 1986. First published in 1957.
_____. The Accursed Share. Vol. 1. Translated by Robert Hurley. New York:
Zone, 1988. First published in 1967.
Baudrillard, Jean. ‘What are You Doing After the Orgy?’ Art Forum
(October, 1983). 42-6.
_____. America. Translated by Chris Turner. London: Verso, 1989.
_____. Fatal Strategies. Translated by Philip Beitchman and W.D.J.
Niesluchowski. New York: Semiotext(e), 1990.
_____. ‘Ballard’s Crash.’ Science Fiction Studies. 18, 1991. 313-20.
_____. Symbolic Exchange and Death. Translated by Iain Hamilton Grant.
London: Sage, 1993.

187

188

Works Cited

_____. The Transparency of Evil: Essays on Extreme Phenomena.
Translated by Chris Turner. London: Verso, 1993a.
_____. The Illusion of the End. Translated by Chris Turner. Oxford: Polity
Press, 1994.
_____. The Perfect Crime. Translated by Chris Turner. London: Verso, 1996.
_____. ‘The End of the Millennium or the Countdown.’ ICA Archive,
Online. Internet. 26 May, 1997. n. pag.
http://filament.illumin.co.uk/ica/Bulletin/talks/baudrillard/
endofmillennium.html
Beachy, Stephen. ‘AIDS and the Apocalyptic Imagination.’ In Eric Liu, ed.
Next: Young American Writers on the New Generation, New York:
W.W. Norton & Company, 1994. 17-37.
Beaumont, Barbara, ed. The Road from Decadence: Letters of J.-K.
Huysmans. Cambridge: The Athlone Press, 1989.
Benjamin, Walter. ‘The Work of Art in the Age of Mechanical Reproduction.’
Illuminations. 1992. 211-44.
Bernstein, Michael André. Bitter Carnival: Ressentiment and the Abject
Hero. Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1992.
_____. Foregone Conclusions: Against Apocalyptic History. Berkeley:
University of California Press, 1994.
Bey, Hakim. T.A.Z.: The Temporary Autonomous Zone, Ontological
Anarchy, Poetic Terrorism. New York: Autonomedia, 1991.
_____. Radio Sermonettes. Online. Internet. 1994. n. pag. Available
http://www.speakeasy.org/~ibbey/mo/sermonettes/index.html
_____. ‘Permanent TAZs.’ Online. Internet. 1995. n. pag. Available
http://www.etext.org/Politics/Spunk/library/writers/bey/sp000128.txt
_____. Millennium. New York: Autonomedia/Garden of Delights, 1996.
Boyer, Paul. By the Bomb’s Early Light: American Thought and Culture at
the Dawn of the Atomic Age. New York: Pantheon Books, 1985.
_____. When Time Shall Be No More: Prophecy Belief in Modern American
Culture. Massachusetts: Belknap-Harvard University Press, 1992.
Brecht, Stefan. ‘Review: ‘Dionysus in ’69.’ Tulane Drama Review. 13, 3,
1969. 156-71.
Brown, Norman O. Life Against Death: The Psychoanalytical Meaning
of History. Middletown: Wesleyan University Press, 1970. First
published 1959.
_____. Love’s Body. Berkeley: University of California Press, 1990. First
published 1966.

Works Cited

189

_____. Apocalypse and/or Metamorphosis. Berkeley: University of
California Press, 1991.
Buck-Morss, Susan. ‘Aesthetics and Anaesthetics: Walter Benjamin’s
Artwork Essay Reconsidered.’ New Formations. 20, 1993. 123-43.
Bukatman, Scott. Terminal Identity: The Virtual Subject in Postmodern
Science Fiction. Durham: Duke University Press, 1993.
Bull, Malcolm, ed. Apocalypse Theory and the Ends of the World, Oxford:
Blackwell, 1995.
_____. ‘On Making Ends Meet.’ In Bull (1995) 1995b. 1-17.
Butler, Judith. ‘Contingent Foundations: Feminism and the Question of
“Postmodernism.”’ in J. Butler and Joan W. Scott, eds., Feminists
Theorize the Political. New York and London: Routledge, 1992.
Cherry 2000. Dir. Steve DeJarnatt. Perf. Melanie Griffith and Ben
Johnson. Orion. 1987.
Chidester, David. Patterns of Transcendence: Religion, Death and Dying.
Belmont: Wadsworth, 1990.
Chua-Eoan, Howard. ‘Imprisoned by His Own Passions.’ Newsweek. (7 April,
1997). 36-8.
Clarke, Arthur C. 3001: The Final Odyssey. London: HarperCollins, 1996.
Cohn, Norman. The Pursuit of the Millennium: Revolutionary Millenarians
and Mystical Anarchists of the Middle Ages. Sydney: Pimlico, 1993.
First published 1957.
_____. ‘How Time Acquired a Consummation.’ In Bull (1995). 21-37.
Coupland, Douglas. Microserfs. New York: Regan Books, 1995.
Cowley, Geoffrey. ‘Viruses of the Mind: How Odd Ideas Survive.’ Newsweek.
(14 April, 1997) 14.
Crash. Dir. David Cronenberg. Perf. James Spader and Holly Hunter.
Columbia Tri-Star. 1996.
Darwin, Charles. The Origin of Species. London: John Murray, 1859.
Davenport-Hines, Richard, ed. The Penguin Book of Vice. London:
Penguin, 1995.
Deleuze, Gilles. “Coldness and Cruelty.” In Masochism. Translated by
Jean McNeil. New York: Zone, 1989. First published in 1967.
_____. Difference and Repetition. Translated by Paul Patton. New York:
Columbia University Press, 1994. First published in 1968.
Deleuze, Gille and Felix Guattari. A Thousand Plateaus: Capitalism and
Schizophrenia. Translated by Brian Massumi. London: Athlone
Press, 1999. First published 1980.

190

Works Cited

DeLillo, Don. White Noise. London: Picador, 1985.
Dellamora, Richard. Apocalyptic Overtures: Sexual Politics and the Sense
of an Ending. New Jersey: Rutgers University Press, 1994.
_____, ed. Postmodern Apocalypse: Theory and Cultural Practice at the
End. Philadelphia: University of Pennsylvania Press, 1995.
Derrida, Jacques. ‘Of an Apocalyptic Tone Recently Adopted in Philosophy.’
Translated by John P. Leavey, Jnr. Oxford Literary Review. 6, 2,
1984. 3-37.
_____. Specters of Marx: The State of the Debt, The Work of Mourning, and
the New International. Translated by Peggy Kamuf. New York &
London: Routledge, 1994.
_____. The Gift of Death. Translated by David Wills. Chicago: Chicago
University Press, 1995.
Dery, Mark. Escape Velocity: Cyberculture at the End of the Century. New
York: Grove Press, 1996.
de Sade, The Marquis. Philosophy in the Bedroom. London: Velvet, 1995.
Written in 1795.
Dickinson, Peter. “‘Go-go Dancing on the Brink of the Apocalypse’”:
Representing AIDS,’ in Dellamora (1995) 219-40 .
Dionysus in ’69. Dir. Schechner, Perf. The Performance Group. Theatrical
Production. 1968.
Dr. Strangelove: Or How I Stopped Worrying and Learned to Love the
Bomb. Dir. Stanley Kubrick. Perf. Peter Sellers and George C. Scott.
Columbia. 1964.
During, Simon. Foucault and Literature: Towards a Genealogy of Writing.
London: Routledge, 1992.
Eagleton, Terry. ‘Back to the Future.’ New Statesman. (1 May, 1990) 42-3.
Editorial. ‘The Next Level.’ Newsweek. (7 April, 1997) 28-35.
Elam, Diane. Romancing the Postmodern. London and New York:
Routledge, 1992.
Eliot, T. S. ‘Whispers of Immortality.’ The Complete Poems and Plays of T.
S. Eliot. London: Faber & Faber, 1969. 52.
Erickson, Steve. ‘2001: A Sex Odyssey.’ Details. (May, 1995) 52-60.
Faurschou, Gail. ‘Fashion and the Cultural Logic of Postmodernity.’ In
Kroker and Kroker (1988). 78-93.
Flaubert, Gustav. Dictionnaire des Idées Reçues. [Dictionary of Received
Ideas] Online. Internet. 1999. n.pag.
http://perso.wanadoo.fr/jb.guinot/pages/oeuvres9a.html. First published 1913.

Works Cited

191

Foucault, Michel. ‘A Preface to Transgression.’ In Donald Bouchard, ed.
Language, Counter- Memory, Practice. Translated by Donald
Bouchard and Sherry Simon. Ithaca: Cornell University Press, 1977.
29-52.
_____. The History of Sexuality. Vol.1. Translated by Robert Hurley.
London: Penguin, 1990.
_____. ‘Nietzsche, Genealogy, History.’ In Paul Rabinow, ed. The Foucault
Reader. New York: Penguin, 1991. 76-100.
Freud, Sigmund. Civilization and Its Discontents. Translated by James
Strachey. New York: W.W. Norton, 1962. First published 1930.
_____. Beyond the Pleasure Principle. Translated by James Strachey.
London: Hogarth Press, 1961. First published 1920.
Fukuyama, Francis. The End of History and the Last Man. New York:
Maxwell Macmillan International, 1992.
Gane, Mike. Baudrillard’s Bestiary: Baudrillard and Culture. London:
Routledge, 1991.
_____, ed. Baudrillard Live: Selected Interviews. London: Routledge, 1993.
Gasché, Rodolphe. ‘The Falls of History: Huysmans’ A Rebours.’ Yale
French Studies. 74, 1988. 183-204.
Gegax, T. Trent. ‘The Unkindest Cut of All.’ Newsweek. (7 April, 1997) 39.
Ghostbusters. Dir. Ivan Reitman. Perf. Bill Murray and Dan Aykroyd.
Columbia Pictures. 1984.
Gibson, William. Mona Lisa Overdrive. London: Grafton, 1989.
_____. “Burning Chrome.” Burning Chrome. London: Harper Collins, 1995.
Gillespie, Michael. Nihilism before Nietzsche. Chicago: University of
Chicago Press, 1995.
Gitlin, Todd. The Sixties: Years of Hope, Days of Rage. New York: Bantam,
1987.
Gleick, Elizabeth. ‘The Marker We’ve Been Waiting For.’ Newsweek.
(7 April, 1997) 22-30.
Grant, Linda. Sexing the Millennium. London: Harper Collins, 1993.
Graves, Robert. The Greek Myths. Vol.1. Harmondsworth: Penguin, 1960.
Guattari, Félix. Chaosmosis: an Ethico-Aesthetic Paradigm. Sydney: Power
Publications, 1995.
Hallock, Betty. ‘Sex Champ: Annabel Chong.’ Giant Robot. 6, 1996. 82-83.

192

Works Cited

Haraway, Donna. ‘A Manifesto for Cyborgs: Science, Technology, and
Socialist Feminism in the 1980s.’ Socialist Review. 80, 1985. 65-107.
_____. Modest_Witness@Second_Millennium.FemaleMan©_Meets_OncoMouse™:
Feminism and Technoscience. New York: Routledge, 1997.
Hayles, N. Katherine. ‘The Borders of Madness.’ Science Fiction Studies.
18, 1991. 321-23
Heidegger, Martin. The Question Concerning Technology and Other Essays.
Translated by William Lovitt. New York: Garland Publishing, 1977.
Hillman, James. Pan and the Nightmare: An Essay on Pan. Dallas: Spring,
1988.
Huysmans, J.-K. Against the Grain (A Rebours). New York: Dover, 1969.
First published in 1884.
Jameson, Frederic. Postmodernism, or the Cultural Logic of Late
Capitalism. Durham, N.C.: Duke University Press, 1991.
Juno, Andrea et al., eds. J.G. Ballard. San Francisco: Research, 1984.
Kaplan, David E. and Andrew Marshall. The Cult at the End of the World:
The Incredible Story of Aum. London: Arrow, 1996.
Kermode, Frank. The Sense of an Ending. London: Oxford University
Press, 1975.
_____. ‘Waiting for the End.’ In Bull (1995). 250-63.
Kingwell, Mark. Dreams of Millennium: Report from a Culture on the
Brink. Toronto: Viking, 1996.
Kossy, Donna. Kooks: A Guide to the Outer Limits of Human Belief.
Portland: Feral House, 1994.
Kroker, Arthur and Marilouise Kroker, eds. Body Invaders: Sexuality and
the Postmodern Condition. Canada: Macmillan, 1988.
Kumar, Krishan. ‘Apocalypse, Millennium and Utopia Today.’ In Bull
(1995). 200-26.
Lacayo, Richard. ‘The Lure of the Cult.’ Time. (7 April, 1997). 33-34.
Lamy, Philip. Millennium Rage: Survivalists, White Supremacists, and the
Doomsday Prophecy. New York: Plenum Press, 1996.
Lanchester, John. The Debt to Pleasure, London: Picador, 1996.
Land, Nick. Thirst for Annihilation: Georges Bataille and Virulent
Nihilism. London: Routledge, 1992.
Landon, Brooks. ‘Responding to the Killer B’s.’ Science Fiction Studies. 18,
1991. 326-27.

Works Cited

193

Lawrence, D.H. Lady Chatterly’s Lover. London: Penguin, 1994. First published 1928.
Levin, Charles. ‘Carnal Knowledge of Aesthetic States.’ In Kroker and
Kroker (1988). 99-119.
_____. Jean Baudrillard: A Study in Cultural Metaphysics. London:
Prentice Hall/Harvester Wheatsheaf, 1996.
Levy, Stephen. ‘Blaming the Web.’ Newsweek. (7 April, 1997). 46-47.
Life of Brian. Dir. Terry Jones. Perf. Graham Chapman and John Cleese.
Handmade Films. 1979.
Lightman, Alan. Einstein’s Dreams. London: Sceptre, 1994.
Lyotard, Jean-François. Discours/figure. Paris: Klincksieck, 1964.
_____. Libidinal Economy. Translated by Iain Hamilton Grant. London:
Athlone Press, 1993. First published 1974.
Maffesoli, Michel. The Shadow of Dionysus: A Contribution to the Sociology
of the Orgy. Translated by Cindy Linse and Mary Kristina
Palmquist. Albany: State University of New York Press, 1993.
_____. The Time of the Tribes: The Decline of Individualism in Mass Society.
Translated by Don Smith. London: Sage, 1996.
Marcuse, Herbert. Eros and Civilization. London: Abacus, 1973.
_____. One Dimensional Man. London: Ark, 1986. First published 1964.
Marinetti, F.T. Let’s Murder the Moonshine: Selected Writings. Translated
by R.W. Flint and Arthur A. Coppotelli. Los Angeles: Sun and Moon
Press, 1991.
McKenna, Terence. The Archaic Revival. San Francisco: Harper, 1991.
McLuhan, Marshall. Understanding Media: The Extensions of Man.
London: Abacus, 1974. First published 1964.
_____ . (with Quentin Fiore). The Medium is the Massage: An Inventory of
Effects. New York: Bantam, 1967.
Merivale, Patricia. Pan the Goat God: His Myth in Modern Times.
Massachusetts: Harvard University Press, 1969.
Milner, Andrew. ‘Apocalypse Australia.’ Australian Book Review. 153, 1995.
36-37.
Moore, Daniel. ‘Bliss Apocalypse.’ Tulane Drama Review. 14, 4, 1970. 52-71.
Natoli, Joseph. Speeding to the Millennium: Film and Culture 1993-1995.
Albany: State University of New York, 1998.
Neville, Richard. Playpower. London: Paladin, 1971.

194

Works Cited

______. Hippie Hippie Shake. Port Melbourne: William Heinemann
Australia, 1995.
Nietzsche, Friedrich. The Birth of Tragedy. Translated by Francis Golffing.
New York: Anchor Books, 1956. First published 1872.
______. Ecce Homo. Translated by R.J. Hollingdale. London: Penguin, 1979.
First published in 1888.
______. ‘The Antichrist.’ In Walter Kaufmann, ed. The Portable Nietzsche.
London: Penguin, 1982. 565-656. First published 1895.
______. ‘Twilight of the Idols.’ In Kaufmann (1982a). 463-564. First published 1889.
Nordau, Max. Degeneration. Lincoln: University of Nebraska Press, 1993.
First published 1892.
Nuttall, Jeff. Bomb Culture. London: Paladin, 1972.
Odell, David. A Rushed Quality. Online. Internet. 2001. Available
http://www.blackjelly.com/arushedquality.pdf
Paglia, Camille. Sexual Personae: Art and Decadence from Nefertiti to
Emily Dickinson. London: Yale University Press, 1990.
Pefanis, Julian. Heterology and the Postmodern: Bataille, Baudrillard and
Lyotard. Sydney: Allen & Unwin, 1991.
Praz, Mario. The Romantic Agony. Glasgow: Fontana, 1960. First published 1933.
Preston, Richard. The Hot Zone. Sydney: Bantam, 1995.
Pringle, David. ‘The Fourfold Symbolism of J.G. Ballard.’ In Juno et al
(1984). 126-37.
Pynchon, Thomas. Gravity’s Rainbow. U.K.: Picador, 1975.
Quinby, Lee. Anti-Apocalypse: Exercises in Genealogical Criticism.
Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1994.
Reed, Ishmael. Mumbo Jumbo. New York: Scribner, 1996. First published
1972.
Reeve, Simon et al. ‘Countdown to Armageddon.’ The Australian. (25 June,
1996) 53.
Revell, Graeme. ‘Interview with J.G. Ballard.’ In Juno et al. (1984) 42-53.
Reynolds, Simon. ‘A Philosophical Dance Stance.’ The Australian. (11
December, 1996) 35.
Rivers, Theodore John. Contra Technologiam: The Crisis of Value in a
Technological Age. Maryland: University Press of America, 1993.
Robbins, Tom. Jitterbug Perfume. New York: Bantam, 1990.

Works Cited

195

Robotham, Julie. ‘Chaos is King when the Chips are Down.’ Computer Age.
20 August, 1996) 12.
Ross, Andrew. Strange Weather: Culture, Science and Technology in the Age
of Limits. London: Verso, 1991.
Ross, Kristin. Fast Cars, Clean Bodies: Decolonization and the Reordering
of French Culture. London: MIT Press, 1995.
Rowland, Christopher. ‘“Upon Whom the Ends of the Ages have Come”:
Apocalyptic and the Interpretation of the New Testament.’ In Bull
(1995). 38-57.
Ruddick, Nicholas. ‘Ballard/Crash/Baudrillard.’ Science Fiction Studies.
19, 1992. 354-60.
Rushkoff, Douglas. Cyberia: Life in the Trenches of Cyberspace. San
Francisco: Harper, 1995.
Ruthven, Ken. Nuclear Criticism. Melbourne: Melbourne University Press,
1993.
Schivelbusch, Wolfgang. The Railway Journey: Trains and Travel in the
19th Century. New York: Urizen Books, 1980.
Schwartz, Hillel. Century’s End: An Orientation Manuel Toward the Year
2000. New York: Currency and Doubleday, 1996.
Shaffer, Elinor. ‘Secular Apocalypse: Prophets and Apocalypticians at the
End of the Eighteenth Century.’ In Bull (1995). 137-58.
Shaftesbury, Anthony, Earl of. ‘A Letter Concerning Enthusiasm,’ in
Characteristics of Men, Manners, Opinions, Times in Three Volumes.
Fifth Edition. Birmingham: John Baskerville, 1773. First published
1711.
Shaviro, Stephen. Doom Patrols. Online. Internet. 1997. n. pag. Available
http://www.dhalgren.com/Doom/
Showalter, Elaine. Sexual Anarchy: Gender and Culture at the Fin de
Siécle. London: Virago, 1992.
Sleep of Reason. Dir. Peter Jordan. Independent. 1994.
Sobchack, Vivian. ‘Baudrillard’s Obscenity.’ Science Fiction Studies. 18,
1991. 327-29.
_____. ‘Beating the Meat/ Surviving the Text, or How to Get Out of this
Century Alive.’ Cyberspace, Cyberbodies, Cyberpunk: Cultures of
Technological Embodiment. Featherstone & Burrows, eds. London:
Sage, 1995.
Springer, Claudia. Electronic Eros: Bodies and Desire in the Postindustrial
Age. Austin: University of Texas Press, 1996.

196

Works Cited

Stableford, Brian, ed. The Black Feast: the Second Dedalus Book of
Decadence. Cambs: Dedalus, 1992.
_____, ed. Moral Ruins: the Dedalus Book of Decadence. Cambs: Dedalus,
1993.
Stephenson, Neal. Snow Crash. U.K.: Bantam, 1993.
_____. The Diamond Age. London: Viking, 1995.
Strange Days. Dir. Kathryn Bigelow. Perf. Ralph Fiennes and Angela
Bassett. 20th Century Fox. 1995.
Tabachnick, Norman M.D. et al., eds. Accident or Suicide: Destruction by
Automobile. Illinois: Charles C. Thomas, 1973.
Thompson, Damian. The End of Time: Faith and Fear in the Shadow of the
Millennium. London: Minerva, 1997.
Toffler, Alvin. Future Shock. New York: Random House, 1970.
Tuveson, Ernest Lee. Millennium and Utopia: a Study in the Background
of the Idea of Progress. New York: Harper Torchbooks, 1964. First
published 1949.
2001: A Space Odyssey. Dir. Stanley Kubrick. Perf. Kier Dullea and Gary
Lockwood. MGM. 1968.
Vaneigem, Raoul. The Movement of the Free Spirit. New York: Zone, 1994.
Virilio, Paul and Sylvère Lotringer. Pure War. New York. Semiotext(e).
1983.
Virilio, Paul. Speed and Politics. New York: Semiotext(e), 1986.
_____. The Art of the Motor. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press,
1995.
Waite, Geoff. Nietzsche’s Corps/e: Aesthetics, Politics, Prophecy, or, the
Spectacular Technoculture of Everyday Life. Durham: Duke
University Press, 1996.
Walker, John. ‘Seizing Power: Decadence and Transgression in Foucault
and Paglia,’ Postmodern Culture 5, 1, Online. Internet. 1994.
Available
http://muse.jhu.edu/journals/postmodern_culture/v005/5.1walker.html
Watkins, Sian. ‘We’re Still Dying to Drive.’ The Age. August 15, 1996. 4.
Weir, David. Decadence and the Making of Modernism. Amherst:
University of Massachusetts Press, 1995.
Weiss, Allen S. The Aesthetics of Excess. Albany: State University of New
York Press, 1989.
Wiesenfelder, Joe. ‘The Information Superhighway (This is not a
Metaphor).’ Wired. 4.02, 1996. 126-129, 177, 180.

Works Cited

197

Wilson, Louise. ‘Cyberwar, God and Television: An Interview with Paul
Virilio.’ CTHEORY.
Online.
Internet.
1994. Available
http://www.ctheory.com/a-cyberwar_god.html
Wired for Sex. Dir. Laine Drewery. Canadian Broadcasting Corporation. 1996.
Wood, David, ed. Writing the Future. New York: Routledge, 1990.

This page intentionally left blank.

Index

2000 (the year), ix, 2–3, 145, 148,
151, 168, 171–72, 182
2001: A Space Odyssey
See Kubrick, Stanley
See also Clarke, Arthur C.
Adamites
See cults
Agamben, Giorgio, x–xi, 177–78
AIDS (HIV), 21, 112, 121, 126,
134–35, 140, 142, 176
See also virus
alienation, 1, 30, 33, 46, 74–77, 81,
103, 110, 133, 149, 155–56,
159–61
aliens, 5–6
Anthony, Earl of Shaftesbury, 25,
27–29, 33, 88, 93, 179
apocalypse, ix–188 passim.
Apollo(nian), 7, 22, 24, 26, 29, 32,
101, 109, 122, 130, 132, 138–39,
164, 167, 181, 185 n.3
Applewhite, Marshall Herff, 1–2, 4,
7, 107
See also cults; Heaven’s Gate
A Rebours
See Huysmans, J.-K.
Armageddon, 6, 15, 29, 56, 123,
129, 151, 158, 169, 179
Autogeddon
See crash, the
arrivant(e), 176–77

artifice, 20, 30, 32, 60, 88, 102,
107–10, 130, 143, 150, 153–56,
187 n.19
Aum Shinrikyo
See cults

Babel, 86–87
Ballard, J.G., 6, 20, 66, 68, 70–83,
87, 89–95, 97, 113, 125, 182, 186
n.15
Crash, 20, 66, 70–83, 87, 113,
186 n.15
Bataille, Georges, 5, 6, 7, 20,
37–61, 74, 93, 121–22, 138, 143,
155, 166, 171, 178–79, 186 n.10
Baudrillard, Jean, xi, xv, 9, 12, 19,
21, 33, 35, 64, 69, 71–78, 83,
86–88, 92, 96, 98, 121, 133, 135,
141–70, 172, 175, 181–82, 186
n13, 187 n.22
belatedness (psychology of), x–xi,
103–04, 115
Benetton, 143, 177
Benjamin, Walter, xi, 81, 151, 179
Bernstein, Michael André, 22, 129,
164, 173, 176
Bersani, Leo, 138, 186
Bey, Hakim, 34, 97, 157–64, 180
Bigelow, Kathryn
See Strange Days

199

200

Index

Bin, Kimura, x
Bliss Apocalypse, 133–34
Bomb (the atomic), 21, 86, 124–29,
139–40, 163, 167
boredom, ix, 103, 110, 114, 125,
155
Boyer, Paul, 125–29
Branch Davidians
See cults
See also Koresh, David
Brecht, Stefan, 132–33
Brown, Norman O., 52, 73, 118,
123, 129, 131, 137–40, 142, 153
Buck-Morss, Susan, 81
Bukatman, Scott, 80
on terminal identity: 69, 73–74,
85, 94
Burning Man Festival, 162, 168
Butler, Judith, 93

Carmageddon
See crash, the
Cathars
See cults
Cherry 2000, 20, 78, 89–90, 96
Chidester, David, 37–39, 52
Chong, Annabel, 9, 185 n 4
Christ, Jesus, 11, 16, 28, 41, 158
anti–Christ, 53–57
Christianity, 11, 18–19, 27, 40–61,
101, 109, 112, 154–55, 162, 166,
172
Clarke, Arthur C., ix, 10, 163, 169
See also 2001: A Space Odyssey
climax, 12–16, 30, 102, 107, 112,
134–36, 166, 173, 178, 181–82
anti, ix, 21, 102, 166, 172, 182
Cobain, Kurt, 152
Cohn, Norman, 10–11, 45, 57, 131,
147, 187 n.21
cold war, the, 4, 129, 134–37, 140
coming
community, 177–78
ejaculation, 14–16, 30–31, 58, 87
second, 12, 19, 104, 115,
150–52, 158

Coupland, Douglas, 31
crash, the, 64–98, 170
Autogeddon, 78–82, 87, 91
Carmageddon, 97–98
Infocalypse, 78, 82–87, 172
snow, 86–87, 94
See also virus
Crash
See Ballard, J.G.
Cronenberg, David, 73, 153
Cuban missile crisis, 129
cults
Adamites, 13
Aum Shinrikyo, 2, 11, 28, 165,
178
Branch Davidians, 2, 28, 159.
See also Koresh, David
Cathars, 22
Extropians, 76, 163
Heaven’s Gate, 1–7, 23, 28,
107–08, 111, 143, 165, 176. See
also Applewhite,
Marshall Herff
Movement (Heresy) of the Free
Spirit, 9, 22, 42, 44–45
Order of the Solar Temple, 2, 7
Ranters, 131
Select Followers of Oklahoma, 6
culture, popular, 2, 20, 35, 37, 145,
151–52, 166
cyber
gnosis, 161, 163
punk, 7, 20, 32, 161
sex, 31–32, 80, 88–96, 130
space, 32–33, 69, 77, 82–87, 168
(see also Metaverse)
cyborg, 24, 70, 77–79, 86–90, 102,
108, 179, 187 n.17
See also Haraway, Donna

D’Annunzio, Gabriele, 19, 159, 187
n.23
Daniel, Book of, 14
Darwin, Charles, 3, 45, 86, 100,
130, 154, 164, 187 n.18
death drive, 48–50, 74, 138
death fashion, 141–44, 151
decadence, x, 9, 11–12, 19–20,

Index
23–4, 30–31, 34–35, 45, 49, 78,
97, 99–115, 118–19, 132, 138,
142–44, 147, 156–58, 165, 187
n.18
Degeneration
See Nordau, Max
Deleuze, Gilles, 27, 144, 166, 169,
186 n.10
and Felix Guattari 27
Dellamora, Richard, 21, 175–76
Derrida, Jacques, 14–16, 30, 87,
110, 172, 174, 176–77, 185 n.5
Dery, Mark, 159, 178, 185 n.2
Des Esseintes
See Huysmans, J.-K.
Diana, Princess, 91–93, 154
Dionysian, ix–188 passim.
Dionysus in ’69, 132–33
Dolmance, 42–46, 171
Domesday Book, 169
Dostoevsky, Fyodor, 26
Dr. Strangelove
See Kubrick, Stanley
During, Simon, 39
Dylan, Bob, 12, 129
dystopia(n), 45, 80, 96, 113, 158
See also utopian

Eagleton, Terry, 119
entropy, ix, 9, 54, 57, 104, 110–14,
149, 158
Eros, 6, 19, 20, 22, 29, 32, 37–61,
74, 97, 132, 136–38, 143, 153
escape velocity, 3, 70, 81–82, 149,
170
eschatology, x, 2, 15, 18–19, 30, 40,
56–57, 133, 138–39, 158, 163,
176, 179
Eschaton, 3, 125, 134, 163, 175,
185 n.1
Eternal Return, 12, 58–59, 150
exhaustion (cultural), ix–x, 9, 11,
22–23, 78, 100–101, 137, 158,
169, 175, 177, 181
Extropians
See cults

201

fin de siècle, 26, 35, 60, 99–114,
119, 152, 178
1890s, the 20, 118–19
Flaubert, Gustave, 76, 99
Foucault, Michel, 38, 40–42, 61,
110–15, 123–24, 129
Freud, Sigmund, 3, 6, 29, 39, 48,
66, 77, 112, 121–22, 138
Fukuyama, Francis, 149, 157
future shock, ix, 67, 101
Futurism
See Marinetti, F.T.
Gasché, Rodolphe, 88, 105–08
Gates, Bill, 2, 169
Microsoft, 63, 98
Generation X, 58, 112, 125, 146, 166
Gibson, William, 32, 70, 84–85,
161, 168
Ginsberg, Allen, 120, 129, 133
globalization, 23, 101
God (death of), 37, 40–42, 109
Grant, Linda, 43, 80, 130–35
Greer, Germaine, 118, 135
Haraway, Donna, 77, 91, 140, 173,
178
See also cyborg
Hardt, Michael, 188 n.25
Heaven’s Gate
See cults
See also Applewhite, Marshall
Herff
Heidegger, Martin, x, 17–19, 97,
162–63
heroin chic, 142
Hillman, James, 25, 29–32, 123
Hiro Protagonist, 82–85
See also Stephenson, Neal
history, end of, 3, 104–06, 112, 149,
157, 163
Huysmans, J.–K., 23, 30, 66–68,
76, 99, 102–114, 149–50, 165
Des Esseintes, 30, 66–68, 88, 95,
102–114
A Rebours, 20, 95, 99, 102–114,
149, 165

202

Index

Iliad, The, 84
Infocalypse
See crash, the
Internet, 2–4, 13, 30, 33, 63, 69–70,
73, 84–87, 92, 98, 123, 161
See also cyberspace
See also Metaverse
Jameson, Frederic, 141
Jes Grew
See Reed, Ishmael
Joachim de Fiore, 13, 147, 187 n.21
jouissance, 13, 76, 123
Jünger, Ernst, 64, 74, 81, 171
Kadrey, Richard, 31
Kermode, Frank, 2, 13, 147–48,
181
Kerouac, Jack, 126–27
Kingwell, Mark, 31, 68, 142, 152
Koresh, David, 7, 29, 159
See also cults; Branch Davidians
Kroker, Arthur and Marilouise, 32,
142
Kubrick, Stanley, ix, 3, 136, 164
Dr. Strangelove 136
2001: A Space Odyssey ix, 3,
92–93, 162–64
Land, Nick, 37, 42, 48, 52, 57–60
Last Judgment, 19, 27, 43, 45, 56,
58, 104, 129, 172
Lawrence, D.H,. 19, 140, 156–57,
167
Leary, Timothy, 118, 140, 164
Levin, Charles, 144
libertine(s), 30, 39, 42–49, 78, 95
Lightman, Alan, 174
Luddites, x, 144
Lyotard, Jean–François, 53, 60
Maffesoli, Michel, 19, 33–35, 52,
121–23, 128, 156, 173, 185 n.7,
187 n.20
Manson, Charles, 1, 6, 22
Marcuse, Herbert, 52, 118, 127,
139, 153

Marinetti, F.T., x, 66, 70–71, 93,
102, 178
Marx, Karl, 3, 99, 120, 147
Marxism, 3, 86, 147
McKenna, Terence, x, 4–6, 31, 140,
157, 161–66
McLuhan, Marshall, x, 22, 31, 63,
71, 76, 89, 98, 143, 162, 173, 174
memes (memetics), 4, 185 n.2
Merivale, Patricia, 25–27
messianism, 2, 4, 18, 29, 131, 139,
146, 176–77
Metaverse, 84–88
See also cyberspace
See also Internet
Microsoft
See Gates, Bill
millenarian(ism), ix–188 passim.
millenarianism, libidinal, xii, 3–7,
13–15, 20–24, 27–30, 60, 95, 99,
106, 113, 124, 130, 142, 145,
148, 151, 175–182
millennium bug
See Y2K problem
Mondo 2000, 8
Movement of the Free Spirit
See cults
National Automated Highway
System, 72
Nature, 29, 39, 41–48, 53, 60,
129–30, 186 n.9
against, 38, 43, 45, 53, 97
See also Huysmans, J.–K.; A
Rebours
necrophilia, 46, 73, 125, 136,
141–44, 154
Negri, Antonio, 188 n.25
Neville, Richard, 117–18, 137
Nietzsche, Friedrich, 6, 11, 18, 20,
25–27, 30, 32, 35, 37–61, 70, 97,
104, 109, 112, 125, 132, 140,
143, 151, 162, 165, 168, 175,
178–80, 185 n.3, 186 n.11
The Birth of Tragedy, 53–57,
109, 168
Ecce Homo, 53, 57, 59, 104
nihilism, 7, 9, 16, 18, 35, 41–47,

Index

203

54–61, 78, 83, 93, 104, 109, 125,
146, 159
Nike, 1, 143
Nordau, Max, 10–11, 65, 70, 93, 97,
99–101, 104–08, 113–115, 178
Degeneration, 10–11, 99–101,
113-14
nuclear
deterrance, 151–52
fear of, 29, 123–29
war, 29, 134–37, 157, 176, 178
Nuttall, Jeff, 122, 124–26, 131

postmodernity, 20, 34, 57, 150,
175, 179
posthuman, 70–71
posthumanist, 74
potlatch, 51, 122, 129, 162
prophecy, 79, 114–15, 139, 147–48,
165, 176, 185 n.6
self–fulfilling, 111, 152, 156, 173
Pynchon, Thomas, 12, 152, 173–74,
180, 187 n.24

Odell, David, xii
Order of the Solar Temple
See cults
orgy, 7–9, 32–35, 37, 110, 115,
121–23, 128, 132–33, 144, 182
after, ix, xi, xv, 7, 9, 24, 37, 95,
104, 123, 142, 144, 151, 153,
172–3, 178
ante-festum, x–xi
post-festum, x–xi, 19
Overman (Übermensch), 55, 60,
70–71, 140, 165
See also Nietzsche, Friedrich

Ranters
See cults
rave(rs), 13–14, 21–22, 34, 159–68
Real Doll, 90
redemption, x, 5–6, 22, 48, 82, 98,
106, 137–39, 163, 168, 173,
178–79
Reed, Ishmael, 175, 186 n.16
Reich, Wilhelm, 44, 123, 137–38,
153
repentance, 112–13, 150–51
Revelation
of St. John, 14–18, 54, 57, 87,
106, 157, 169, 178–79
as a general concept, x, 1, 3, 6,
12, 17–18, 59, 71, 91, 115, 138,
149, 165, 173–74, 178–79
Rivers, Theodore John, 17–19
Robbins, Tom, 29, 117, 134
Ross, Andrew, 180
Rousseau, Jean Jacques, x, 44
Rushkoff, Douglas, 162, 167
Ruthven, Ken, 136

pagan(s), 7–8, 33, 53–54, 75, 101,
107, 109, 56, 160–61
technopagans, 151, 161–68
Paglia, Camille, 12–13, 67, 110,
115, 118, 160, 173
Pan, 6, 12, 25–35, 75, 95, 97, 109,
156, 160, 162–63, 165, 167, 179
panic, 6, 12, 25, 81, 109, 128, 132,
134–37, 140, 152, 168
sex, 32–34, 142
Pill, the (contraceptive), 21, 124,
127, 130–32, 140, 167
Pixis Interactive, 32
pornography, 9, 16, 30–32, 40, 48,
74, 82, 88–91, 94–95, 132,
135–36, 150, 152, 168
postmodern, ix–x, 8, 30, 34, 89, 94,
104–05, 141, 143, 145–46, 150,
156, 166, 167, 169, 186 n.13
postmodernism, 77, 126, 144,

Quinby, Lee, 12, 173–77

Sade, Marquis de, 20, 37–61, 70,
97, 102, 104, 109–10, 119, 125,
143, 150, 171, 178, 181, 187
n.24
Salome, 110, 115
salvation, x, 5, 10, 18, 93, 97, 126,
139, 162–63, 169, 173, 177–78,
182
Schivelbusch, Wolfgang, 63–66, 186
n.13

204

Index

Schopenhauer, Arthur, 58, 104, 138
Select Followers of Oklahoma
See cults
Seven Seals, the, 15–16
Shaftesbury (see Anthony, Earl of)
Shaviro, Steven, 96, 174, 179
Shoah, the, 21
Situationists, 22, 125, 154, 158,
160–61
Sixties, the (1960s), 6, 20–21, 29,
31, 54, 117–140, 145–46, 153,
156–62, 164–66
Snow Crash
See Stephenson, Neal
snow crash
See crash, the
Sobchack, Vivian, 74, 77–78
St. Augustine, 16
St. John
See Revelation, of St. John
St. Theresa (of Avila), 5, 39, 50
St. Thomas, 13
Stableford, Brian, 112
Stelarc, 70, 76, 140
Stephenson, Neal, 7–8, 20, 70,
82–88, 94, 179
The Diamond Age, 7–8
Snow Crash, 20, 70, 82–88
Strange Days, 20, 93–96
Swift, Jonathon, 127, 157–58

techné, 17–19, 97, 107
techno–music
See rave(rs)
Temporary Autonomous Zone, 34,
97, 102, 156–61, 166–67, 187
n.23
See also Bey, Hakim
terminal identity
See Bukatman, Scott
terrorism, 85, 148, 158, 174, 176
thanatic asymptote, 48–52, 95,
151, 178, 182
Thanatos, 6, 19, 20, 22, 37–61, 74,
97, 132, 135, 138, 143, 153
Toffler, Alvin
See future shock

transcendence, 3, 22, 37–61, 81, 109,
138, 156, 164–65, 170, 173, 182
transgression, 3, 22, 37–61, 81, 95,
142, 156, 160, 165, 179, 186 n.8
UFOs, 4–6, 163, 165
utopia(n), 3, 35, 45, 120, 137,
158–60, 162, 165, 174, 175–79
See also dystopia(n)
Vaneigem, Raoul, 9, 155–56, 159
Vaughan
See Ballard; Crash
Virilio, Paul, 50, 67–71, 81, 83, 85,
92–96, 125, 137, 162
virtual reality, 66–89, 92–96, 164
virus, 4, 30, 126, 172, 176, 178, 186
n.16
computer, 84–87, 89, 172
See also crash, the
See also AIDS (HIV)
Waco
See cults; Branch Davidians
See also Koresh, David
Wagner, Richard, 30, 56, 100, 109
Waite, Geoff, 20, 30, 32, 57, 168
Walker, John, 46, 61
Weir, David, 102–05, 187 n.18
Weiss, Allen, S. 43, 60
Whore of Babylon, xv, 14–15
Woodstock, 137
World, End of the, xii, 16, 22, 37,
79, 124, 155, 157, 159, 169, 173
X-Files, The, 1, 5, 165
Y2K problem, 172
Zarathustra, 11, 29, 35, 55
Zizek, Slavoj, 187 n. 24
Zoroaster
See Zarathustra


